<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88906-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-06-88.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 172 / Tuesday, September 6, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 511, 813, 882, 887, 888, and 960</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-88-1332; FR-2170]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Section 8 Housing Vouchers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final rule establishes permanent regulations forthe Housing Voucher Program, and makes conforming changes in other relatedHUD regulations. The purpose of the Housing Voucher Program is to assisteligible families to pay rent for decent, safe, and sanitary housing. TheHousing Voucher Program has been administered as a demonstration programby publication of program requirements in Notices of Funding Availability(NOFA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>Under section 7(o)(3) of the Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (35 U.S.C. 3535(o)(3)), this final rule cannotbecome effective until after the first period of 30 calendar days of continuoussession of Congress which occurs after the date of the rule's publication.HUD will publish a notice of the effective date of this rule followingexpiration of the session-day waiting period. Whether or not the statutorywaiting period has expired, this rule will not become effective until HUD'sseparate notice is published announcing a specific effective date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Gerald Benoit, Director, HousingVoucher Division, Room 6122, Department of Housing and Urban Development,451 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20410, telephone (202) 755-6477.(This is not a toll-free telephone number.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Statement</ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for review underthe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 and have been assigned OMB controlnumbers: 2502-0123; 2502-0154; 2502-0161; 2502-0185; 2502-0348; 2502-0350;2577-0067; and 2577-0083. Public reporting burden for each of these collectionsof information is estimated to include the time for reviewing the instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Informationon the estimated public reporting burden is provided under the preambleheading, <T3>Other Matters.</T3> Send comments regarding these burden estimatesor any other aspect of these collections of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street SW., Room 10276, Washington, DC20410; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>The Housing Voucher Program is authorized under section 8(o) of the UnitedStates Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1347f(o)), which was added by section207 of the Housing and Urban-Rural Recovery Act of 1983. The Departmenthas implemented the Housing Voucher Program, which the authorizing legislationcharacterized as a demonstration program, by publishing Notices of FundingAvailability. (See the <T4>Federal Register</T4> issues of July 12, 1984, 49 FR 28458; February28, 1985, 50 FR 8196; March 31, 1986, 51 FR 10932; December 30, 1986, 51FR 47064; February 19, 1987, 52 FR 5250; and March 23, 1988, 53 FR 9572.)The Department published an advance notice of proposed rulemaking (49 FR28413, July 12, 1984) with the first NOFA. This document advised the publicthat: If the demonstration became permanent, the Department might use theNOFA as the basis for rulemaking; the period for public comment, accordingly,might be abbreviated; and commenters should take the potential for rulemakinginto account in commenting on the NOFA. In addition to the July 12, 1984,NOFA, the NOFAs published on May 8, 1985, and March 31, 1986 (the principalNOFAs for fiscal years 1985 and 1986, respectively), also sought publiccomment and indicated that they might be the basis for rulemaking. TheNOFA for fiscal year 1987, published in February 19, 1987, advised thepublic (52 FR at 5251) that the Department would be publishing a proposedrule that would be based on that NOFA, and would provide a 30-day publiccomment period. On August 14, 1987, the Department published a proposedrule at 52 FR 30388, which sought public comment on the policies containedin the February 19, 1987 NOFA, as modified by the proposed rule. The latestNOFA was published on March 23, 1988, at 53 FR 9572. That NOFA continuedthe policies of the February 19, 1987 NOFA with modifications to implementcertain provisions of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987(Pub. L. 100-242, approved February 5, 1988) (the HCD Act of 1987) andthe Department of Housing and Urban Development-Independent Agencies AppropriationsAct, 1988 (section 1(f) of Pub. L. 100-202, approved December 22, 1987).This final rule codifies the Housing Voucher Program regulations at Part887 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.<ITAG tagnum="84">Organization of this Rule</ITAG>The NOFAs under which the Housing Voucher Program operated, in additionto setting out program requirements that were unique to the Housing VoucherProgram, in general incorporated by cross-reference from the CertificateProgram regulations in Part 882, Subparts A and B, of Title 24 of the Codeof Federal Regulations, requirements that were common to the two Programs.Part 887 added by this final rule is self-contained, and therefore doesnot incorporate by cross-reference provisions contained in the CertificateProgram regulations. It still, however, establishes wherever practicablepolicies that are common to the Certificate Program and are based on thoseprovisions cross-referenced by the NOFAs.The Department has organized Part 887 in a manner that should be easierfor the public to use than current Certificate Program regulations. Subpartshave been used to group related sections. In particular, Subpart J containsthe additional or modified requirements that apply to certain special housingtypes. (In the current Certificate Program regulations, these provisionsare scattered throughout the rule.) The rule also has been divided intomore sections so that the table of contents will be a better finding aid.The Department intends to revise the Certificate Program regulations tofollow the organization of this rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Response to Public Comments and Discussion of Rule Changes</ITAG>There follows a discussion of the public comments received in responseto the August 1987 proposed rule and of the substantive changes in thefinal rule. References to NOFA provisions, unless otherwise noted, areto the February 19, 1987 NOFA (52 FR 5250).The Department received 282 public comments in response to the August 14,1987 proposed rule. In addition (although they were not solicited) theDepartment received 13 public comments in direct response to the February1987 NOFA. These public comments have been placed in the Department's publicdocket for this rulemaking and have been treated as responses to the proposedrule. The Department has previously solicited and received public commentsin response to the NOFAs published on July 12, 1984 (38 comments), May8, 1985 (10 comments), and March 31, 1986 (6 comments), (the principalNOFAs for fiscal years 1984, 1985, and 1986, respectively). The commentsreceived in response to the July 12, 1984 NOFA were addressed in the preambleto the May 8, 1985 NOFA (see 50 FR 19487-19480).1. Adequacy of rulemakingSeveral commenters believed that the Department did not provide an adequateopportunity for comment because it used a NOFA to set out its policies,and urged HUD to return to the established, collegial procedures of proposedand final rules. Another commenter was concerned that the use of NOFAsinstead of regulations to implement the Housing Voucher Program may havecaused some PHAs to overlook some or all of the NOFAs issued after thePHAs received their funding and urged that Housing Voucher Program rulechanges be handled through the normal rulemaking process. One commenterargued that complete rule text for the Housing Voucher Program should havebeen provided in the proposed rule.Several of the comments concerning the adequacy of rulemaking were concernedwith the opportunity to comment on particular issues rather the adequacyof the overall process. One commenter argued that HUD should not make aradical change in the Rental Rehabilitation Program without explicitlystating the intended change through a formal publication permitting timelypublic comment. Other commenters believed that the proposed rule did notadequately address the issue of economic displacement and thereby deniedthe public the opportunity to comment on this matter.By seeking comment on the February 1987, NOFA, the Department was givinginterested parties fair opportunity to comment on the policies it proposedto implement in the final rule. The February 1987 NOFA was the operativedocument for the Housing Voucher Program, hence many commenters would beable to comment based on actual experience. Proposed changes in policywere clearly identified in Part II.B.2., Anticipated Changes in the HousingVoucher Program, of the February NOFA and the one, albeit significant,additional proposed change was discussed in the proposed rule itself. TheDepartment is as desirous as many of the public commenters to have theHousing Voucher Program regulations codified in the Code of Federal Regulations,but to have delayed seeking public comment until rule text had been developedwould have only further delayed the development of effective regulations.The only changes to the Rental Rehabilitation Program involved in thisrulemaking concern the connection between that Program and the HousingVoucher Program. It is clear from the amount and detail of the public commentaddressed to this issue that the public has had a fair opportunity to commenton these issues.Several commenters urged that the Program continue to be implemented throughNOFAs. These commenters generally had objections to the concept of theHousing Voucher Program, preferring the Certificate Program concept. Theybelieved that further study of the Program should be undertaken. One ofthese commenters noted that the report on the Housing Voucher Program developedfor HUD by Abt Associates, Inc. states that it is the first in a series,is preliminary, and covers the first year's experience.The Department believes that codified regulations are beneficial both tothe program participants and to the Department. Any changes in policy thatmay be developed through further study of the Program can be implementedthrough rulemaking.2. The Linkage between the Housing Voucher Program and the Rental RehabilitationProgram<ITAG tagnum="81">Description of Current and Proposed Policies</ITAG>The Department's proposal to ``decouple'' the Rental Rehabilitation Programand the Housing Voucher Program elicited the most public response, mostof it opposed to any change in the policies in effect under the February1987 NOFA. In brief, the Department under the February 1987 NOFA provideda special allocation of housing vouchers to PHAs participating in the RentalRehabilitation Program. The PHA was to issue these housing vouchers (orcertificates) to eligible families that would be displaced by rental rehabilitationactivities (which included eligible families that would pay more than 30%of their income as rent after rehabilitation) or to families on a PHA'swaiting list who agreed to move initially into a rental rehabilitationproject. This ``targeting,'' however, was limited to a number equivalentto the number of housing vouchers or certificates that were allocated beforeFY 1987 to the PHA for use in connection with the Rental RehabilitationProgram. The Department proposed to revise these policies to require aPHA to issue housing vouchers that were allocated specifically for rentalrehabilitation purposes only to eligible families that are displaced froma rental rehabilitation project by physical rehabilitation activities.Under this proposal, housing vouchers could be used for eligible familiesthat would have to pay more than 30% of their income as rent after rehabilitation,but would not be required to be so used. The PHA could not require, asa condition to receiving a housing voucher, that the family agree to moveinitially into a rental rehabilitation project. The proposed rule notedthat ``economic displacement'' would be addressed in the final rule thenbeing developed to implement statutory tenant selection preferences.The ``preference rule'' was published on January 15, 1988, at 53 FR 1152.It took effect on March 4, 1988, and required PHAs and owners to implementits provisions by July 13, 1988. That rule implemented certain statutoryprovisions, applicable to HUD's various rental assistance programs, whichrequire that, in selecting applicants for housing assistance, preferencebe given to families who occupy substandard housing, are involuntarilydisplaced, or are paying more than 50 percent of their income for rent.The preference rule did not contain implementing rule text for the HousingVoucher Program because this Housing Voucher final rule had not been published.The preference rule, however, amended certain Certificate Program regulations,which are incorporated by reference in the Housing Voucher Program NOFAs.The preference rule also contained a detailed preamble discussion of theeffect of these Federal preferences on the Housing Voucher Program, inthe context of the policies proposed in the February 1987 NOFA and theHousing Voucher proposed rule (see 53 FR 1123 and 1124). In particular,the preamble discussed the effect of the Federal preferences on those rentalrehabilitation families who, under the Housing Voucher proposed rule, wouldno longer be provided housing vouchers from those housing vouchers allocatedfor use in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program, namely, rentalrehabilitation families whose rents would be increased as a result of therental rehabilitation activities. These families could meet a Federal preferencefor assistance from a PHA's waiting list if the families were paying morethan 50 percent of their income for rent or if they were living in substandardhousing. PHAs are permitted to adopt a local preference to allow rentalrehabilitation families who qualify for a Federal preference to be selectedbefore other preference-eligible families. Generally, in order to qualifyfor a Federal preference based on rent burden, a family must be payingmore than 50 percent of its income when the assistance is offered. Thepreference rule provides that a rental rehabilitation family will be consideredto be paying more than 50 percent of its income for rent if it has beennotified that following completion of rental rehabilitation its rent willbe increased, and it in fact would be required, no later than 60 days fromthe date the family is issued a certificate (or housing voucher), to paymore than 50 percent of its income for rent. Further, the preference rulepermits applicants without Federal preference to receive housing assistanceahead of applicants with a Federal preference provided that the numberof families so admitted does not exceed 10 percent of the families thatare initially admitted under the convered program. The preference rulepreamble also noted that a PHA thus has the discretion to create a localselection preference for rental rehabilitation families whose rents exceed30 percent, but not more than 50 percent, of their income.The HCD Act of 1987, approved February 5, 1988, made several statutoryamendments affecting the relationship between the Housing Voucher Programand the Rental Rehabilitation Program.Section 143(a)(2) of the HCD Act of 1987 struck section 8(o)(4) of the1983 Act, which required that HUD use substantially all housing voucherauthority for families residing in dwellings to be rehabilitated with assistanceunder the Rental Rehabilitation Program and for families displaced as aresult of rental rehabilitation assisted under that program or under section533 of the Housing Act of 1949.Section 149 of the HCD Act of 1987 added a new subsection (u) to section8 of the 1937 Act, which reads as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">(u) In the case of lower income families living in rental projectsrehabilitated under section 17 of this Act or section 533 of the HousingAct of 1949 before rehabilitation_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Certificates or vouchers under this section shall be made [available]for families who are required to move out of their units because of thephysical rehabilitation activities or because of overcrowding; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) At the discretion of each public housing agency or other agencyadministering the allocation of assistance, certificates or vouchers underthis section may be made [available] for families who would have to paymore than 30 percent of their adjusted income for rent after rehabilitationwhether they choose to remain in, or move from, the project.</ITAG>In addition, the HUD-Independent Agencies Fisal Year 1988 AppropriationAct, Pub. L. 100-202, approved December 22, 1987 provides: ``[O]f thatportion of such [Housing Voucher Program] budget authority to be used toachieve a net increase in the number of dwelling units for assisted families,highest priority shall be given to assisting families who are involuntarilydisplaced, or who are or would be displaced in consequence of increasedrents, as a result of rental rehabilitation program activities.'' To implement these statutory amendments, the March 1988 NOFA containedprogram requirements for use of housing vouchers in connection with theRental Rehabilitation Program that differed from the proposed requirementsdiscussed above. Under the March 1988 NOFA, there was no special allocation of housing vouchersfor use in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program. Instead,a PHA was required to issue a housing voucher or certificate to any eligibleapplicant family that was forced to vacate a unit because of physical construction,housing overcrowding, or a change in use of the unit, or (to implementHUD's FY1988 Appropriations Act) whose rent would exceed 50 percent ofits adjusted income, as a result of rental rehabilitation activities (sectionIII.I.(e)(1)(i)). HUD provided an additional housing voucher allocationto a PHA, if necessary, to ensure that PHAs met the obligation describedin this paragraph (section III.D.(b)(3)). The PHA also, in its discretion, could have preferred eligible familieswhose rent would exceed 30 percent, but would not exceed 50 percent, oftheir income as a result of rental rehabilitation activities (section III.I.(1)(ii)).The March 1988 NOFA also placed PHAs on notice that, when they implementthe Federal preferences under their certificate programs, they must alsoimplement the same Federal preferences under their housing voucher programs(section III.I.(d)(1)). This final rule's provisions with respect to providing housing vouchersfor rental rehabilitation families are similar to the March 1988 NOFA requirements(see andSection; 887.155(b) (1) and (2)). It should be noted, however, thatthere is no requirement in andSection; 887.15(b) to issue a housing voucherto a family whose rent would exceed 50 percent of its adjusted income asa result of rental rehabilitation activities. That provision in sectionIII.I.(e)(1)(i) of the March 1988 NOFA implemented the ``highest priority''requirement in HUD's fiscal year 1988 Appropriation Act. Because the highestpriority requirement applies only to fiscal year 1988 authority, it hasnot been included in this rule. Rather, andSection; 887.155(b) implementssection 8(u) of the 1937 Act. The recently-enacted HUD-Independent Agencies Fiscal Year 1989 AppropriationAct, Pub. L. 100-404, approved August 19, 1988, contains the followingproviso concerning the use of housing voucher assistance for families affectedby Rental Rehabilitation Program activities:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Provided further, </T3>That of that portion of such budget authorityunder section 8(o) to be used to achieve a net increase in the number ofdwelling units for assisted families, highest priority shall be given toassisting families who as a result of rental rehabilitation actions areinvoluntarily displaced or who are or would be displaced in consequenceof increased rents (wherever the level of such rents exceeds 35 percentof adjusted income of such families, as defined in the regulations promulgatedby the Department of Housing and Urban Development) * * *</ITAG>The Department will provide additional guidance, through <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice, with respect to the obligations imposedby appropriations Acts. Because there has been a history of appropriationsAct requirements in this area, andSection; 887.155(b)(3) expressly providesthat HUD will publish, by <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice, modifications to these policies thatmay be needed to implement any additional requirements imposed throughappropriations Acts. The following discussion of the rental rehabilitation issues raised bythe public commenters takes into account the intervening statutory amendmentsdiscussed above. The Department believes it is appropriate to reiterate the design and purposeof both programs and to discuss how these programs can be used to complementone another. The strength of the rental rehabilitation initiative derivesfrom the separation of tenant and rehabilitation subsidies and the factthat the market feasibility of rehabilitated properties does not dependupon project-based assistance. The purpose of the Rental RehabilitationProgram is to provide affordable standard rental housing for lower incomefamilies, and to increase the availability of housing units for considerationby housing voucher holders and certificate holders. The Housing VoucherProgram, like the Certificate Program, is intended to provide tenant-basedassistance (assistance that follows the family if it moves) so that theeligible family can afford standard housing. The Department believes that the Rental Rehabilitation Program is a suitablehousing production activity for increasing the supply of housing availableto families with housing vouchers or certificates. It is also HUD's beliefthat the Rental Rehabilitation Program and the tenant-based housing assistanceprograms can be most effective if local agencies have the flexibility touse these program resources to meet local priorities and housing objectives.This final rule gives PHAs the maximum flexibility authorized by the HCDAct of 1987 for administering housing assistance at the local level. This final rule requires PHAs to provide either a housing voucher or certificateto any family living in a rental rehabilitation property that is requiredto move because of construction, change in the use of the unit, or becausethe family is living in an overcrowded unit (andSection; 887.155(b)(1)).PHAs have the discretion to provide a housing voucher or certificate tofamilies, living in rental rehabilitation projects and who apply for placementon the PHA's waiting list, that would have a rent burden greater than 30percent of income after rehabilitation is completed (andSection; 887.155(b)(2)).We expect that the preferences used by a PHA for selecting families fromits waiting list will minimize any economic hardship on families that sufferan increase in rent as a result of rental rehabilitation. We do not believe it appropriate for HUD to dictate a community's prioritiesin the use of its housing resources; it is more appropriate that this decisionbe made at the local level. PHAs, rather than HUD, are in a much betterposition to decide whether a family that is living in a completed rentalrehabilitation unit is more needy than a family living in substandard housing.<ITAG tagnum="81">Concerns about Displacement and Continued Workability of Rental RehabilitationProgram </ITAG>The predominant concern raised by the public commenters was that the changesproposed in the use of housing vouchers in connection with the Rental RehabilitationProgram would make that Program unworkable. Many commenters noted thatthe Rental Rehabilitation Program was based on a ``split subsidy'' concept,namely, a modest Rental Rehabilitation grant to assist the owner in rehabilitatingthe project and a rent subsidy, either housing vouchers or certificates,to assist eligible families to continue to live in or move from the rehabilitatedproject. The commenters stated that with no assurance of housing vouchersfor eligible families who would continue to occupy the projects, ownerswould no longer participate in the Rental Rehabilitation Program or, ifthey did, would only rehabilitate vacant projects in order to avoid theeconomic, social, and political problems caused by displacement. The commenters pointed out that, historically, 60 percent of the post-rehabilitationtenants received housing vouchers or certificates, but only three percentof the housing vouchers and certificates used in connection with the RentalRehabilitation Program have been used to assist families that were displaced.Several commenters that were rental rehabilitation grantees noted thatthey would not approve a project if families would be displaced and havetraditionally relied on housing vouchers and certificates to prevent displacement;other grantees indicated that their rate of displacement was below threepercent. They also stated that because the rental rehabilitation grantis modest and there are no rent restrictions, the majority of eligiblefamilies living in rental rehabilitation projects could not afford theafter-rehabilitation rents without housing vouchers or certificates. Withouthousing vouchers for families who seek to remain in place and for familieswho want to move into a rental rehabilitation project, the commenters believedit would be increasingly difficult for rental rehabilitation grantees tocomply with the low income benefit requirements in andSection; 511.10(a).Several commenters contended that lack of housing vouchers for rental rehabilitationfamilies who seek to remain in place may cause opponents of the RentalRehabilitation Program to seek the imposition of rent controls on the projector the use of project-based subsidies, and would also prevent owners fromrenting rehabilitated units to the families that most needed the housing.The Department believes that by requiring assistance to displacees, byencouraging local cooperation and development of priorities, and by givingPHA's the discretion to choose among Federal preference holders, as wellas the discretion to serve non-Federal preference holders, the issues raisedby these commenters can be handled at the local level. We believe thatcommunities operating both rental rehabilitation programs and housing voucherprograms must, in fact, operate in concert in order to achieve their housingobjectives. ``Rent controls'' on rental rehabilitation projects are statutorily prohibited.The Department believes the market should dictate the rents. If the ownerwere to set the rents too high compared to the market, the occupants wouldmove out to find cheaper units. However, if the owner's rents are reasonablein relation to other units in the neighborhood, then the occupants arelikely to stay, even if rents are slightly higher, and other lower incomefamilies will seek out the vacant units.Based on the demographics of rental rehabilitation projects, some commentersstated that the policies in the proposed rule, had they been in effect,would have caused the displacement of most of the families currently livingin rental rehabilitation projects with Section 8 assistance. Such displacementwould not only be ``senseless and unnecessary,'' it would be inconsistentwith HUD policy contained in 24 CFR 511.1 and 511.40, both of which providethat the most important of the uses of housing vouchers and certificatesallocated in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program is to minimizedisplacement. The Department does not agree with these commenters' conjecture as to theeffect the current policies would have had on the Rental RehabilitationProgram, if they had been in effect in previous years. First, housing vouchersremain available, at the PHA's discretion, for economically burdened rentalrehabilitation families. Second, we are not aware of any family livingin a rental rehabilitation project that was physically displaced or hada post-rehabilitation rent burden greater than 50 percent of income andwas not issued a housing voucher or certificate. The commenters believed that, faced with this potential for displacement,owners would not rehabilitate occupied projects for several reasons: anunwillingness to displace families both on principle and because it ispolitically unacceptable, a reluctance to assume the costs of relocation,and concern over renting the vacated units. Rental rehabilitation grantees,the commenters asserted, would be faced with the unenviable choice of denyingapplications or risking economic displacement of tenants. They also notedthat under section 17(b)(2)(F) of the 1937 Act and andSection; 511.10(h)(1)(i),a structure may be assisted under the Rental Rehabilitation Program onlyif the rehabilitation will not cause the involuntary displacement of verylow-income families by families who are not very low-income. Therefore,many otherwise desirable occupied projects would be statutorily ineligiblefor the Rental Rehabilitation Program. The owners that chose to remainin the Rental Rehabilitation Program, they believed, would be compelledto rehabilitate vacant buildings, which, the commenters noted, is morecostly because vacant buildings are generally in more deteriorated conditionand are more subject to vandalism than are occupied projects. Decoupling of the rental rehabilitation and housing voucher program wouldnot make rental rehabilitation unworkable. It is important that granteesand owners work closely with the PHA and keep the PHA informed of rehabilitationschedules and completion dates. PHAs, on the other hand, are required toprovide housing vouchers to families that are physically displaced andmust advise housing voucher holders and certificate holders of any vacantrental rehabilitation units that are available or about to become availableso that the families can consider these units. PHAs are also encouragedto provide housing vouchers or certificates to families living in rentalrehabilitation properties that meet the 50 percent of income Federal preferencefor rent burden. PHAs may make up to 10 percent of their housing vouchersavailable to occupants of rental rehabilitation that do not have a 50 percentrent burden after taking into account the housing needs and urgency ofother Federal preference holders. One commenter also believed that the policies in the proposed rule wouldnot support the intent of section 17(a)(2) of the 1937 Act, which listssupporting a rental rehabilitation grantee's program as one of the purposesfor which HUD may reserve housing vouchers in connection with the RentalRehabilitation Program. The commenters were concerned about the costs andeffects of displacement, which they believed would result if occupied unitswere rehabilitated in the future. Among the concerns were the possibilityof causing overcrowding (which may entail adding another criterion forselecting rental rehabilitation projects), exacerbating homelessness, andcausing jurisdictions to use CDBG funds to cover the cost of relocationrather than for other purposes. It is and continues to be this Department's policy to minimize displacementunder the Rental Rehabilitation Program. Section 17(a)(2)(B) of the 1937Act permits the Secretary to ``reserve housing assistance'' for personsdisplaced by rental rehabilitation and to support the grantee's program.As mentioned earlier, HUD requires that certificates and housing vouchersbe provided to persons that are displaced by rental rehabilitation. Furthermore,housing voucher funds are allocated on a formula basis and more than 75percent of all housing vouchers and certificates ever appropriated by Congresshave been provided to cities participating in the Rental RehabilitationProgram. Again, we emphasize that we have provided and will continue to providehousing resources to the local PHA. The PHA has a considerable amount offlexibility to accommodate assistance to families that would be adverselyaffected by rental rehabilitation activities. We cannot overemphasize theneed for grantees and owners to work closely with the local PHA. Our experienceindicates the more coordination and communication that takes place betweenthe three parties throughout the rehabilitation process, the higher thelikelihood of success of both programs working in a complementary manner.Many commenters questioned why HUD was proposing decoupling when the RentalRehabilitation Program with the current linkage to the Housing VoucherProgram is working well. They referred to the Department's own evaluationof the Rental Rehabilitation Program as evidence of that Program's success.While acknowledging that HUD may have had concern with the slowness ofleaseup of housing vouchers that may have been caused by using the housingvouchers in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program, the commentersbelieved that this problem has been corrected through permitting the immediateuse of housing vouchers for general Housing Voucher Program purposes ifthe PHA can ensure that housing vouchers or certificates will be availableas needed for rental rehabilitation purposes, and, in any event, increasingthe rate of leaseup of housing vouchers should not be done at the expenseof the Rental Rehabilitation Program. One commenter asserted that it wasfinancially irresponsible for HUD to assist the rehabilitation of a projectand then not provide the rental subsidy necessary to keep the project occupied.The February 1987 NOFA was the first step in decoupling the two programsand has been working well. It is our belief that the policies in this finalrule will result in additional improvements and will make both programswork better. PHAs are provided the flexibility and decisionmaking authorityto balance the use of housing vouchers for families in rental rehabilitationproperties with other housing needs in the community. PHAs, not HUD, arein the best position to make this local determination. Nationwide, there are more than 750,000 housing vouchers and certificatesunder contract with PHAs in communities participating in the Rental RehabilitationProgram. Assuming a modest turnover rate of 10 percent, <T3>i.e., </T3>the percentage of families that turn in their housing assistanceeach year, the participating PHAs have access to more than 75,000 housingvouchers or certificates without counting any new appropriations. One commenter questioned what benefit HUD thought would be derived fromthe proposed changes. If increasing the rate of leaseup is HUD's objective,then HUD, in one commenter's opinion, should increase its allocation offreestanding housing vouchers and decrease the allocation of rental rehabilitationhousing vouchers, but should not change the policies as proposed. Anothercommenter noted that decoupling would not result in any significant costsavings to HUD because the housing vouchers would just be used in the freestandingportion of the Housing Voucher Program. The new policy eliminates the unnecessary burdens associated with the developmentof interim use agreements, tracking on a funding increment basis the numberof housing vouchers or certificates used on an ``interim use'' or ``immediateuse'' basis, and tracking ``pay-backs'' to assure that the terms of localagreements have been met. All of these unnecessary, time-consuming, administrativecontrols have been eliminated, and PHAs will have more time and more flexibilityto work with grantees to meet local housing needs and objectives.<ITAG tagnum="81">Reliance on Preference Rule for Economic Displacement Issues   </ITAG>Many commenters objected to the Department's proposal to rely on the thenforthcoming ``preference'' rule to address the issue of ``economic displacement'',namely, assistance for families whose rent would increase as a result ofrehabilitation. The commenters contended that by relying on the developmentof the preference rule, HUD provided little immediate direction to PHAson this issue. They further believed that, although the statutory preferenceswould apply to many rental rehabilitation families, these families wouldnot have any reasonable guarantee of a housing voucher. They noted thatin jurisdictions with very long waiting lists for Section 8 assistance,even receiving a preference may be of little practical help in avoidingdisplacement, and also pointed out that the waiting lists might be closed.They were also concerned that a rental rehabilitation family might haveto be displaced or move into substandard housing to qualify for a preference. The preference rule was designed to ensure that the majority of HUD assistancewould be provided to the most needy families as required by law_familiesinvoluntarily displaced, families living in substandard housing, or familiespaying more than 50 percent of income for rent. This final rule permitsPHAs to provide a higher preference to the rental rehabilitation familiesthat meet the Federal preferences than to other Federal preference holders.This rule also requires PHAs to allow rental rehabilitation families thatmeet the Federal preferences to be placed on the waiting list even if thePHA's waiting list is closed.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Briefing Packet</ITAG>A commenter stressed the importance of including information on local rentalrehabilitation projects in the briefing packet, particularly in soft housingmarkets, because of the owner's responsibility to offer the units to lowerincome families for up to seven years. (The commenter's description ofthe owner's responsibility is not accurate. A rental rehabilitation ownerhas a duty, extending for seven years, to affirmatively market vacant unitsto attract eligible persons from all racial, ethnic, and gender groups(andSection; 511.10(m)(2)). The owner must also agree, for at least a ten-yearperiod, not to discriminate against a prospective tenant on the basis ofthe tenant's receipt of, or eligibility for, housing assistance (andSection;511.10(j)). Two commenters, however, objected to including this informationin the briefing packet. One commenter indicated that it kept a master listof all units known to be available. It instructs families on the use ofthis list. This commenter believed that it would be an unnecessary expenseto separate out rental rehabilitation projects.  It is very important that PHAs provide a list of completed rental rehabilitationprojects with available units to families at the time they are issued ahousing voucher or certificate and begin their housing search. We believethat the minimal amount of work required to keep the rental rehabilitationlist up to date is more than offset by all of the other administrativeburdens that this rule eliminates.  <ITAG tagnum="81">Targeting Housing Vouchers to Rental Rehabilitation Vacancies andRelated Issues   </ITAG>A number of commenters specifically objected to the proposed eliminationof a PHA's authority to target housing vouchers to families on its waitinglist who agree to move initially into a rental rehabilitation project (targeting-in).(PHAs, under the February 1987 NOFA, retained authority to target-in housingvouchers, limited to a number of housing vouchers equal to the number ofhousing vouchers allocated to it before fiscal year 1987 for use in connectionwith the Rental Rehabilitation Program.) One commenter found these provisionsto be confusing.  A commenter urged that PHAs should be given discretionary authority totarget-in turnover housing vouchers or certificates to fill vacancies ina rental rehabilitation project. This commenter believed that such discretionaryauthority was particularly necessary in a soft housing market.  As with the policy, discussed above, concerning tenants residing in rentalrehabilitation projects, the restriction on targeting-in was also criticizedas discouraging owner participation in the Rental Rehabilitation Program.Many commenters believed that the limitation on, or elimination of, targeting-inhinders rental rehabilitation owners' ability to lease their units, particularlywith respect to vacant buildings that have been rehabilitated. The commentersbelieved that without targeting-in it would be difficult or impossibleto meet the low income benefit requirements in andSection; 511.10(a). Onthe other hand, two commenters recommended eliminating targeting-in altogether.One commenter made this recommendation because it found it to be administrativelydifficult to contact hundreds of families on the waiting list to fill vacantunits. The other commenter stated that targeting-in was one of the policiesthat caused difficulty and ill will when the PHA attempts to explain itto families on the waiting list.  The final rule does not permit PHAs to condition the initial use of a housingvoucher for a vacant rental rehabilitation unit. This targeting-in procedureis contrary to the ``finders-keepers'' concept of the Housing Voucher Programand is administratively cumbersome for PHAs. Under the ``finders-keepers'' concept housing voucher and certificate holdersare responsible for finding the units they will lease. The freedom to choosetheir own units in the rental market is a key feature of the Housing Voucherand Certificate Programs, which places the housing voucher or certificateholder in a position comparable to other families in the unsubsidized rentalmarket. Targeting-in restricted the family's initial choice of dwellingunit to a specific project. It targeting-in were to be applied, it wouldoverride the PHA's tenant selection policies and preferences solely onthe basis of a family's willingness or unwillingness to move into a specificunit, which has no connection to a family's need for housing assistance. Owners should not be relying on a ``guarantee'' of rental income from ahousing voucher or certificate holder in deciding whether or not to participatein the Rental Rehabilitation Program, nor should a grantee rely on housingvouchers or certificates to meet the lower income benefit requirement.Rather, the owner's decision should be based on market circumstances. The Department agrees with some of the commenters that targeting-in wascumbersome to administer and that it was difficult to track the numberof housing vouchers used for this purpose.  Two commenters argued that whenever a housing voucher was given to a familyresiding in a rental rehabilitation project, the family should be requiredto live in the project for one year. The Department does not agree. Underthis rule, as well as in the NOFAs, a rental rehabilitation family thatreceives a housing voucher has the same right to seek housing of the family'schoice as any other housing voucher holder. Another commenter believedthat in-place tenants should receive housing vouchers but that the ownersshould not be able to charge rent in excess of the fair market rent. Underthis rule, a rental rehabilitation family that receives a housing voucherand chooses to use it in-place is subject to the same rules as any otherhousing voucher family, including a non-rental rehabilitation family thatchooses to use its housing vouchers in-place. <ITAG tagnum="81">Immediate Use  </ITAG>Several comments concerned the ``immediate'' and ``interim'' use policies,which, when there was a separate allocation of housing vouchers in connectionwith the Rental Rehabilitation Program, permitted those housing vouchersto be used initially for general program purposes, provided they were ``paidback.'' A State housing development authority, which favored retainingthe then existing policies, noted that immediate use was already causingit problems because it is unable to return housing vouchers or certificatesthat were used on an immediate basis in one locality to the locality towhich they were initially allocated for rental rehabilitation purposes.Another commenter believed that discretionary authority to use housingvouchers for rental rehabilitation purposes was preferable to immediateuse because under immediate use PHAs, particularly statewide PHAs, maybe reluctant to use the housing vouchers immediately because of concernthat no housing voucher or certificate would be available when needed forrental rehabilitation purposes.  Several commenters preferred to have less restrictive immediate use rules.They noted that in the past PHAs only had to consult with the local rentalrehabilitation program administrator as to schedules and ensure that housingvouchers and certificates would be available when necessary. They believedthat formal written agreements on interim use unnecessarily complicatethe process and slow the PHA's ability to expedite leasing.  Under this rule (and the March 1988 NOFA), PHAs are free to use all oftheir housing vouchers for general program purposes. PHAs, however, arealso subject to the requirement to issue housing vouchers to certain rentalrehabilitation families. There is no need to ``pay back'' housing vouchersunder these policies, since there is no separate rental rehabilitationallocation. While most housing vouchers issued under these policies havebeen used for general housing voucher purposes, our experience indicatesthat PHAs have done an excellent job in determining the number of housingvouchers or certificates that must be made available to meet the rentalrehabilitation schedule, and the Department is not aware of any need forhousing vouchers that PHAs have not been able to meet. <ITAG tagnum="81">Method of Allocation and Effect on Small PHAs</ITAG>Several commenters were opposed to HUD's proposal to continue allocatinghousing vouchers for use in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program.Some of these commenters were smaller rural PHAs that believed that therental rehabilitation-related allocation of housing vouchers either preventedthem from participating in the Housing Voucher Program or reduced theirshare of housing vouchers because they cannot participate in the RentalRehabilitation Program. Another commenter was a State housing authoritythat had no rental rehabilitation community within its borders.Several commenters criticized HUD's reduction of the ratio of housing vouchersallocated in connection with the Rental Rehabilitation Program from upto one housing voucher per $5,000 of rental rehabilitation grant moneyto up to one housing voucher per $7,500 of grant money. One commenter notedthat the national average cost of rehabilitation is $3,700 per unit, whichmeans that even with the 1/$5,000 ratio there would not be enough housingvouchers for every rehabilitated unit. A commenter noted that it made nosense to allocate housing vouchers on a ratio to rental rehabilitationgrant amounts if the housing vouchers, for the most part, are not goingto be used in concert with the Rental Rehabilitation Program. Another commentermade a similar point that it was not necessary to allocate approximately50 percent of the housing vouchers for rental rehabilitation purposes when,historically, only three percent of the housing vouchers so allocated havebeen used for physical displacement. Several commenters cited the lengthof their waiting lists as the reason for wanting the higher ratio.In fiscal year 1988, the Department changed the method for allocating housingvoucher funds. HUD discontinued making a separate allocation of housingvouchers on a ratio of one housing voucher for each $7,500 of rental rehabilitationgrants. Instead, housing voucher funds were allocated to HUD Regional andField Offices on a formula basis which took into account housing need andcosts. The extent to which the PHA had housing vouchers or certificatesavailable for use by rental rehabilitation families was taken into considerationby Field Offices in determining which PHAs would be invited to submit applications.If the PHA did not have sufficient housing vouchers, including turnoverhousing vouchers and certificates from the PHA's total program, to enablethe PHA to comply with its obligations with respect to rental rehabilitationfamilies (see Part III.I.(e)(1)(i) of the March 1988 NOFA), then additionalhousing vouchers were provided to the affected PHA.As a result of these changes more housing vouchers were available for allocationto small PHAs that were not located in a jurisdiction of a rental rehabilitationgrantee. HUD plans to use a similar procedure in fiscal year 1989.One commenter thought that the per-unit grant amount limit in the RentalRehabilitation Program should also be raised from $5,000 to $7,500. Whilethis comment is outside the scope of this rulemaking, the Department notesthat it has published an interim rule (53 FR 25462, July 6, 1988), whichimplemented certain statutory amendments to the Rental Rehabilitation Program.That rule revised 24 CFR 511.10(e)(2) to establish a sliding scale forper-unit grant amount limits. The scale runs from $5,000 for a no bedroomunit to $8,500 for a three more bedroom unit. This change in the RentalRehabilitation Program rules will also make it easier for grantees to rehabilitatevacant units, which generally require more substantial rehabilitation,but which do not have any potential for displacement. These newly standardunits would then be available to housing voucher and certificate holdersseeking units on the open market.]One commenter contended that rental rehabilitation families must receivea housing voucher to remain in a rental rehabilitation project becauseHUD's use of the Fair Market Rent as the standard for what is ``affordable''is unrealistic. This commenter noted that a family in its jurisdictionwould have to have an annual adjusted income of $20,000 to ``afford'' rentequal to the two-bedroom FMR ($500), but the average annual income in itsjurisdiction for a two-bedroom family was under $5,000. Local situations,such as those referred to by this commenter, are clearly relevant mattersfor a PHA to consider in determining the extent to which the PHA will exerciseits discretionary authority to issue housing vouchers or certificates toeligible families whose post-rehabilitation rent would exceed 30 percentof their adjusted income.A commenter suggested that since housing vouchers used in connection withthe Rental Rehabilitation Program were being folded into the regular HousingVoucher Program, the Rental Rehabilitation Program should be folded intoCDBG Program. The Rental Rehabilitation Program is not a component of theCDBG Program, but has a separate statutory authority; the commenter's suggestiontherfore is not analogous to the revisions made in the Housing VoucherProgram by this rule.3. Comments Relating to the Housing Voucher Program Itself<ITAG tagnum="81">Payment Standard_Affordability and Related Issues</ITAG>Several commenters found the adoption in the February 1987 NOFA of a singlepayment standard system to be a significant improvement (see section III.J.).One commenter, however, stated that the simplification did not work becausethe payment standard provisions were still not understandable. The Departmentis not aware of any significant difficulties that PHA are having in understandingthe payment standard provisions. Any individualized problems should bediscussed with the appropriate field office.This rule retains the concept of a single payment standard system (seeandSection; 887.351). The Department believes that the payment standard isunderstood by program participants.Several commenters objected to the limit of two affordability adjustmentswithin a five-year period (see section III.J.(e)(1)). Generally, thesecommenters recognized that the limitation was statutory, but urged thatthe statute be amended to permit annual adjustments. The limitation, theybelieved, jeopardized the continued affordability of housing for participants,particularly for large families and families whose incomes are lowest.They noted that the pending authorization Bill contained a provision forannual adjustments and urged HUD to support this amendment.Section 887.351(c) of this rule gives PHAs the discretion to make annualaffordability adjustments to the payment standard. This provision implementssection 143(b)(1) of the HCD Act of 1987, which amended section 8(o)(6)(A)(previously section 8(o)(7)(A)) of the United States Housing Act of 1937(1937 Act).A few commenters questioned why consultation with local government wasrequired when a PHA adjusted a payment standard (see section III.J.(f)).They believed it served little purpose other than to discourage a PHA frommaking an affordability adjustment. One commenter suggested that a PHAshould be able to seek, without local government consultation, HUD approvalto adjust the payment standard to the currently-published FMR. Anothercommenter recommended applying the Certificate Program annual adjustmentfactors.Section 887.351(c) does not require PHAs to consult with the public andunits of general local government before making affordability adjustments.Again this revision to previous policy implements a recent statutory amendment.Section 143(b)(2) of the HCD Act of 1987 struck section 8(o)(6)(D) (previouslysection 8(o)(7)(D)) of the 1937 Act, which had contained the consultationrequirement. It should also be noted that PHAs are not required to obtainHUD approval before adopting a new payment standard schedule, and havethe ability to determine the amount of the adjustment in the individualpayment standard amounts.Several commenters objected to the fact that an ACC is for a fixed amount(see section III.G.(d)). They argued that the amount of an ACC should beincreased over its five-year term to ensure that there is no decrease inthe number of families assisted. They believed that PHAs might be reluctantto make needed affordability adjustments because of their reluctance todecrease the number of families that can be assisted. A commenter suggestedthat there should be a floor on the payment standard, such as a requirementthat the PHA increase the payment standard when a specified percentageof assisted families are paying more than 30 percent of their income asrent. Another commenter noted that the application requires the PHA toState the bedroom mix and family type. This commenter questioned whetherPHAs had the flexibility to alter the mix to maintain financial feasibility;if not, then PHAs would have to stay within the ACC amount through attrition.Another commenter requested that the provision in the rule that statesthat a PHA may assist more families if there are available annual contributionsunder the ACC not needed for participating families should also expresslyprovide that a PHA may have to assist fewer families than originally indicatedin order to remain within the amount contracted for in the ACC.The amount contracted for, [in accordance with section 8(o)(6)(B) of the1937 Act, includes 15 percent in excess of what is estimated to be neededin the first year for each of the five years of the ACC. Based on the Department'sexperience with contract amendments under the Certificate Program thisshould provide enough funding to cover payment standard adjustments. PHAsmay alter the bedroom mix.A commenter believed that using the two-bedroom FMR to determine fund reservationunderestimates the amount actually needed based on the actual housing mix.The commenter also pointed out reserving funds based on the FMRs in effectat fund reservation but requiring that the initial payment standards bebased on the FMRs in effect at the time the ACC is executed results infurther loss in the number of units that may actually be assisted.The two-bedroom FMR is used by the HUD field office for fund allocationpurposes. It is not used to determine the actual amount of housing voucherbudget authority that is reserved for a PHA under an ACC. The field officedetermines that amount based on the PHA's proposed bedroom distributionand estimates of family income.A commenter believed that the five-year limit on the housing voucher ACCwould cause underutilization of the housing voucher authority in the lastyear of the ACC. This commenter believed that the PHA will not be ableto enter into housing voucher contracts during the last year of the ACCbecause PHAs are prohibited from signing such contracts with an owner forless than one year or for a period that extends beyond the ACC.Funding for a PHA's housing voucher program is derived from funding increments(``projects'') contractually committed by HUD for support of the PHA program.There is a separate ACC term for each funding increment. The initial termof the ACC for each funding increment is five years. Section 887.209(c)(2)(ii)provides that the term of the lease for a program family must begin ``atleast one year before the end of the term of the <T3>last funding increment under the ACC.'' </T3>(As used in this regulation,the term ``ACC'' refers to a consolidated ACC document which contains theseparate HUD funding commitments for successive funding increments forthe PHA housing voucher program.) Thus the requirement only applies withrespect to the most recent funding increment under the ACC at the timethe lease begins, and does not apply to earlier funding increments underthe ACC. The PHA may approve a lease, and may enter a voucher contractso long as there is at least one year left to run on the last funding incrementunder the ACC (even if there is less than one year left to run on one ormore earlier funding increments). Thus the regulatory limitation will nothave any practical effect on the family so long as the PHA continues toreceive new program funding increments and there is at least one year lefton the most recent increment. The prohibition on entering a lease unlessthere is a year left to run implements the statutory requirement prescribingthe minimum lease term in Section 8 Existing Housing, including the Section8 Housing Voucher Program. The lease between the tenant and owner mustbe for ``at least one year'' (unless the term of the assistance contractis shorter (section 8(d)(1)(B)(i) of the 1937 Act). Funding under the ACCis the source for assistance payments by the PHA to support the family'stenancy under the lease, and in particular to subsidize the family's tenancyduring the minimum one year lease term. For the same reason, the rule provides(andSection; 887.209(c)(2)(iii)) that the housing voucher contract and thelease shall end if the PHA determines (in accordance with procedures prescribedby HUD) that funding under the ACC is insufficient to support continuedassistance.<ITAG tagnum="81">Payment Standard Amount</ITAG>A commenter, referring to 24 CFR 882.106(a)(3), recommended that PHAs bepermitted to raise payment standards to the level of the exception rentsthat are approved by HUD under the Certificate Program for designated localities.The commenter believed that, under the NOFA, it could not set the paymentstandard above the applicable fair market rent (FMR).This commenter was mistaken. Both the NOFAs and this final rule allow thePHA to establish a payment standard amount based upon the applicable FMRor <T3>HUD-approved community-wide exception rent </T3>(see section III.J.(c)and andSection; 887.351). Community-wide exception rent means that the exceptionrent applies throughout the PHA's jurisdiction.A commenter noted that the FMR area within its jurisdiction was very largeand had several rental markets with rents varying by as much as $200 to$300. This commenter noted that participants in the lower rent areas receivean automatic reduction in the portion of their income spent for rent. Anothercommenter believed that PHAs should be allowed to set the payment standardamounts in a manner that would enable families to find modest but satisfactoryunits and suggested that the payment standard be permitted to range from80 percent to 100 percent of the FMR. The Department agrees that PHAs should have more flexibility to set thepayment standard and, in andSection;887.351(b)(2), has provided PHAs theauthority to adopt payment standard amounts that are not less than 80 percentof the applicable FMR or the HUD-approved community-wide exception rent.The rule continues to require that the PHA have one payment standard foreach bedroom size within a FMR area. Families who lease units in the lowerrent areas of a PHA's jurisdiction are simply using the shopper's incentive;they are getting less housing and paying less rent than if they rentedin more expensive areas. A commenter objected to HUD's proposal to conform the payment standardprovision for single room occupancy (SRO) to the provision for the SROFair Market Rent in the Certificate Program, namely, 75 percent of the0-bedroom FMR. Another commenter, however, noted that the SRO payment standardwas the only payment standard requiring HUD approval and recommended thatthe SRO payment standard should be set at 75 percent of the congregatepayment standard. Section 887.487(a) sets the payment standard for an SROunit at 75 percent of the 0-bedroom fair market rent or, if applicable,of the community-wide exception rent, which is comparable to how the SROFair Market Rent has been set in the Certificate and Moderate RehabilitationPrograms. Use of 100 percent of the 0-bedroom FMR is not appropriate becauseSROs normally are smaller and have fewer amenities than do efficiency units.The Department recognizes that local conditions may warrant a higher paymentstandard, and has provided a mechanism in andSection;887.487(b) for a PHAto seek HUD approval of a SRO payment standard based on a higher percentage,not to exceed 100 percent. <ITAG tagnum="81">Housing Vouchers versus Certificates </ITAG>A few commenters took issue with assertions in the February 1987 NOFA thatthe Housing Voucher Program is more cost beneficial than the CertificateProgram, citing the First Report on the Housing Voucher Program by AbtAssociates, Inc. Some commenters believed that the features of the twoprograms should be merged to develop a program that has the flexibilityof the Housing Voucher Program and the efficacy, equity, and effectivenessof the Certificate Program. The Abt Report cited by the commenters concerned early program administration.The Department still believes that with operational experience, includingmodifications made by this rule, the Housing Voucher Program will provemore cost beneficial than the Certificate Program. <ITAG tagnum="81">Targeting </ITAG>A commenter believed that PHAs should be given authority similar to theauthority that HUD had under section III.I.(e) to target housing vouchersto families living in certain projects. The Department has not adoptedthis suggestion. The special purposes for which housing vouchers may betargeted generally are based on activities identified in appropriationsacts or in accompanying Conference Committee report tables. Under the targetingprovisions the Department provides a PHA with additional housing voucherfunding to be used for a specified purpose. It was also recommended that the rule specify for each of the targetingcategories whether the PHA or HUD would administer the housing vouchers.The Department has not adopted this suggestion. First, all housing vouchercontracts have been administered by PHAs. Second, and more significantly,this rule provides a more general authority to target assistance than theNOFAs provided (see andSection;887.155(c)). Unlike the NOFAs, it does notlist each of the specific purposes under which housing vouchers may betargeted. As noted above the specific purposes are a product of the appropriationsprocess. They vary from year to year. It is not feasible to amend the ruleeach year to conform to the specific purposes that may be current. <ITAG tagnum="81">Administrative Fees </ITAG>There was a substantial amount of comment on the adequacy of administrativefees. In general, the commenters argued for an increase in the ongoingfee to at least the fee in the Certificate Program (7.65 percent of thetwo-bedroom FMR); some commenters urged that the fee for both programsbe revised back to 8.5 percent. These commenters took issue with HUD'searlier claim that the Housing Voucher Program should be less costly toadminister, contending that HUD has never provided any data which clearlysupports this assertion. They stated that their experience indicates thatthe administrative work in the two programs is comparable or, if anything,the Housing Voucher Program is more expensive to administer. They arguedthat administering two parrallel programs creates administrative complexities;the financial management and planning for the Housing Voucher Program wasdifficult, complex, and time consuming; and the NOFA, itself, requiresPHAs to ``[A]ssist a family in finding an apartment in circumstances where,because of age, handicap, large family size or other reasons, it is unableto locate an approvable unit.'' Section 144 of the HCD Act of 1987 added a new section 8(q), which establishesadministrative fee requirements for both the Housing Voucher Program andthe Certificate Program. Section 8(q)(1) requires the Secretary to establisha monthly fee (ongoing fee) equal to 8.2 percent of the two-bedroom fairmarket rent and authorizes the Secretary to increase the fee if necessaryto reflect higher costs of administering small programs and programs operatingover large geographic areas. Section 8(q)(2)(A) requires the Secretaryto establish reasonable fees for (1) preliminary expenses (not to exceed$275) incurred by a PHA in connection with a new allocation of assistance,(2) costs incurred in assisting families who experience difficulty in obtainingappropriate housing, and (3) extraordinary costs approved by the Secretary.Section 8(q)(2)(B) requires that the same method be used to calculate feesunder the Housing Voucher Program and the Certificate Program. Section8(q)(3) contains the following overall limitation: ``The Secretary mayestablish or increase a fee in accordance with this subsection only tosuch extent or in such amounts as are provided in appropriations Acts.''This final rule (see andSection;887.103) does not contain specific dollaramounts for the administrative fees, because, as noted above, the amountsof the fees are subject to yearly appropriation action. The Departmentwill establish the actual fee amounts each year based on its appropriation.The current administrative fees for the Housing Voucher Program are: anadministrative fee equal to 6.5 percent per month of the two-bedroom fairmarket rent, a preliminar fee not to exceed $215, and a hard-to-house feeof $45 for each qualified family. These fees are based on the Department'sfiscal year 1988 appropriation and were reflected in the revised operatingplan for fiscal year 1988 submitted to, and accepted by the Committeeson Appropriations of Senate and House of Representatives. A commenter objected to basing the ongoing fee on FMRs because it believedthat it was unfair to PHAs in less costly rental markets. The commenternoted that these areas were often rural and poor, but administrative costswere not necessarily lower than in other areas. It was suggested that ifa PHA could lease up more units than estimated for the amount of fundingif received, it should be able to get an increase in its administrativefee allotment or should be able to transfer funds from the HAP to coverthe additional operating costs. Another commenter thought that the HUDRegional Offices should establish the split between the fee amount andthe subsidy amount to take into account the individual characteristicsof local housing authorities. It was also recommended that the hard-to-housefee be provided for housing a mentally handicapped person and that thepreliminary fee be a flat amount rather than the lesser of a flat amountand actual expenses. The commenter believed that a flat fee would reducethe administrative burden of documenting expenses to HUD. One commenterrequested that PHAs with large geographical areas be given special considerationin setting the administrative fees. Section 8(q) of the 1937 Act permits the Department to increase the ongoingadministrative fee ``if necessary to reflect the higher costs of administeringsmall programs and programs operating over large geographic areas,'' butagain, ``only to the extent or in such amounts as are provided in appropriationsActs.'' The Department will determine whether to provide a higher administrativeongoing administrative fee for these PHAs based on its fiscal year 1989appropriation. <ITAG tagnum="81">Housing Vouchers for Families with Income between 50 to 80% of Median</ITAG>A commenter believed that the Housing Voucher Program was well suited forfamilies with incomes between 50 and 80 percent of median income, and suggestedthat this class of family be generally eligible for housing vouchers. The eligibility for housing vouchers of families with incomes between 50and 80 percent of income has always been limited by statute to familieswho are displaced by rental rehabilitation activities or are previouslyassisted under the 1937 Act (see section 8(o)(3)). These restrictions appropriatelyfocus housing voucher assistance on the more needy very low-income families.Two recent changes should be noted. First, section 103(b) of the 1987 Actamended section 16 of the 1937 Act to exempt from section 16(b)'s percentagelimitations, dwelling units made available to, among others, lower incomefamilies that were displaced by rental rehabilitation activities. Second,the Department has recently reconsidered the issue of whether familiesthat had incomes above 50 percent and qualified for housing vouchers asbeing previously assisted under the 1937 Act are subject to the section16(b) percentage limitation (see 53 FR 15412, April 29, 1988, the proposedrule to implement section 16(c) of the 1937 Act, as added by section 103(a)of the HCD Act of 1987). In the preamble to that proposed rule, the Departmentstated that it ``has determined that `continuously assisted' families arealso exempt because under section 8(o) of the 1937 Act . . . , a familyis eligible without regard to income if it is continuously assisted. Thestatute does not require another determination of income eligibility andtherefore the income of a family that receives a housing voucher does nottrigger applicability of the percentage limitations proposed to be implementedby this rule'' (53 FR 15413). The effect of the above two changes is that there are no longer any eligiblefamilies with incomes above 50 percent of adjusted income that are subjectto the percentage limitations in section 16(b) of the 1937 Act. Section887.151, Eligibility requirements, accordingly, does not contain any provisionsconcerning compliance with section 16 of the 1937 Act, as were containedin section III.I.(b) of the March 1988 NOFA. <ITAG tagnum="81">Shoppers Incentive, Rent Reasonableness, and Related Issues </ITAG>Many commenters believed that PHAs should have some authority to disapprovea lease based upon the amount of rent payable to owners. They maintainedthat the lack of some form of rent reasonableness test was resulting intenants paying too much rent and the waste of subsidy. These commentersnoted that it was their experience that housing voucher-assisted familiesfail to negotiate a reasonable rent for their unit and were negotiatingrents that were higher than the contract rents on similar units leasedto certificate holders. They cited their own data and the Abt Associates,Inc.'s report on first year findings to support their contention. One commenterexplained this phenomenon as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">Under the Housing Voucher Program the family and landlord agrees onthe rent, without approval by the PHA. The landlord is free to set therent as high as the tenant is willing to pay. It is not a true ``market''since the tenant isn't really paying ``market rent'' but ``tenant rent.''Tenants, as a rule, don't ask, ``What is the contract rent or gross rentfor this unit,'' but ``What rent will I have to pay?'', i.e., the tenantrent. When first under rental assistance, any new rent is so much lessthan what the tenant has been paying that the tenant fails to negotiatewith an owner or compare rents.</ITAG>The commenters believed that PHAs had information, such as the fact thatother units were being rented to certificate holders at or below the FMR,which the PHA could use to help the family obtain a reasonable rent. They,therefore, urged that PHAs be given the authority to impose a rent reasonablenesstest. One commenter recommended that the test be appliable to the firstrent increase, as well as to the initial rent. Several commenters recommended that the rule contain a maximum percentageof adjusted income that a family could pay as rent. These commenters generallyrecommended 50 percent as the maximum, but 40 percent and 35 percent werealso suggested. Several commenters noted that while many tenants, as discussed above, werepaying more than 30 percent of adjusted income as rent, there were manyother families paying the minimum 10 percent of gross income as rent. Thecommenters claimed that this disparity in rent burden was primarily a functionof whether the family used the housing voucher to rent the place in whichthey were living (low rent) or another unit (high rent). They claimed thatthe shopping incentive has caused the Housing Voucher Program to be moreexpensive to the government than the Certificate Program. They also notedthat the shopping incentive had been tried in the Certificate Program,but was eventually removed. These commenters generally recommended thatHUD impose a minimum rent based on 30 percent of the family's adjustedincome The concerns expressed by these commenters are well taken, but that restrictionsbased on rent reasonableness must be balanced against maintaining a family'soption to shop for the unit of its choice. Section 887.209(b) containsseveral revisions from current policy to address these concerns. It requiresa PHA to advise the family on whether the rent requested is reasonable,based on rent for comparable units. It also requires the PHA, if the familyrequests assistance, to assist the family in negotiating a reasonable rent.In addition, the PHA may disapprove a lease for a rent that is not reasonable,based on information the PHA has for comparable rental units. A PHA mayexercise this authority in communities where the market is not functioningnormally or where some families are not able to negotiate reasonable rentson their own (for example, where there is a concentration of ownershipby a small number of landlords, or where rents charged to voucher holdersare greater than rents charged to certificate holders living in comparableunits). The PHA, however, may not disapprove a rent that is reasonablebased on rent comparability test even if the PHA believes that the rentis more than the family can afford. It is still the family that, ultimately,decides what it is willing to pay for the unit, and no rent-to-income caphas been added to the rule. A PHA must document each case in which it disapprovesa lease because the rent is not reasonable. <ITAG tagnum="81">Handling Increments of Funding and Related Issues </ITAG>A commenter was concerned that the February 19, 1987 NOFA continued torequire PHAs to treat each funding increment separately. It was the commenter'sunderstanding from training sessions that all funding was to be combined.The commenter questioned why there was no mention of commingling of fiveyear ACC's or carryover of remaining funds in section III.G.(d)(2) concerninga PHA's obligation to plan administration of its program within amountsoriginally contracted for. Another commenter claimed that all allocationsshould run concurrently with the effective date of the ACC. When incrementsof units are approved, the effective date of the first requisition shouldbe the same as any subsequent increment. The commenter believed that thischange would make the Program much easier to administer. A commenter recommendedthat budgets for each housing voucher project be consolidated as they arein the Certificate Program. The provisions of section III.G.(d)(2) are contained in andSection;887.101.This section continues the requirement that a PHA plan the administrationof its program in a manner that will ensure that it remains within theamounts originally contracted for the funding increment. PHA budgets forthe Housing Voucher Program are consolidated. The reader is referred tothe discussion of funding for a PHA's housing voucher program in <T3>Payment Standard_Affordability and Related Issues, </T3>above, foran explanation of the manner of handling funding increments under thisrule.<ITAG tagnum="81">Vacancy Payments</ITAG>Several commenters argued that claims for vacancy loss should be the sameas in the Certificate Program (see andSection; 882.105(b). These commentersbelieved that owners needed the additional incentive provided under theCertificate Program policies. Another commenter believed that, if a familymoves at the end of a month without notice, there should be a vacancy paymentfor 30 days after tenant move-out.Section 8(o)(4) of the 1937 Act prohibits housing voucher payments afterthe month during which the unit was vacated. The Department, therefore,cannot provide a vacancy loss payment comparable to that currently providedunder the Certificate Program, and both the NOFA (section III.J (1)) andthis rule (andSection; 887.353(c)) prohibit housing assistance payments forvacancies. <ITAG tagnum="81">Claims for Damages under the Lease</ITAG>Several commenters believed that the NOFA required a PHA to pay the landlordunpaid rent payable by the family not in excess of one month's rent. Thesecommenters believed that the rule should be clarified to make PHAs liablefor the difference between the payment standard and the security deposit,not the rent to owner and the security deposit. The commenters pointedout that, particularly without a rent reasonableness test, PHAs had nocontrol over the rent to owner.This rule (andSection; 887.215) continues the NOFA policy of determiningthe amount recoverable by an owner for damages under the lease by subtractingthe amount of the security deposit from the amount the family owes underthe lease. As in the NOFA, the amount paid by the PHA for amounts owedby the tenant under the lease may not exceed one month's rent to the owner.Because this provision is intended to provide the owner with some reimbursementfor amounts owed by the family, it is more appropriate to use the rentto owner, which includes the family's share of the rent, than to use thepayment standard to calculate the amount of the reimbursement. As notedabove, this rule provides the PHA the discretion to review the reasonablenessof the rent to owner based on rents for comparable units.<ITAG tagnum="81">Program Size</ITAG>A commenter claimed that a minimum of 20 to 25 units should be awardedwhenever housing vouchers are provided to jurisdictions including multi-jurisdictionalprograms. The commenter believed that the 50 housing voucher minimum forinitial allocations (section III.D. (d)(2)) was a step in the right directionbut did not go far enough. Two commenters urged that the minimum initialallocation be 100 housing vouchers. They believed that small and ruralPHAs may have to refuse housing vouchers because diseconomies would preventthem from administering two small programs, the Housing Voucher and CertificatePrograms.HUD is sensitive to the commenters' concern that housing voucher awardsshould be large enough to permit effective administration of the program.The Department, however, does not believe that embedding a fixed minimumnumber of housing vouchers in this rule is the best way to encourage effectiveprogram administration. The amount of assistance available for allocation,which varies from year to year, is a factor that must be considered. Thisrule, therefore, does not contain such a minimum. Rather, andSection; 887.53provides that the HUD Regional or Field Office may consider the numberof housing vouchers that should be offered to a PHA to facilitate programadministration and economies of scale.<ITAG tagnum="81">Welfare Tenants</ITAG>One commenter expressed concern over the inequity caused because the HousingVoucher Program does not consider maximum welfare shelter allowances indetermining a family's subsidy. As a result, the commenter pointed out,welfare recipients can rent units above the payment standard and stillpay less than 30 percent of income for rent, while a family without a welfareshelter allowance would have to pay that portion of the rent that is abovethe payment standard.The Report on First Year Findings for the Freestanding Housing VoucherDemonstration pointed out that the lack of a welfare rent provision isone reason that the Housing Voucher Program has cost more than the CertificateProgram. The Department submitted a legislative proposal to Congress infiscal year 1988 to modify the formula for determining the housing assistancepayment under the Housing Voucher Program by adding a welfare rent featureto the formula. Under the Department's legislative proposal, the amountof the assistance payment could not exceed the payment standard minus thehigher of (a) 30 percent of adjusted income or (b) welfare rent. This proposalhas not been enacted by Congress.<ITAG tagnum="81">Allocation Preferences for PHA Applications and Related Issues</ITAG>Several commenters objected to the policy in section III.F. (b)(1) forHUD to give preference to an application from a PHA ``that demonstrateslocally initiated efforts in support of its Section 8 Certificate and HousingVoucher Programs.'' They noted that eligible families in communities thatwere unable or unwilling to contribute additional support would be theultimate losers under this policy. One commenter found the preference toobroad to understand.HUD has retained this preference (andSection; 887.63(b)(1)). This preferenceencourages local support and thus should increase the total amount of resourcesavailable to meet the needs of eligible families. As noted in the preambleof the February 1987 NOFA (52 FR 5252), the preference ``is intended toadmit of a variety of types of local contributions_whether cash or inkind,which enhance the locality's Section 8 Certificate and Housing VoucherPrograms.''HUD was also urged by a few commenters to eliminate the preference in sectionIII.F. (b)(2) for applications from PHAs ``that provide families with thebroadest geographical choice of housing, including inter-jurisdictionaland interstate housing choice.'' Their argument was that the policy wouldprejudice those PHAs which, because of small program size or geographicisolation, would be unable to participate in such ``portability'' arrangements.One commenter recommended that, in addition to eliminating these two preferences,HUD also not allocate funds through State agencies, but allocate them tothe extent possible on the basis of the jurisdiction's need for assistance.HUD has retained this preference (andSection; 887.63(b)(2)), which is intendedto provide families with greater freedom of movement. For example, a Stateagency could provide a family more choice than could a smaller PHA. SmallerPHAs, however, could improve their opportunity for a funding preferenceby participating in voluntary local exchange mobility programs.One commenter recommended that preference be given to PHAs who have a highlease-up rate. HUD has not adopted this recommendation. Section 887.53,however, provides that PHAs, in determining which PHAs to invite to submitapplications may take into consideration the extent to which a PHA hasused housing vouchers and certificates it already has. A Field Office couldexclude from invitation a PHA with a poor record of getting housing vouchersand certificates under lease.<ITAG tagnum="81">Allocation Formula</ITAG>A commenter complained that the allocation of funds under the February1987 NOFA did not provide for a geographical distribution of funds. Thecommenter noted that there was no indication if any or all PHAs would haveaccess to the housing vouchers held in the Headquarters reserve for emergenciesand that the set-asides were not necessarily distributed geographically.Another commenter believed there is a need to ensure that housing vouchersare allocated to PHAs in rural areas where no Rental Rehabilitation Programsexist.Eighty-five percent of the housing voucher funds will be allocated on a``fair share'' basis to HUD Regional Offices, which in turn will reallocatethe funds to HUD Field Offices on the same basis. The balance of the fundsare placed in a Headquarters reserve and may be provided as an additionalallocation to a PHA for specified purposes.<ITAG tagnum="81">Shared Housing</ITAG>The preamble to the February 1987 NOFA (52 FR 5255) advised the publicthat the Department intended to provide for shared housing in the finalrule. (Share housing had not been implemented in the NOFAs.) This rulecontains the special provisions concerning shared housing in Subpart K.A commenter found the shared housing concept beneficial but believed thatthe payment standard under the NOFA was unreasonably high. The commenterproposed that the payment standard amount in shared housing should be determinedby dividing the payment standard amount for the total number of bedroomsin the unit by the number of bedrooms actually used by the family. Underthe commenter's suggestion a sharing family in a three bedroom unit thatused one bedroom would have a payment standard equal to \1/3\ of a threebedroom payment standard and if the family used 2 bedrooms the paymentstandard would equal \2/3\ of the three bedroom payment standard. The Departmenthas adopted this suggestion. Section 887.515 provides that the paymentstandard for a family in a shared housing unit is determined by multiplyingthe dollar amount of the payment standard for the entire unit by a ratiothat is equal to the number of bedrooms indicated on the family's housingvoucher divided by the number of bedrooms in the unit.Two commenters recommended that HUD require separate leases and assistancecontracts for each family in a shared housing unit because it would beunrealistic for the remaining family to pay the total rent when anotherfamily leaves the unit. The Department has adopted this recommendation;only individual lease shared housing is permitted under the Housing VoucherProgram (andSection; 887.505).<ITAG tagnum="81">Waiting List and Selecting Families</ITAG>Section 887.153 contains the waiting list procedures. Paragraph (b) ofthis section contains the provisions governing suspending additions tothe waiting list. It contains policies concerning when a PHA must add familiesclaiming a Federal preference even though the PHA has suspended acceptanceof new applications for its waiting list. These policies are the same asthe Certificate Program policies in andSection; 882.209(a)(7), as revisedby the Federal preference rule (52 FR 1122, 1152). Section 887.153(d) iscomparable to andSection; 882.209(a)(9). The provision is intended to makeclear that nothing than in the rule is intended to create or imply anyright to participation in the program, other than as provided in the Federalpreference requirements. The rule acknowledges, however, that an applicantmay have a right, independent of the rule, to bring a judicial action challenginga PHA's violation of a constitutional or statutory requirement (e.g., equalopportunity requirements under Title VI or Title VIII), and states thatthe rule is not intended to affect such a right of action.A commenter suggested that a PHA should not be required to advertise theprogram or waiting list for a new allocation of units if its waiting listis sufficiently long, the program has been advertised previously, thereare sufficient landlords in the program, and the PHA has at least 95% ofits units under lease. Section 887.107, which is based on andSection; 882.207,sets out the circumstances when a PHA must notify the public of the availabilityof housing assistance, namely, when the PHA establishes a waiting list,reopens a waiting list, and at other times as may be necessary to ensuremaximum use of the assistance. Section 887.107 is consistent with the commenter'ssuggestion because, generally, a PHA would not be required to advertisethe availability of housing assistance while its waiting list is closed.Another commenter asked that the rule be very specific in all cases wherethe first come, first served waiting list procedures do not apply. Section887.157 contains detailed guidance on how to apply the Federal preferences,including the circumstances under which a PHA may provide assistance toapplicants who do not qualify for a Federal preference before other applicantswho do qualify. These Federal preference regulations are same as the Federalpreference regulations published at 53 FR 1122 on January 15, 1988, forother assisted housing programs, including the Certificate Program. (Theconforming amendments to Part 882 include a revision of andSection; 882.219(b)(4)to insert the correct paragraph.) In addition, andSection;andSection; 887.155(b)and (c) set out the selection procedures applicable, respectively, to familiesaffected by rental rehabilitation activities and when HUD provides a PHAwith housing voucher authority to be made available to a class of applicantsbased upon the identity or location of the property occupied by the applicants.<ITAG tagnum="81">Briefing Families</ITAG>The Department has simplified the briefing requirements (andSection; 887.163),to provide PHAs greater discretion in determining the information thatshould be provided.One commenter objected to the requirement to include in the briefing packet``information on the range of neighborhoods in which the family may findunits.'' The commenter believed the requirement to be an unnecessary burdenbecause, in its experience, families were proving very resourceful in locatinghousing, including housing in areas the commenter would not have thoughtto list. The list in andSection; 887.163 requires PHAs to provide informationon the range of neighborhoods, so that families are aware of availablehousing resources outside of areas of minority and economic impaction.<ITAG tagnum="81">Security Deposits  </ITAG>Many commenters believed that the security deposit requirements shouldbe the same for both the Housing Voucher Program and the Certificate Program,but there was disagreement among the commenters as to what the policy shouldbe. Several commenters recommended using the current Housing Voucher Programrequirements, namely, the greater of 30 percent of the tenant's adjustedmonthly income or $50. They pointed out that this policy allows the familyto know what its security deposit will be when they are looking for housing,rather than after they have found a unit. Other commenters, while agreeingwith the concept of a rent-based security deposit, as proposed in sectionII.B.2.(d) of the February 19, 1987 NOFA (52 FR 5255), recommended thatthere be a maximum security deposit amount. One commenter suggested a maximumof 20-30% of the monthly rent. Another commenter recommended that, as ameans of encouraging owner participation, the owner should be allowed todetermine the security deposit, but the rule should also retain the currentsecurity loss guarantee by the PHA for cases where the owner accepts asecurity deposit in an amount less than one month's rent. Finally, onecommenter believed that the current policy, described above, was in conflictwith a State law, which allows the owner to collect a security depositequal to one and one-half times the monthly rent.  The Department has decided to implement a rent-based security deposit asit proposed to do. The Department believes that the PHA is in the bestposition to determine the appropriate maximum security deposit within itsjurisdiction. Accordingly andSection; 887.211, Security deposits, requiresthe PHA to adopt a policy, for determining the maximum security deposits,subject to the conditions that the maximum not exceed one month's rentand not be unduly high as to preclude participation by program applicants.As discussed above, andSection; 887.215 continues the NOFA policy of determiningthe amount an owner can claim from the PHA as reimbursement for amountsowed by the tenant under the lease by subtracting the amount of the securitydeposit from the amount the family owes under the lease. The security depositrequirements are not in conflict with the State law that would permit ahigher maximum security deposit. Complying with the HUD requirement doesnot prevent the owner from complying with the State law. <ITAG tagnum="81">Eligible and Ineligible Housing  </ITAG>Section III.M. lists as an ineligible housing type a unit that is ownedby a PHA that is administering the ACC. The February 1987 NOFA at 52 FR5256 contained a proposal to broaden the exclusion to cover any unit thatis substantially controlled by the PHA. Several commenters objected tothe proposed change. They noted that PHAs were becoming more involved invarious methods to increase the supply of low-income housing, includingbond issues, joint ventures, State and local programs, and the use of redevelopmenttax investments, which, they claimed, increased the supply of such housingwith little or no Federal expenditures. They believed that the proposedchange would discourage such activities and recommended that some controlsbe placed on using housing vouchers in these types of units rather thanimposing a total prohibition. One commenter (citing section II.B.2.(h)(2)of the February 1987 NOFA) noted that while HUD was prohibiting the useof housing vouchers in PHA-controlled housing, it was proposing to allocatehousing vouchers to HUD-owned projects. Section 887.203(b)(2) provides, as proposed in the February 1987 NOFA,that housing that is owned or otherwise substantially controlled by thePHA may not be used in the program. Under the U.S. Housing Act of 1937the Section 8 owner must be an entity separate and independent from thePHA. The Section 8 owner may not be an entity owned or controlled by thePHA. The rule provision is intended to clarify that a unit ``substantiallycontrolled'' by the PHA is covered by the statutory and regulatory prohibitionon PHA ownership of a program unit. The prohibition of ownership or controlby the PHA administrator tends to minimize inherent conflicts between theinterests of the Section 8 owner and the PHA's performance of its responsibilitiesas contract administrator; for example, the determination whether the unitmeets the housing quality standards. The Department recognizes that thedetermination whether there is ``substantial control'' by the PHA may bedifficult to interpret and apply to some forms of interaction and cooperationbetween the PHA and the ownership entity. Where questions are presented,the Department will decide the issues concerning applicability of the regulatoryprohibition on a case-by-case basis, bearing in mind the necessity forcompliance with the statutory and regulatory standard and for avoidanceof program abuse, as well as the objective described by the commenter_toencourage PHA-participation in locally-designed housing efforts.  The proposed allocation referred to by the commenter is not a parallelsituation. HUD would not be administering an ACC with respect to a unitthat it owns. Housing voucher assistance allocated for families livingin HUD-owned units would not be used in a HUD-owned unit. Rather, the assistancewould be made available to a family that is required to <T3>vacate </T3>the unit as a result of a HUD property management or propertydisposition decision or to a family to enable the family to afford theunit <T3>after </T3>it is sold by HUD.  Some commenters argued that manufactured housing was becoming an increasingcomponent of affordable housing, and that a mechanism must be establishedto use housing vouchers to assist in paying ``lot rent.'' A family mayuse its housing voucher to rent a manufactured home. Part of the rent forsuch a home would include the ``lot rent.'' Assistance is available forthis purpose under the Certificate Program. The Department, however, doesnot, at this time, plan to expand the Housing Voucher Program to includeassisting families to pay ``lot rent'' to lease a space for the family'smanufactured home, because the Department does not have statutory authorityunder the Housing Voucher Program analogous to that applicable to the CertificateProgram for calculating the amount of assistance when the family leasesonly the maufactured home space.<ITAG tagnum="81">Administrative Plan</ITAG>The Department indicated in the preamble to the February 1987 NOFA itsintention to limit the administrative plan to specifying only those policiesand procedures where the PHA has discretion to establish local policy forthe treatment of applicants and participants. Several commenters notedtheir agreement with this proposal. Section 887.61 contains the revisedrequirements for the administrative plan. This section calls for a combinedadministrative plan when a PHA is administering both the Housing VoucherProgram and the Certificate Program. Conforming amendments have been madeto the Certificate Program regulation.<ITAG tagnum="81">Portability</ITAG>The issue of portability of housing vouchers raised a substantial amountof conflicting but generally adverse public comment.One commenter objected to the concept of portability on the ground thatneither the Housing Voucher Program nor the Certificate Program is an entitlementprogram, but in the view of the commenter, they are ``highly limited localprograms funded with stringently limited federal dollars'' and that portabilitycreates a national preference for portability families at the expense oflocal assistance programs and the local families they serve. Several commentersclaimed that portability removed the PHA's control over its program andbudget. The principal objection to portability was the claim that it isvery complicated and burdensome to administer. In particular, the billbackprocedures were singled out as creating ``a web of financial entanglements''among numerous PHAs. Many commenters argued that the administrative fee,which is split on an 80/20 percent basis between the initial and receivingPHAs, is inadequate compensation for the additional administrative burdensinvolved in handling a portability family. Another commenter noted thatthe NOFA did not specify whether the initial PHA or the receiving PHA wasresponsible for paying a vacancy claim. The commenter assumed that if theinitial PHA were responsible for the housing voucher contract, it wouldmake the vacancy payment, but thought problems would arise because it wouldhave to depend on the receiving PHA to verify the claim and determine theamount.Some of these commenters characterized the provision that permitted aninitial PHA to deny a portability request if the number of families soassisted by the PHA would be more than 15 percent of the units under leasein the initial PHA's housing voucher program as preferable to previousprovisions, but other commenters saw the 15 percent provision as denyingportability to a few families when it is generally available to all otherfamilies and still leaving an administratively complex portability systemin place. Several commenters, noting the absence of any percentage limitationon the number of transfers a receiving PHA must accept, believed that incomingportability families could take precedence over long term residents, particularlyin certain magnet cities. These commenters found such a result both unfairto waiting-list families and a potential source for litigation againstthem by disappointed waiting-list families.The commenters suggested several changes in or alternatives to the currentportability system, which they believed would make portability less burdensome.Several commenters believed that portability should be voluntary and thatmandatory portability imposed unnecessary fiscal and administrative burdenson PHAs; another commenter would make portability mandatory for only 5percent of the units under lease. Some of these commenters referred tothe ``mobility'' policy as carried out in the Certificate Program as thebest way to handle tenant moves from jurisdiction to jurisdiction. Anothercommenter believed that a housing voucher holder should not be allowedto use the portability feature if the holder owed money to the initialPHA, while another commenter would permit portability only for familiesalready leasing a unit in the initial PHA's jurisdiction. It was also suggestedthat portability not be allowed between a county PHA and a city PHA withinthe county; the commenter believed that it made no sense to permit portabilityinvolving such short distances. Several commenters contended that portabilityhurts PHAs with lower payment standards, notably small and rural PHAs,when housing voucher holders within their jurisdictions move to jurisdictionswith higher payment standards. Most of the commenters making this pointwere opposed to portability, but one commenter, who agreed with the conceptof portability, urged that HUD develop a mechanism to provide supplementalfunding to the initial PHA.Several commenter stated that a far less administratively burdensome anda fairer alternative to the current portability system would be for HUDto provide portability housing vouchers to receiving PHAs through a headquartersreserve. When a transferring family left the program, the housing voucherwould be returned to the reserve. Another approach suggested by some commenterswould require the receiving PHA to provide its next available housing voucherto the transferring family and eliminate billing the initial PHA (somecommenters would allow billing the initial PHA only if the receiving PHAdid not have a housing voucher immediately available for the transferringfamily).A commenter was concerned about the financial burden that would be imposedon the receiving PHA when it must make advances on behalf of the familymoving into its jurisdiction and then wait for reimbursement from the initialPHA.The Department has left the portability requirements (Subpart L) substantivelythe same as they have been under the part III.L. of the February 1987 andMarch 1988 NOFAs. In large part, this decision is based on the fact thatthe Department must develop a proposed rule to implement section 8(r) ofthe 1937 Act, as added by section 145 of the HCD Act of 1987. Section 8(r)concerns portability with respect to both housing vouchers and certificateswithin the same, or a contiguous, metropolitan statistical area as theone in which the PHA approving the assistance is located. Section 8(r)(4)expressly provides that section 8(r) may not be construed to restrict anyauthority of the Secretary under any other provision of law to providefor the portability of assistance under section 8 of the 1937 Act. TheDepartment will review its current portability requirements as part ofthe proposed rulemaking to implement section 145.In the meantime, the Department will keep its current policies becauseportability provides an important option to assisted families to move toanother jurisdiction to be nearer to employment opportunities, better schools,or a supporting network of family and friends. The availability of portabilityshould not cause large numbers of families to undertake long moves. Basedon general mobility rates for lower income families, no more than ten percentof housing voucher holders should use portability and most of these familiesshould move within a metropolitan area.PHAs may simplify the portability feature. They may issue one of theirown housing vouchers to an incoming family rather than act as a receivingPHA. They may also join with other PHAs to set up a pool or an exchangesystem to permit families to move to other jurisdictions. Several metropolitanareas and a consortium of PHAs in Eastern Massachusetts, Connecticut, andNew Hampshire have set up such systems.<ITAG tagnum="81">Set-Aside to Aid in the Desegregation of Public Housing</ITAG>One commenter, while sympathetic with the purpose of this set-aside, questionedwhether HUD could comply with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964and Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 when the set-aside involvesa race conscious selection process. This set-aside furthers these CivilRights Acts by providing a means to remedy preliminary findings of noncompliancewith Title VI when other efforts have not succeeded. Housing vouchers maybe used to provide remedies to identified victims of practices or proceduresin a PHA's public housing program that have been found to be in violationof Title VI. A PHA may not assign preferences or priorities for issuinghousing vouchers on the basis of race or ethnicity of applicants, exceptfor victims of discriminatory practices or procedures.<ITAG tagnum="81">Interchangeability and Related Issues</ITAG>Several commenters objected to the proposal to permit certificate holdersto trade in their certificate for a housing voucher, if available (seePart II.B.2.(c), 52 FR 5255, February 19, 1987). Several commenters believedthat the proposal would just add more complexity to both programs. Oneof these commenters wanted to know when the family would have the choiceand whether the life of the housing voucher would be 120 days or the balanceof the time remaining on the certificate. Another commenter believed thatan interchangeability policy could result in owners putting undue pressureon certificate holders to get housing vouchers so that the owner couldcharge a higher rent. Other commenters appeared to favor the concept, butobjected to the fact that housing voucher holders would not have the opportunityto trade in their housing vouchers for certificates. They believed thatproviding for interchangeability in both directions would enable HUD toanalyze better the relative merits of the two programs.This rule adopts interchangeability and permits a holder to trade in eithera housing voucher or a certificate (see andSection;andSection; 887.155(a)(1)(iv)and 882.209(a)(10)). The initial term of the housing voucher or certificateso issued may not exceed the term remaining on the certificate or housingvoucher that has been traded-in, and extensions, if any, may not causethe total term to exceed 120 days (see andSection;andSection; 887.165(c) and882.209(d)(3)).Two commenters also expressed concern with the provision in section III.I.(d)(4)(i),which permits an applicant family to refuse a housing voucher in orderto wait for a certificate and to receive a housing voucher after it hasrefused a certificate. These commenters believed that it would greatlysimplify the administration of both programs if the PHA had the authorityto choose which type of assistance to offer an applicant family. Anothercommenter wanted to know if this provision could be interpreted as giventhe PHA the authority to choose which type of assistance to provide. Section887.155(a)(1)(iii) codifies the policy permitting an applicant family torefuse a housing voucher to wait for a certificate. This section, however,provides more administrative flexibility to PHAs by eliminating the requirementto remove the family from the waiting list if it refuses the second formof assistance and permitting the PHA to establish policies in its administrativeplan. Conforming Certificate Program changes have been made at andSection;882.209(a)(9).<ITAG tagnum="81">Applications for Housing Vouchers and HUD Invitations for Applications</ITAG>A commenter noted that section III.E.(c) required the application includefor ``targeted housing vouchers only'' the identification of the size andcomposition of families to be assisted. The commenter believed that therequirement should be clarified to indicate whether the number of unitsby bedroom size and family composition must be specified for all typesof housing voucher applications. Another commenter recommended that theHUD invitation for applications detail any priorities or preferences theinviting field office will use in evaluating the applications.A PHA must indicate bedroom size, but not family composition, on any applicationfor housing vouchers.<ITAG tagnum="81">Utility Allowances</ITAG>Several commenters suggested that the utility allowances be eliminatedbecause they believed them to be confusing to both landlords and tenants.Utility allowances are included in the statutory requirements for determiningthe amount of the the housing voucher payment to be paid on behalf of afamily (see section 8(o)(2)). It should be noted, however, that the utilityallowance affects only the determination of a family's minimum rent (seeandSection; 887.353(a)(2)).<ITAG tagnum="81">Term of Housing Vouchers</ITAG>A commenter recommended that the term of the housing vouchers be extendedto one year. The commenter believed that with a 60 to 120 day term therewere families living in units that do not meet housing quality standardsor whose landlords will not participate in the Housing Voucher Programand who would, therefore, have to allow their housing voucher to expireor would have to breach their existing lease in order to receive housingvoucher assistance. The Department has not adopted this recommendationbecause it would be detrimental to families that can use their housingvouchers and certificates within the 60 to 120 days provided.<ITAG tagnum="81">Lease</ITAG>A commenter suggested that the lease and lease addendum be combined intoone form. The lease addendum consists of the lease provisions requiredby HUD. The required provisions may be combined in a single form with otherlease provisions.<ITAG tagnum="81">Family Eligibility</ITAG>A commenter suggested that a family should not receive a housing voucheror a certificate if the family has more than one damage claim that exceedsthe security deposit by $200. Another commenter urged that a PHA be permittedto deny a housing voucher or certificate on the same grounds set out insections III.P.(b)(2) and (3) for terminating tenancy. These grounds includea family history of disturbance of neighbors or destruction of propertyand of crime of physical violence to persons or property.This rule (andSection; 887.403(a)(3) and (4)), as did the NOFAs, permitsa PHA to deny a housing voucher to a family if the family owes rent orother amounts to the PHA in connection with section 8 or public housingassistance, or if the family has not reimbursed the PHA for any amountspaid to an owner by the PHA for rent or other amounts owed by the family.Neither this rule nor the NOFAs set a minimum amount that must be owedby the family before a PHA may deny the family a housing voucher. Rather,the decision to deny a housing voucher to a family based on the family'sfailure to reimburse the PHA is left to the discretion of the PHA basedon its consideration of all the facts. (See 49 FR 12215, March 29, 1984.)Section III.P.(b)(2) and (3), which is codified in this rule in andSection;887.213(b)(1), set out two examples of ``other good cause'' for which anowner may terminate a tenancy. They are: a family history of disturbanceof neighbors or destruction of property, or of living or housekeeping habitsresulting in damage to the unit or property and criminal activity by familymembers involving crimes of physical violence to persons or property. TheDepartment has not adopted the suggestion that these examples be addedas grounds for a PHA to deny a family a housing voucher. These examplesconcern the question of a family's suitability as a tenant which is anowner's responsibility to assess, not the PHA's. As noted in andSection;887.155(a)(1)(ii):<ITAG tagnum="21">The owner selects the tenant for occupancy of a unit. The PHA maynot establish selection criteria based on the applicant's suitability asa tenant. The PHA's selection of an applicant for participation is nota representation by the PHA to the owner concerning either the family'sexpected behavior as a tenant or its suitability as a tenant.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">Double Subsidy</ITAG>One commenter suggested that the FmHA Section 515 program be included inprohibition against double subsidy contained in section III.J.(k). Thecommenter urged that the mechanism for avoiding payment of double subsidyfor tenants be structured in a way so that the excess subsidy remain withthe PHA. Section 887.159 which contains the prohibition against doublesubsidy refers to the FmHA Section 521 Program (comparable to the Section236 Rental Assistance Payments Program) as an example of a duplicativeFederal housing subsidy and not the basic FmHA Section 515 Program (aninterest reduction program comparable to the Section 236 Program). TheSection 515 units have been included in andSection; 887.209(b)(2) and aretreated the same as Section 236 units for determining the rent to owner.<ITAG tagnum="84">Findings and Other Matters</ITAG>An environmental finding under the National Environmental Policy Act (42U.S.C. 4321-4347) is unnecessary since the Certificate Program and theHousing Voucher program are part of the Section 8 Existing Housing program,which is categorically excluded under HUD regulations at 24 CFR 50.20(d).This rule constitutes a major rule as that term is defined in Section 1(b)of Executive Order 12291 on Federal Regulation issued on February 17, 1981.Analysis of the rule indicates that it does not (1) cause a major increasein costs or prices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, Stateor local government agencies, or geographic regions; or (2) have a significantadverse effect on competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation,or on the ability of United States-based enterprises to compete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. Analysis of the rule, however,indicates that it does have an annual effect on the economy of $100 millionor more. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget, in accordancewith section 6(a)(4) of Executive Order 12291, has waived the requirementsof section 3 and 4 of the Executive Order.  Under section 605(b) of the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601),HUD certifies that this rule does not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entitites, because the rule would continuean ongoing program and does not significantly alter current policies andrequirements.  HUD has determined, in accordance with E.O. 12612, <T3>Federalism, </T3>that this rule does not have a substantial, directeffect on the States or on the relationship between the Federal Governmentand the States, or on the distribution of power or responsibilities amongthe various levels of government because this rule essentially codifiesexisting program requirements for the Housing Voucher Program and doesnot substantially alter the established roles of HUD, the States, and localgovernments, including PHAs. To the extent that particular revisions havealtered responsibilities, these revisions have generally been in responseto statutory changes, have increased the discretion of the non-Federalgovernmental entities, or have done both.  HUD has determined that this rule is not likely to have a significant impacton family formation, maintenance, and general well-being within the meaningof E.O. 12606, <T3>The Family, </T3>because it does not affect the role or institutionof the family in society. This rule codifies existing program requirements.The Housing Voucher Program, itself, is a benefit to families because itassists eligible families to afford decent safe and sanitary housing ortheir choice. This rule was listed as Sequence Number 957 in the Department's SemiannualAgenda of Regulations published on April 15, 1988 (52 FR 13857), underExecutive Order 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act.  The information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to the Office of Management and Budget for review under the provisionsof the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, 44 U.S.C. 3501-3520. Currentlyapproved requirements have been assigned the following OMB Control Numbers:2502-0123; 2502-0154; 2502-0161; 2502-0185; 2502-0348; 2502-0350; 2577-0067;and 2577-0083. In accordance with 5 CFR 1320.21, the following table discloses the Department'sestimated burden for each of the collections of information in this rule. <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,i1,s100,12,10.2,10,8.2,10,8.3</C><T4>Section </T4>8 <T4>Housing Voucher Program OMB Approval Numbers </T4><H1>Description of information collection</H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent </H1><H1>Total annual responses </H1><H1>Hours per response</H1><H1>Total hours </H1><H1>Regulatory reference</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Application forms HUD-52515 (2502-0123) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>1,000 </D><D>3 </D><D>3,000 </D><D>887.55  </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Claim for security deposit and vacancy loss HUD-52676 (2502-0154) <D>500 </D><D>5.50 </D><D>2,750 </D><D>1 </D><D>2,750 </D><D>887.215</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Tenant furnished utilities HUD-52662 (2502-0161) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>1,000 </D><D>3 </D><D>3,000 </D><D>887.361 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspection form HUD-52580 (2502-0185) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>150,000 </D><D>0.5 </D><D>75,000 </D><D>887.207 </D><P>887.257 </P><P>887.259</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Financial forms HUD-52663; 52672; 52673; 52681 (2502-0348) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>7,000 </D><D>1.43 </D><D>10,000 </D><D>887.55 </D><P>887.101</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for lease approval HUD-52517A (2502-0350) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>50,000 </D><D>.08 </D><D>4,000 </D><D>887.207</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Balance sheet HUD-52595 (2577-0067) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>1,000 </D><D>887.55 </D><P>887.101</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HUD-50058 (2577-0083) <D>1,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>50,000 </D><D>1 </D><D>50,000 </D><D>887.151</D><R>n,n,n,n,n,s,n</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total burden hours <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>148,750</D><D/></ITAG></ITAG>The Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program numbers for this ruleare: 14.156, 14.230, and 14.580.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>24 CFR Part 511  Rental rehabilitation grants, Grant programs: Housing and community development,Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 813 Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 882 Grant programs_Housing and community development, Housing, Low and moderateincome housing, Mobile homes. 24 CFR Part 887 Grant programs: Housing and community development, Housing, Rent subsidies,Low and moderate income housing. 24 CFR Part 888  Rent subsidies. 24 CFR Part 960 Public housing. Accordingly, the Department amends 24 CFR Chapters V, VIII, and IX, asfollows:  1. In Chapter VIII, a new Part 887 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 887_HOUSING VOUCHERS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.1 Purpose of the Housing Voucher Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.3 Scope and applicability of the part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.5 Equal opportunity requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.7 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Funding Allocations and Application Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.51 Allocations of budget authority to Regional and Field Offices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.53 Invitation for applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.55 Submission of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.57 Evidence of PHA's authority to participate in the Housing VoucherProgram.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.59 Equal opportunity housing plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.61 Administrative plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.63 HUD review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.65 HUD determination to administer a local program under thispart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Annual Contributions Contract and PHA Responsibilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.101 Annual contributions contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.103 Administrative fees paid to PHA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.105 PHA responsibilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.107 PHA public notice to encourage participation by eligible families.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.109 PHA activities to encourage participation by owners and others.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.111 Audit requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Selecting Families and Issuing Housing Vouchers </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.151 Eligibility requirements (eligible family).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.153 Waiting list procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.155 Selecting families and issuing housing vouchers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.157 Federal selection preferences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.159 Prohibition against double subsidy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.161 Housing voucher packet.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.163 PHA briefing of families.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.165 Term of the housing voucher.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.167 Continued participation when a family wants to move withinthe PHA's jurisdiction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Finding and Leasing a Unit and Terminating Tenancy </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.201 ``Finders-keepers'' policy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.203 Eligible and ineligible housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.205 Program information to owners.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.207 PHA approval of unit and lease.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.209 Lease between unit owner and family.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.211 Security deposit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.213 Owner termination of tenancy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.215 Amounts recoverable under the lease.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Housing Quality Standards, Periodic Unit Inspection, andMaintenance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.251 Housing quality standards (HQS).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.253 Occupancy standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.255 Owner responsibility to maintain the unit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.257 PHA periodic unit inspection to ensure unit continues to meetHQS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.259 Inspection reports.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.261 PHA recourse if unit does not meet HQS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Housing Voucher Contract and Owner Responsibilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.301 Housing voucher contract between PHA and unit owner. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.303 Owner responsibilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.305 Contracting out owner functions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Payment Standard and Housing Assistance Payment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.351 Determining the payment standard and the payment standardschedule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.353 Determining housing assistance payments amounts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.355 Regular reexamination of family income and composition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.357 Interim reexamination of family income and composition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.359 Changes in family size or composition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.361 Adjustments of utility allowances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.363 Housing assistance payments equal to zero. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Family Obligations; Denial and Termination of Assistance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.401 Family responsibilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.403 Grounds for PHA denial or termination of assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.405 Informal review or hearing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart J_Special Housing Types </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.451 Purpose of this subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.453 Cooperative or mutual housing: Definition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.455 Cooperative or mutual housing: Limitation on the use of housingvoucher authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.461 Independent group residences (IGR): Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.463 Independent group residences: Selection preference.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.465 Independent group residences: Additional lease requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.467 Independent group residences: Housing quality standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.469 Independent group residences: Payment standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.471 Manufactured homes: Definition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.473 Manufactured homes: Housing quality standards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.481 Single room occupancy (SRO): Definition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.483 Single room occupancy: Additional eligibility criteria.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.485 Single room occupancy: Housing quality standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.487 Single room occupancy: Payment standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.489 Congregate housing: Definition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.491 Congregate housing: Housing quality standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.493 Congregate housing: Payment standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart K_Shared Housing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.501 Applicability, scope, and purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.503 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.505 Types of shared housing and applicable requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.507 PHA administration of shared housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.509 Housing quality standards for shared housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.511 Occupancy of a shared housing unit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.513 Determining amount of housing assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.515 Payment standard for shared housing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart L_Mobility and Portability </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.551 Overview. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.553 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.555 Mobility: Encouraging continued participation through voluntaryarrangements among PHAs when a family wants to move outside the PHA's jurisdiction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.557 Portability: Encouraging continued participation when a familywants to move outside the PHA's jurisdiction and there is no voluntaryarrangement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.559 Portability: Family eligibility. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.561 Portability: Determination to deny or terminate assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.563 Portability: Responsibilities of the initial PHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.565 Portability: Responsibilities of the receiving PHA. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">887.567 Portability: Subsequent moves.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5, and 8, U.S. Housing Act of 1937 (52 U.S.C.1437a, 1437c, 1437f); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Information </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose of the Housing Voucher Program. </ITAG>Section 8(o) of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f(o))authorizes the Housing Voucher Program. The purpose of the Housing VoucherProgram is to assist eligible families to pay rent for decent, safe, andsanitary housing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and applicability of the part. </ITAG>The provisions of this part apply to the Housing Voucher Program authorizedby section 8(o) of the 1937 Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equal opportunity requirements. </ITAG>(a) Each participating public housing agency and owner must comply withthe following: (1) Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964; (2) Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968; (3) Executive Order 11063, Equal Opportunity in Housing, 1962; (4) Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (In the case of owners,compliance with section 504 consists of adherence to pertinent housingvoucher contract provisions); (5) The Age Discrimination Act of 1975; and (6) Any related regulations or other requirements. (b) Failure to comply with these equal opportunity requirements may resultin imposition of sanctions. (c) A PHA must affirmatively act to provide opportunities to participatein the Housing Voucher Program to persons who, because of such factorsas race, ethnicity, sex of household head, age, or source of income areless likely to apply for housing vouchers. (Special efforts also must bemade with respect to persons expected to live in the PHA's jurisdictionbecause of present or planned employment, as indicated in the local housingassistance plan developed under Title I of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974.) <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><T3>1937 Act. </T3>The United States Housing Act of 1937. <T3>Adjusted income. </T3>See andSection; 813.102 of this chapter. <T3>Annual contributions contract (ACC). </T3>A written agreement betweenHUD and a PHA to provide annual contributions to the PHA for housing assistancepayments and administrative fees. <T3>Annual income. </T3>See andSection; 813.106 of this chapter. <T3>Assisted lease (or lease). </T3>A written agreement between an ownerand a family for the leasing of a dwelling unit by the owner to the familywith assistance payments under a housing voucher contract between the ownerand the PHA. In the case of cooperative or mutual housing, ``lease'' meansthe occupancy agreement or other written agreement establishing the conditionsfor occupancy of the unit. <T3>Common space. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.503 for purposes of sharedhousing. <T3>Congregate housing. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.489. <T3>Cooperative or mutual housing. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.453. <T3>Disabled person. </T3>See andSection; 812.2 of this chapter. <T3>Displaced person. </T3>See andSection; 812.2 of this chapter. <T3>Elderly person. </T3>A person who is at least 62 years of age. <T3>Eligible family (family). </T3>See andSection; 887.151(a) <T3>Fair market rent (FMR). </T3>The rent, including utilities (excepttelephone), ranges and refrigerators, and all maintenance, management,and other services, which would be required to be paid in order to rentprivately owned decent, safe and sanitary rental housing of a modest (non-luxury)nature with suitable amenities in the market area. Fair Market Rents forexisting housing are published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> by HUD under Part 888 of this chapter. FMRs areused by PHAs in the Housing Voucher Program to develop the payment standardused to determine the appropriate amounts of housing assistance to be paidon behalf of participating families. <T3>Handicapped person. </T3>See andSection; 813.102 of this chapter. <T3>HCD Act of 1974. </T3>The Housing and Community Development Act of1974. <T3>Housing assistance payment. </T3>The monthly payment by the PHA toan owner on behalf of a family participating in the Housing Voucher Program.The maximum housing assistance payment is determined by subtracting 30percent of a family's monthly adjusted income from the payment standardthat applies to the family. For additional detail see andSection; 887.353.<T3>Housing assistance plan. </T3>(a) A housing assistance plan submittedby a local government participating in the Community Development BlockGrant Program as part of the block grant application, in accordance withthe requirements of the Community Development Block Grant regulations inandSection; 570.303(c) of this title and approved by HUD; or (b) A housing assistance plan meeting the requirements of andSection; 570.303(c)of this title, submitted by a local government not participating in theCommunity Development Block Grant Program and approved by HUD. <T3>Housing voucher. </T3>A document issued by a PHA declaring a familyto be eligible for participation in the Housing Voucher Program and statingthe terms and conditions for the family's participation. <T3>Housing voucher contract. </T3>A written contract between a PHA andan owner, in the form prescribed by HUD for the Housing Voucher Program,in which the PHA agrees to make housing assistance payments to the owneron behalf of an eligible family. <T3>Housing voucher holder. </T3>A family that has an unexpired housingvoucher. <T3>HUD. </T3>The Department of Housing and Urban Development or designee.<T3>Independent group residence (IGR). </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.461.<T3>Individual lease shared housing. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.503for purposes of shared housing. <T3>Initial PHA. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.553 for purposes of portability.<T3>Lease. </T3>See assisted lease. <T3>Lower income family. </T3>A family whose annual income does not exceed80 percent of the median income for the area, as determined by HUD, withadjustments for smaller and larger families. HUD may establish income limitshigher or lower than 80 percent of the median income for the area on thebasis of its finding that such variations are necessary because of theprevailing levels of construction costs or unusually high or low familyincome. <T3>Manufactured home. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.471. <T3>Occupancy standards. </T3>Standards that the PHA establishes for determiningthe appropriate number of bedrooms needed to house families of differentsizes or composition. <T3>Owner. </T3>Any person or entity having the legal right to lease orsublease decent, safe, and sanitary housing. <T3>Participant. </T3>A family becomes a participant in the PHA's HousingVoucher Program when the PHA executes a housing voucher contract with anowner for housing assistance payments on behalf of the family. <T3>Payment standard. </T3>An amount, adopted by a PHA for each bedroomsize and Fair Market Rent area, that is used to determine the amount ofassistance that is to be paid by the PHA on behalf of a family participatingin the Housing Voucher Program. For additional detail see andSection;andSection;887.351 and 887.353. <T3>Private space. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.503 for purposes of sharedhousing. <T3>Public Housing Agency (PHA). </T3>Any State, county, municipality orother governmental entity or public body (or its agency or instrumentality)that is authorized to engage in or assist in the development or operationof lower income housing. <T3>PHA jurisdiction. </T3>The area in which the PHA is not legally barredfrom entering into housing voucher contracts. <T3>Receiving PHA. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.553 for purposes of portability.<T3>Rent to owner. </T3>The total of the monthly amount paid under thehousing voucher contract by the PHA to the owner on behalf of the familyand the monthly amount the family must pay to the owner to cover the balanceof rent due the owner under the lease. <T3>Resident assistant. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.461 for purposesof IGRs. <T3>Secretary. </T3>The Secretary of Housing and Urban Development, ordesignee. <T3>Service agency. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.461 for purposes of IGRs.<T3>Service agreement. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.461 for purposes ofIGRs. <T3>Shared housing. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.503. <T3>Single room occupancy (SRO) housing. </T3>Defined in andSection; 887.481.<T3>Utility allowance. </T3>An amount that applies when the cost of utilities(except telephone) and other housing services (e.g., garbage collection)for an assisted unit is not included in the rent to owner and is insteadthe responsibility of the family. The allowance is an amount equal to theestimate made or approved by the PHA (see andSection; 887.353) of the monthlycosts of a reasonable consumption of these utilities and other servicesfor the unit by an energy-conservative household of modest circumstances,consistent with the requirements of a safe, sanitary, and healthful livingenvironment. In the case of shared housing, the amount of the utility allowancefor an assisted family is a pro rate portion of the utility allowance forthe entire unit, based on the number of bedrooms in the assisted family'sprivate space. In the case of an assisted individual sharing a one-bedroomunit with another person, the amount of the utility allowance for the assistedindividual is one half the utility allowance for the entire unit. <T3>Very low-income family. </T3>A lower income family whose annual incomedoes not exceed 50 percent of the median income for the area, as determinedby HUD, with adjustments for smaller or larger families. HUD may establishincome limits higher or lower than 50 percent of the median income forthe area on the basis of its finding that such variations are necessarybecause of unusually high or low family incomes. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Funding Allocations and Application Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocations of budget authority to Regional and Field Offices. </ITAG>The Department allocates housing voucher authority to its Regional or FieldOffices in conformance with section 213(d) of the HCD Act of 1974 and regulationsimplementing section 213(d) in Part 791 of this title. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.53 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Invitation for applications. </ITAG>The Regional Office or Field Office invites PHAs to submit applicationsto the appropriate Field Office based upon the amount of housing voucherauthority available. In determining which PHAs to invite, the RegionalOffice or Field Office must consider the need for housing assistance inthe community, and may also consider a PHA's performance in administeringHUD programs, the extent to which a PHA is utilizing the housing vouchersand certificates previously provided by HUD, and the number of housingvouchers that should be offered to a PHA to facilitate program administrationand economies of scale and the purposes for which the allocation was made.The Regional or Field Office may set application submission deadlines intheir invitation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.55 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of applications. </ITAG>(a) A PHA must submit its application for the Housing Voucher Program tothe HUD Field Office. (b) The application must be in the form, and in accordance with the instructions,prescribed by HUD and must contain the following information and such otherinformation as HUD decides is necessary: (1) The number of units by bedroom size (<T3>i.e., </T3>one bedroom units, two bedroom units, and so forth), andthe approximate number of units for elderly, handicapped, or disabled families;(2) Estimates of the average adjusted income for prospective participantsfor each bedroom size; and (3) The PHA's schedule of leasing, which must provide for the expeditiousleasing of units in the program. In developing the schedule, a PHA mustspecify the number of units in the program that are expected to be leasedat the end of each three-month interval. The schedule must project lease-upby eligible families within no more than twelve months after executionof the ACC by HUD. (c) The PHA may submit the following with an application: (1) Its equal opportunity housing plan or changes in its existing HUD-approvedplan: (2) Its administrative plan or changes in its existing HUD-approved plan;(3) Estimates of financial requirements for preliminary costs, administrativecosts, and housing assistance payments on HUD-prescribed forms; and (4) A schedule of utility allowances or any changes in its existing schedule,with a justification of the amounts proposed.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control numbers2502-0123, 2502-0348, and 2577-0067.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.57 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Evidence of PHA's authority to participate in the Housing VoucherProgram. </ITAG>If it has not previously done so, a PHA must submit information that demonstratesthat the applicant qualifies as a Public Housing Agency and demonstratesthe PHA jurisdiction. This submission must include the relevant enablinglegislation and a supporting opinion from the PHA counsel. The PHA mustsubmit additional information whenever there is a change that affects itsstatus as a PHA or otherwise affects its authority to participate in theHousing Voucher Program, including any changes in the PHA jurisdiction.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.59 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equal opportunity housing plan. </ITAG>(a) A PHA must have a HUD-approved equal opportunity housing plan thatcomplies with the requirements of this section. If the PHA is participatingin the Certificate Program, the PHA must have a combined equal opportunityhousing plan that covers the PHA's entire Housing Voucher Program and CertificateProgram and complies with the requirements of this section and of andSection;882.204(b)(1)of this chapter. (b) The PHA must submit for HUD approval any changes in its HUD-approvedequal opportunity housing plan. (c) The plan must describe the PHA's policies and procedures for_ (1) Outreach to eligible families, and satisfying the requirements of andSection;887.107;(2) Achieving participation by owners of units of suitable price and qualitylocated outside areas of low income or minority concentrations (and outsidethe local jurisdiction in any area where the PHA is not legally barredfrom entering into contracts) and satisfying the requirements of andSection;887.109;(3) Selecting families for participation without discrimination becauseof age, race, color, religion, sex, handicap, or national origin; (4) Assisting housing voucher holders who allege that illegal discriminationis preventing them from leasing suitable units. (d) The plan must include any special rules for use of housing voucherscovered by andSection;887.155(c), HUD-targeted housing vouchers. (e) The plan shall also include a signed certification of the applicant'sintention to comply with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964; TitleVIII of Civil Rights Act of 1968; Executive Order 11063; the Age DiscriminationAct of 1975 and the rehabilitation Act of 1973; and if the housing assistancemay be used within an area of a Housing Assistance Plan, a certificationthat the applicant will take affirmative action to provide opportunitiesto participate in the program to persons expected to reside in the localitybecause of present or planned employment as indicated in the housing assistanceplan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.61 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative plan. </ITAG>(a) A PHA must have a HUD-approved administrative plan that complies withthe requirements of this section. If the PHA is participating in the CertificateProgram, the PHA must have a combined administrative plan that covers thePHA's entire Housing Voucher Program and Certificate Program and complieswith the requirements of this section and of andSection;882.204(b)(3) ofthis chapter. (b) The PHA must submit for HUD approval any changes in its HUD-approvedadministrative plan. (c) The plan must include: (1) A statement of the PHA's overall approach and objectives in administeringthe Housing Voucher Program; (2) A description of the policies concerning the functions for which thePHA has discretion to establish local policies for treatment of applicantsor participants, including: maintaining, closing, and reopening PHA waitinglists; voluntary interjurisdictional mobility of housing voucher holdersissuing, extending, and denying housing vouchers; occupancy standards;preferences; single room occupancy housing; shared housing; collectingamounts owed the PHA; informal reviews and hearings; recertifications;and directing Section 8 program activities in support of local or area-widehousing and community development initiatives. (The administrative planshould not restate HUD-mandated policies and procedures.); (3) A statement that the housing quality standards to be used in the operationof the program will be as set forth in andSection;887.251 (and Subparts Jor K, if applicable), or as set forth in specified HUD-approved variationsin the Acceptability Criteria; and (4) A statement of the number of employees proposed for the program, byposition and functions to be performed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.63 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">HUD review of applications. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Processing applications. </T3>(1) HUD shall send applications for morethan 12 units to the appropriate chief executive officer of the unit ofgeneral local government for review and comment, in accordance with 24CFR Part 791, as required by section 213 of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974. (2) HUD shall evaluate each application on the basis of the requirementsof this part, and shall consider any comments received from the unit ofgeneral local government. HUD shall take into account the PHA's abilityto administer the Housing Voucher Program, as evidenced, in part, by itsperformance in operating the Certificate Programs, where applicable. (b) <T3>Application preferences. </T3>(1) HUD shall give preference to an applicationfrom a PHA that demonstrates locally initiated efforts in support of itsHousing Voucher and Certificate Programs or comparable tenant-based rentalassistance programs. Evaluation of a locality's contribution is measuredcompetitively by the extent to which a locality is able to provide servicesor cash contributions or demonstrate its intention to provide this kindof support in the future, as compared to services or contributions providedby other localities of like program size. (2) HUD may give preference to applications from PHAs that provide familieswith the broadest geographical choice of housing, including interjurisdictionaland interstate housing choice. (3) HUD may give preference to applications from PHAs whose needs previouslyhave been underfunded in relation to the needs of other localities withinthe allocation area. (4) HUD may give preference to applications from PHAs that do not havesufficient housing vouchers or certificates, including turnover, to assistfamilies being displaced or who would have a rent burden greater than 50percent of income, as a result of rental rehabilitation activities underPart 511 of this title. (c) <T3>Approval or disapproval of applications. </T3>(1) HUD shall notifythe PHA of its approval or disapproval the PHA's application.(2) When HUD approves an application, HUD shall notify the PHA of the amountof authority for housing assistance payments and administrative fees andthe number of housing vouchers by bedroom size. HUD may negotiate a shorterleasing schedule with the PHA to further the objective of expeditiouslyleasing units. (3) When HUD disapproves an application, the notice shall include a statementof the reasons. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.65 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">HUD determination to administer a local program under this part. </ITAG>If the Assistant Secretary for Housing determines that there is no PHAorganized or that there is no PHA able and willing to implement the provisionsof this part for an area, HUD (or an entity acting on behalf of HUD) may,under section 8(b)(1) of the 1937 Act, enter into housing voucher contractswith owners and perform the functions otherwise assigned to PHAs underthis part with respect to the area. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Annual Contributions Contract and PHA Responsibilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual contributions contract. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The ACC is the contract between HUD and the PHA. In theACC, the PHA agrees to administer the Housing Voucher Program in the PHAjurisdiction and HUD agrees to pay the PHA amounts approved by HUD foradministrative fees and housing assistance payments. (b) <T3>Items submitted with the ACC. </T3>The following items must be submittedwhen the signed ACC is submitted to HUD or shortly thereafter as requiredby HUD: (1) The PHA's equal opportunity housing and administrative plans or changesin the PHA's existing HUD-approved equal opportunity housing and administrativeplans, developed in accordance with andSection;andSection;887.59 and 887.61,respectively; (2) The PHA's estimates of financial requirements, on HUD-prescribed forms;and (3) The PHA's schedule of utility allowances or any changes in its existingschedule. (c) <T3>HUD review and execution of the ACC. </T3>After HUD approves the itemsspecified in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(3) of this section, HUD signs theACC and returns a completely executed copy to the PHA. (d) <T3>Term of ACC for the funding increment. </T3>The initial contract termfor each funding increment is five years, beginning on the date HUD signsthe ACC or other date as determined by HUD. The initial ACC term for thefunding increment may be extended by written agreement of the PHA and HUD.(e) <T3>Amount of annual contributions. </T3>(1) The maximum total paymentduring the term of the ACC for each funding increment shall not be morethan five times the contract authority for the project as specified inthe ACC. The contract authority for the project shall be the total of_(i) The average HUD-estimated annual PHA administrative fee (as determinedconsistent with andSection;887.103), plus (ii) 115 percent of the amount that HUD estimates would be required inthe first year of the ACC for housing assistance payments to owners, assuminga full year of occupancy. (3) The PHA must administer its Housing Voucher Program in a manner thatwill ensure its operation within the amount contracted for under the ACC.The PHA must take into account the number of families that may be assisted,including consideration of the effect of changes in the applicable paymentstandard, such as adjustments to ensure continued affordability, changesin family income and composition, and portability of housing vouchers.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control numbers2502-0348, and 2577-0067.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative fees paid to PHA. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Three types of fees are paid to the PHA for HUD-approvedcosts to administer the Housing Voucher Program. The three types of feesare discussed below. The specific amounts of these fees are establishedby HUD in accordance with section 8(q) of the 1937 Act in such amountsas are provided in appropriations Acts. (b) <T3>Preliminary fee. </T3>HUD pays a PHA a preliminary fee for actual coststo perform tasks involved in taking families into the program to leasethe number of units that can be supported with a new increment of housingvoucher funding authority. A PHA must document its actual costs. This feecovers expenses incurred in helping families who inquire about or applyfor the program, as well as all of the intake functions associated withusing newly authorized funds. For each funding increment, a PHA receivesa preliminary fees to cover actual expenses incurred by the PHA beforethe housing voucher contract is executed. The preliminary fee equals thelesser of actual expenses approved by HUD for each housing voucher thatresults in an initial lease or housing voucher contract or a maximum amountspecified by HUD for each housing voucher in the PHA's HUD-approved application.(For additional requirements for portable housing vouchers, see andSection;887.563(h).)(c) <T3>Ongoing administrative fee. </T3>The PHA ongoing fee is based on thenumber of units under housing voucher contracts on the first day of eachmonth. The ongoing administrative fee is designed to cover the PHA costof administering assistance on behalf of the program participants. Theongoing administrative fee equals a HUD-specified percentage of the applicablecurrent section 8 Existing Housing Fair Market Rent for two-bedroom units,published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>in accordance with andSection;888.115 of this chapter.(For additional requirements for portable housing vouchers, see andSection;887.563(g).)(d) <T3>Hard-to-house fee. </T3>A hard-to-house fee is provided to cover thecost of special assistance given to a family with three or more minorsto enable the family to find suitable housing. The PHA receives a hard-to-housefee in an amount specified by HUD for special assistance provided to eachfamily with three or more minors that results in a unit coming under leasein the Housing Voucher Program. The PHA qualifies for a hard-to-house feeeach time an eligible family moves and a new housing voucher contract issigned for a different unit. (For additional requirements for portablehousing vouchers, see andSection; 887.563(h).) <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA responsibilities. </ITAG>(a) The PHA must comply with its ACC, the application, applicable HUD regulations,and its HUD-approved administrative plan and HUD-approved equal opportunityhousing plan. (b) The following is a list of activities the PHA must carry out in administeringthe Housing Voucher Program: (1) Publish and disseminate information concerning the availability andnature of housing assistance for lower income families (see andSection;887.107);invite owners to make units available for leasing in the program and developworking relationships with real estate associations and other appropriategroups (see andSection;887.109); explain program procedures to owners, includingthose who have been approached by housing voucher holders; comply withequal opportunity requirements, including efforts to provide opportunitiesfor recipients to seek housing outside areas of economic and racial concentration;(2) Receive, review, and approve or disapprove applications for participation;provide a Federal preference in selecting applicants for participationin accordance with andSection;887.157; determine eligibility for participationand maintain a waiting list; issue a housing voucher to a family; providethe packet described in andSection;887.161 to each housing voucher holder;provide housing information to assisted families and, upon request, referassisted families to appropriate social service agencies; (3) Determine payment standard amounts and adopt and revise the scheduleof payment standards (see andSection;887.351);(4) Review and act on requests for lease approval (see andSection;887.207);inspect at least annually to determine that a unit is being maintainedin compliance with HQS and notify the owner and family of the PHA determination(see andSection;887.257);(5) Determine the amount of, and make, the housing assistance payment (seeandSection;887.353); reexamine the family income and family size and composition,at least annually, and redetermine the amount of the housing assistancepayment (see andSection;887.355-887.359); adjust the amount of the housingassistance payment as a result of an adjustment by the PHA of any applicablepayment standard or utility allowance (see andSection;andSection; 887.353 and887.361); and (6) Administer and enforce the housing voucher contract with an owner,including taking appropriate action, as determined by the PHA, in the caseof noncompliance or default.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.107 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA public notice to encourage participation by eligible families.</ITAG>(a) The PHA must provide notice to the public of the availability of housingassistance. The PHA must provide this notice when it establishes a waitinglist, reopens a waiting list that has been closed, and at other times asmay be necessary to ensure maximum use of the housing assistance.(b) The PHA must announce the availability of assistance in the local newspaperof general circulation, as well as through minority media and other suitablemeans, and must otherwise conform to the PHA's HUD-approved equal opportunityhousing plan and with HUD's fair housing requirements to use the equalhousing opportunity logotype, statement, and slogan.(c) The notice must state that:(1) A family already on the PHA's Section 8 waiting list, even if it wasseeking a Section 8 certificate, is also on the waiting list for housingvoucher assistance and does not need to reapply; and(2) That a family on a waiting list for public housing under the 1937 Actwill not lose its place on that waiting list by applying for assistanceunder the Housing Voucher Program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA activities to encourage participation by owners and others.</ITAG>The PHA must make a concerted effort to elicit participation in the HousingVoucher Program by owners, real estate agents, and other local membershipgroups interested in housing for lower income families.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.111 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Audit requirements.</ITAG>Any PHA receiving financial assistance under this part is subject to theaudit requirements in Part 44 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Selecting Families and Issuing Housing Vouchers</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.151 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility requirements (eligible family).</ITAG>(a) An applicant is eligible for assistance under the Housing Voucher Programif, at the time it initially receives assistance under the program, itqualifies as a family (see Part 812 of this chapter) and:(1) Qualifies as a very-low-income family;(2) Qualifies as a lower income family (other than very low-income) andis physically displaced by rental rehabilitation activity under 24 CFRPart 511; or(3) Has been continuously assisted under the 1937 Act.(b) For purposes of determining housing voucher eligibility, a lower incomefamily that lives in a project undergoing rental rehabilitation activitiesand whose post-rehabilitation rent would not be affordable is not, forthis reason alone, considered ``displaced'', whether or not the familychooses to move.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2577-0083.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.153 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waiting list procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Establishing a waiting list. </T3>Each PHA must establish a waitinglist of applicants for participation in the PHA's program and must maintaina single waiting list for the Housing Voucher and Certificate Programs.(b) <T3>Placing a family on the waiting list. </T3>The PHA may place a familyon its waiting list if the PHA makes a preliminary determination that thefamily is eligible for assistance (andSection;887.151).(c) <T3>Suspending additions to the waiting list. </T3>If there is insufficientfunding authority to admit all eligible applicants to participation inthe PHA's Housing Voucher and Certificate Programs, the PHA at any timemay suspend the accepting or processing of new applications or adding newapplicants to the waiting list, consistent with the procedures identifiedin its HUD-approved administrative plan. Even if the PHA is not acceptingadditional applications for participation because of the length of thewaiting list, the PHA must place the applicant on the waiting list if theapplicant is otherwise eligible for participation and claims that the familyqualifies for a Federal preference as provided in andSection;887.157(c)(2),unless the PHA determines, on the basis of the number of applicants whoare already on the waiting list and who claim a Federal preference, andthe anticipated number of housing vouchers to be issued, that there isan adequate pool of applicants who are likely to qualify for a Federalpreference and it is unlikely that, on the basis of the PHA's system forapplying for the Federal preferences, the preference or preferences thatthe applicant claims, and the preferences claimed by applicants on thewaiting list, the applicant would qualify for assistance before other applicantson the waiting list.(d) <T3>Applicant's rights. </T3>Except with respect to a claim for Federalpreference in accordance with andSection;887.157, nothing in this part isintended to confer on an applicant for participation any right to be listedon the PHA waiting list, to any particular position on the waiting list,to receive a housing voucher, or to participate in the PHA's Housing VoucherProgram. The preceding sentence does not affect or prejudice any right,independent of this part, to bring a judicial action challenging a PHA'sviolation of a constitutional or statutory requirement.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.155 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selecting families and issuing housing vouchers.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1)(i) The PHA must select eligible families for participationin accordance with HUD regulations and requirements and with policies andprocedures stated in its HUD-approved administrative and equal opportunityhousing plans. A PHA must select applicants from its waiting list, exceptas provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section. The PHA must givea preference in selecting applicants for participation (in accordance withandSection;887.157) to eligible families that, at the time they are seekinghousing assistance, are involuntarily displaced, living in substandardhousing, or paying more than 50 percent of family income for rent.(ii) The owner selects the tenant for occupancy of a unit. The PHA maynot establish selection criteria based on the applicant's suitability asa tenant. The PHA's selection of an applicant for participation is nota representation by the PHA to the owner concerning either the family'sexpected behavior as a tenant or its suitability as a tenant.(iii) An applicant on the PHA's section 8 waiting list may refuse the PHA'sinitial offer of a housing voucher, if the family wants to wait for a certificate.The family does not lose its place on the waiting list because of its refusal.(The family also may refuse a PHA's initial offer of a certificate if itwants to wait for a housing voucher.) If the family refuses the secondform of assistance, the PHA may remove the family from the waiting list,if the PHA's HUD-approved administrative plan authorizes such action.(iv) A housing voucher holder may request the PHA to issue the holder acertificate in exchange for the housing voucher. The PHA must exchangethe housing voucher for a certificate if it has certificate assistanceavailable at the time of the request.(2) The PHA may not issue a housing voucher to an applicant unless theapplicant is eligible for assistance (andSection;887.151).(3) The PHA must issue the family a housing voucher for the smallest numberof bedrooms consistent with the PHA's occupancy standards developed underandSection;887.253 and consistently for all families of like composition.(4) The PHA must maintain a system to ensure that the PHA will be ableto make housing assistance payments for all participants within the amountscontracted under the ACC. (See andSection;887.101(e).)(b) <T3>Families affected by rental rehabilitation activities. </T3>(1) A PHAmust issue a housing voucher to any eligible applicant family that is forcedto vacate a unit because of physical construction, housing overcrowding,or a change in use of the unit as a result of rental rehabilitation activitiesunder Part 511 of this title.(2) A PHA may provide a selection preference to a family whose rent wouldbe greater than 30 percent of its adjusted income as a result of rentalrehabilitation activities under Part 511 of this title. A PHA must exercisethis discretionary authority in a manner that is consistent with its obligationswith respect to the Federal preferences. If a PHA provides a housing voucherto a family who falls within this category but is not eligible for a Federalpreference, the family must be counted as part of the not more than 10percent of applicants that may be issued housing vouchers before applicantswho qualify for a Federal preference.(3) HUD will publish, by <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice, modifications to the policies in paragraphs(b)(1) and (2) of this section as may be needed to implement any additionalrequirements imposed through appropriations Acts.(4) The housing vouchers must be issued so as to give families sufficienttime to decide to move (where they are not required to move) and to givethem time to locate other units (where they are required to move or chooseto move).(c) <T3>HUD-targeted housing vouchers. </T3>As a general rule, a PHA may notestablish a selection preference based on the identity or location of thehousing that is occupied by the applicant. HUD, however, may provide aPHA with housing voucher authority to be made available to a class of applicantsbased upon the identity or location of the property occupied by the applicants,if the Assistant Secretary for Housing determines that it furthers a Federalinterest to provide such a housing voucher authority (such as for desegregationpurposes to be used by applicants for, and tenants in, public housing).A PHA must initially use this housing voucher authority for the purposefor which it was provided. (The ``finders-keepers'' policy in andSection;887.201applies to families that are assisted with this housing voucher authority.)(d) <T3>PHA preferences.</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>The PHA may also develop other preferences in the selectionof applicants. A PHA, however, may not establish a preference based onthe identity or location of the housing that <T3>is proposed to be occupied </T3>by the applicant or, except as providedin paragraphs (b)(2) and (c) of this section, that <T3>is occupied </T3>by the applicant.(2) <T3>Applicants living within PHA jurisdiction. </T3>The PHA may establisha selection preference for applicants living within the PHA's jurisdiction.This preference, however, may not be based on the length of time the applicanthas lived in the PHA's jurisdiction. For purposes of this preference, aperson who is working, or who has been notified that he or she has beenhired to work, in the jurisdiction must be treated as living within thePHA's jurisdiction.(e) <T3>Grounds for denying a housing voucher. </T3>The PHA may deny an applicantadmission to participate in the program on the grounds specified in andSection;887.403(b).(f) <T3>Record keeping and record retention. </T3>(1) The PHA must maintainrecords on applicants and participants in order to provide HUD with racial,ethnic, gender, and handicap status data.(2) The PHA must retain for five years a copy of all applications, anynotices to an applicant, and the applicant's responses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.157 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal selection preferences.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) In selecting applicants for a housing voucher underandSection;887.155, a PHA must give preference to families that are otherwiseeligible for assistance and that, at the time they are seeking housingassistance, are involuntarily displaced, living in substandard housing,or paying more than 50 percent of family income for rent.(2) The PHA must inform applicants of the availability of the Federal preferencesunder paragraph (a)(1) of this section, and must give all applicants anopportunity to show that they qualify for a preference. For purposes ofthis paragraph (a)(2), applicants include families on any waiting listfor a housing voucher maintained by the PHA.(3) PHAs must apply the definitions of ``standard, permanent replacementhousing''; ``involuntary displacement''; ``substandard housing''; ``homelessfamily''; ``family income'' and `rent'' set forth in paragraphs (c)(5),(d), (f), (h), and (i), respectively of this section, unless the PHA submitsalternative definitions for HUD's review and approval. PHAs may apply theverification procedures contained in paragraphs (e), (g), and (j) of thissection, or they may, in their own discretion and without HUD approval,adopt verification procedures of their own.(4) For purposes of this section, the term ``Federal preference'' meansa tenant selection preference provided under this section. The term ``preference''means a Federal preference, unless the context indicates otherwise.(b) <T3>Applying the preferences. </T3>(1) Each PHA must include the Federalpreferences in its policies and procedures for selecting applicants forparticipation under andSection;887.155. The PHA must apply the Federal preferencesin a manner that is consistent with the provisions of this section, thenondiscrimination requirements of andSection;887.5, the selection and participationprovisions of andSection;887.155 (including limitations on the use of localresidency requirements and preferences contained in andSection;887.155(d)(2))and other applicable requirements.(2)(i) Except as provided in paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section, thePHA must establish a system for applying the Federal preferences that providethat an applicant who qualifies for any of the Federal preferences is tobe issued a housing voucher before any other applicant who is not so qualified,without regard to the other applicant's qualification for one or more preferencesor priorities that are not provided by Federal law, place on the waitinglist, or the time of submission of an application for a housing voucher.(ii) The PHA's system for applying the Federal preferences may providefor circumstances in which applicants who do not qualify for a Federalpreference are issued housing vouchers before other applicants who areso qualified. Not more than 10 percent of the applicants who are initiallyissued a housing voucher or certificate in any one-year period (or suchshorter period selected by the PHA before the beginning of its first fullyear under this paragraph (b)(2)(ii) may be applicants referred to in thepreceding sentence.(iii) In applying the preferences under this paragraph (b)(2), the PHAmay determine the relative weight to be accorded the Federal preferences,through means such as:(A) Applying non-Federal preferences or priorities as a way of selectingtenants from among those who qualify for a preference (<T3>e.g.,</T3> provide that applicants who qualify for a Federal preferenceand a local residency preference take precedence over non-resident Federalpreference holders; or provide the applicants whose rents were increasedbeyond 50 percent of their incomes after completion of rental rehabilitationactivities are ranked higher than those who meet the rent burden standardbecause of other reasons);(B) Aggregating the Federal preferences (<T3>i.e.,</T3> two Federal preferences outweigh one and three outweightwo);(C) Ranking the Federal preferences (<T3>e.g.,</T3> provide that an applicant living in substandard housinghas greater need for housing than_and, therefore, would be considered forassistance before_an applicant paying more than 50 percent of income forrent); or(D) Ranking the Federal preferences' definitional elements (<T3>e.g.,</T3> provide that those living in housing that is dilapidatedor has been declared unfit for habitation by an agency or unit of governmenthave a greater need for housing than those whose housing is substandardonly because it does not have a usable bathtub or shower inside the unitfor the exclusive use of the family).(3) Any selection preferences or priorities under this section or otherwisethat are used by a PHA must be established and administered in a mannerthat is not incompatible with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964,42 U.S.C. 2000d; Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C.3601-19; Executive Order 11063 on Equal Opportunity in Housing, 27 FR 11527(1962), <T3>as amended,</T3> 46 FR 1253 (1980); section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794; the Age Discrimination Act of 1975, 42 U.S.C.6101-07; or HUD's regulations and requirements issued under these authorities.Such preferences and priorities must also be consistent with HUD's affirmativefair housing objectives.(4) The PHA must submit to HUD any selection preference system that usesa local residency preference, for review for consistency with the requirementsof paragraph (b)(3), but HUD approval is not required before the PHA mayimplement the system.(c) <T3>Qualifying for a Federal preference. </T3>(1) An applicant qualifiesfor a Federal preference if_(i) The applicant has been involuntarily displaced and is not living instandard, permanent replacement housing or, within no more than six monthsfrom the date of certification under paragraph (c)(2) of this section orverification under paragraph (c)(3) of this section (as appropriate), theapplicant will be involuntarily displaced;(ii) The applicant is living in substandard housing; or(iii) The applicant is paying more than 50 percent of family income forrent. In the case of an applicant occupying a unit that has been or is beingrehabilitated under the Rental Rehabilitation Program (see 24 CFR Part511), the applicant will be considered as paying more than 50 percent ofits income for rent if the applicant has been notified that following completionof rehabilitation its rent will be increased, and the applicant in factwould be required, no later than 60 days from the date the applicant isissued a housing voucher under this part, to pay more than 50 percent ofits income to continue renting the rehabilitation unit.(2) Applicants may claim qualification for a Federal preference when theyapply for a housing voucher (or thereafter until a housing voucher is issued)by certifying to the PHA that they qualify for preferred status under paragraph(c)(1) of this section. The PHA must accept this certification, unlessit verifies that the applicant is not qualified for preferred status.(3) Before issuing a housing voucher to an applicant that qualifies forone on the basis of a Federal preference, the PHA must require the applicantto provide verification that the family qualifies for preferred statusunder paragraph (c)(1) of this section by virtue of the applicant's currentstatus. The applicant's current status must be determined without regardto whether there has been a change in the applicant's preferred qualificationfor a Federal preference between the certification under paragraph (c)(2)of this section and the issuance of a housing voucher including a changefrom one Federal preference category to another.(4) If an applicant's qualification for a Federal preference under paragraph(c)(1) of this section has once been verified, the PHA need not requirethe applicant to verify such qualification again, unless, as determinedby the PHA, such a long time has elapsed since verification as to makereverification desirable, or the PHA has reasonable grounds to believethat the applicant no longer qualifies for a Federal preference.(5) For purposes of this paragraph (c), ``standard, permanent replacementhousing'' is housing: that is decent, safe, and sanitary; that is adequatefor the family size; and that the family is occupying pursuant to a leaseor occupancy agreement. Such housing does not include transient facilities,such as motels, hotels, or temporary shelters for victims of domestic violenceor homeless families, and in the case of domestic violence referred toin paragraph (d)(2), does not include the housing unit in which the applicantand the applicant's spouse or other member of the household who engagesin such violence live.(6) An applicant may not qualify for a Federal preference under paragraph(c)(1)(iii) of this section if the applicant is paying more than 50 percentof family income to rent a unit because the applicant's housing assistanceunder the United States Housing Act of 1937, or section 101 of the Housingand Urban Development Act of 1965 with respect to that unit has been terminatedas a result of its refusal to comply with applicable program policies andprocedures with respect to the occupancy of underoccupied and overcrowdedunits. (For examples of these policies and procedures, see andSection;andSection;215.65, 880.605, 881.605, 882.213, 882.509, 883.706, 884.219, 886.125,and 886.325.)(d) <T3>Definition of involuntary displacement. </T3> (1) An applicant is orwill be involuntarily displaced if the applicant has vacated or will haveto vacate his or her housing unit as a result of one or more of the followingactions:(i) A disaster, such as a fire or flood, that results in the uninhabitabilityof an applicant's unit;(ii) Activity carried on by an agency of the United States or by any Stateor local governmental body or agency in connection with code enforcementor a public improvement or development program; or(iii) Action by a housing owner that results in an applicant's having tovacate his or her unit, where:(A) The reason for the owner's action is beyond an applicant's abilityto control or prevent;(B) The action occurs despite an applicant's having met all previouslyimposed conditions of occupancy; and(C) The action taken is other than a rent increase.(2) An applicant is also involuntarily displaced if_(i) The applicant has vacated its housing unit as a result of actual orthreatened physical violence directed against the applicant or one or moremembers of the applicant's family by a spouse or other member of the applicant'shousehold; or(ii) The applicant lives in a housing unit with such an individual whoengages in such violence. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For purposes of the preceding sentence, the actual or threatened violencemust, as determined by the PHA in accordance with HUD's administrativeinstructions, have occurred recently or be of a continuing nature.(3) For purposes of paragraph (d)(1)(iii) of this section, reasons foran applicant's having to vacate a housing unit include, but are not limitedto, conversion of an applicant's housing unit to non-rental or non-residentialuse closure of an applicant's housing unit for rehabilitation or for anyother reason; notice to an applicant that the applicant must vacate a unitbecause the owner wants the unit for the owner's personal or family useor occupancy; sale of a housing unit in which an applicant resides underan agreement that the unit must be vacant when possession is transferred;or any other legally authorized act that results or will result in thewithdrawal by the owner of the unit or structure from the rental market.Such reasons do not include the vacating of a unit by a tenant as a resultof actions taken because of the tenant's refusal to comply with applicableprogram policies and procedures under this title with respect to the occupancyof underoccupied and overcrowded units or to accept a transfer to anotherhousing unit in accordance with a court decree or in accordance with suchpolicies and procedures under a HUD-approved desegregation plan.(e) <T3>Verification procedures for applicants involuntarily displaced. </T3>Verificationof an applicant's involuntary displacement is established by the followingdocumentation:(1) Written notice from a unit or agency of government that an applicanthas been or will be displaced as a result of a disaster, as defined inparagraph (d)(1)(i) of this section;(2) Written notice from a unit or agency of government that an applicanthas been or will be displaced by government action, as defined in paragraph(d)(1)(ii) of this section;(3) Written notice from an owner or owner's agent that an applicant hasto or will have to vacate a unit by a date certain because of an owneraction referred to in paragraph (d)(1)(iii) of this section; or(4) Written confirmation of displacement because of the domestic violencereferred to in paragraph (d)(2) of this section, from the local policedepartment, social services agency, or court of competent jurisdiction,or a clergymen, physician, or public or private facility that providesshelter or counseling to the victims of domestic violence.(f) <T3>Definition of substandard housing. </T3>(1) A unit is substandard ifit:(i) Is dilapidated;(ii) Does not have operable indoor plumbing;(iii) Does not have a usable flush toilet inside the unit for the exclusiveuse of a family;(iv) Does not have a usable bathtub or shower inside the unit for the exclusiveuse of a family;(v) Does not have electricity, or has inadequate or unsafe electrical service;(vi) Does not have a safe or adequate source of heat;(vii) Should but does not, have a kitchen; or(viii) Has been declared unfit for habitation by an agency or unit or government.(2) For purposes of paragraph (f)(1) of this section, a housing unit isdilapidated if it does not provide safe and adequate shelter, and in itspresent condition endangers the health, safety, or well-being of a family,or it has one or more critical defects, or a combination of intermediatedefects in sufficient number or extent to require considerable repair orrebuilding. The defects may involve original construction, or they mayresult from continued neglect or lack of repair or from serious damageto the structure.(3) For purposes of this paragraph (f), an applicant that is a ``homelessfamily'' is living in substandard housing. For purposes of the precedingsentence, a ``homeless family'' includes any individual or family that:(i) Lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence; and(ii) Has a primary nighttime residence that is:(A) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to providetemporary living accommodations (including welfare hotels, congregate shelters,and transitional housing for the mentally ill);(B) An institution that provides a temporary residence for individualsintended to be institutionalized; or(C) A public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as,a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. A ``homeless family''does not include any individual imprisoned or otherwise detained pursuantto an Act of the Congress or a State law.(4) For purposes of paragraph (f)(1) of this section, Single Room Occupancy(SRO) Housing (as defined in andSection; 887.481) is not substandard solelybecause it does not contain sanitary or food preparation facilities (orboth).(g) <T3>Verification procedures for applicants living in substandard housing.</T3>Verification that an applicant is living in substandard housing consistsof a written statement or notice from a unit or agency of government orfrom an applicant's present landlord that the applicant's unit has oneor more of the deficiencies listed in, or the unit's condition is as describedin, paragraph (f) (1) or (2) of this section. In the case of a ``homelessfamily'' (as described in paragraph (f)(3) of this section), verificationconsists of written confirmation of this status from a public or privatefacility that provides shelter for such individuals, or from the localpolice department or social services agency.(h) <T3>Definition of family income. </T3>For purposes of this section, familyincome is Monthly Income, as defined in 24 CFR 813.102.(i) <T3>Definition of rent.</T3> For purposes of this section, rent is definedas:(1)(i) The actual amount due, calculated on a monthly basis, under a leaseor occupancy agreement between a family and the family's current landlord;and (ii) In the case of utilities purchased directly by tenants from utilityproviders,(A) The utility allowance (if any) determined for the Housing Voucher Programand the Certificate Program, for tenant-purchased utilities (except telephone)and the other housing services that are normally included in rent; or(B) If the family chooses, the average monthly payments that it actuallymade for these utilities and services for the most recent 12-month periodor if information is not obtainable for the entire period, for an appropriaterecent period.(2) For purposes of calculating rent under this paragraph (i), amountspaid to or on behalf of a family under any energy assistance program mustbe subtracted from the otherwise applicable rental amount, to the extentthat they are not included in the family's income.(3) In the case of an applicant who owns a manufactured home, but who rentsthe space upon which it is located, rent under this paragraph (i) includesthe monthly payment to amortize the purchase price of the home, calculatedin accordance with HUD's requirements.(4) In the case of an applicant who resides within the jurisdiction ofan Indian Housing Authority (IHA) that is not administering a Section 8Existing Housing Program, the applicable utility allowance for purposesof calculating rent under paragraph (i)(1)(ii)(A) of this section, willbe determined under 24 CFR 965, Subpart E.(5) In the case of members of a cooperative, rent under this paragraph(i) means the charges under the occupancy agreement between the membersand the cooperative.(j) <T3>Verification of an applicant's income and rent. </T3>The PHA must verifythat an applicant is paying more than 50 percent of family income for rent,as follows:(1) The PHA must verify a family's income in accordance with the standardsand procedures that it uses to verify income for the purpose of determiningapplicant eligibility and Total Tenant Payment under 24 CFR Part 813 provisions.(2) The PHA must verify the amount due to the family's landlord (or cooperative)under the lease or occupancy agreement by requiring the family to furnishcopies of its most recent rental (or cooperative) receipts (which may includecancelled checks or money order receipts) or a copy of the family's currentlease or occupancy agreement, or by contacting the landlord (or cooperative)or its agent directly. The PHA must verify the amount paid to amortizethe purchase price of a manufactured home by requiring the family to furnishcopies of its most recent payment receipts (which may include cancelledchecks or money order receipts) or a copy of the family's current purchaseagreement, or by contacting the lienholder directly.(3) To verify the actual amount a family paid for utilities and other housingservices, the PHA must require the family to provide copies of the appropriatebills or receipts, or must obtain the information directly from the utilityor service supplier.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In the case of an applicant occupying a unit that has been or is beingrehabilitated under the Rental Rehabilitation Program (see 24 CFR Part511), the applicant will be considered as paying more than 50 percent ofits income for rent if the applicant has been notified that following completionof rehabilitation its rent will be increased, and the applicant in factwould be required, no later than 60 days from the date the applicant isissued a housing voucher under this part, to pay more than 50 percent ofits income to continue renting the rehabilitated unit.(k) <T3>Notice and opportunity for a meeting where Federal preference is denied.</T3>If the PHA determines that an applicant does not meet the criteria forreceiving a Federal preference, the PHA must promptly provide the applicantwith written notice of the determination. The notice must contain a briefstatement of the reasons for the determination, and state that the applicanthas the right to meet with the PHA's designee to review it. The meetingmust be conducted by any person or persons designated by the PHA, who maybe an officer or employee of the PHA, including the person who made orreviewed the determination or his or her subordinate. The procedures specifiedin this paragraph (k) must be carried out in accordance with HUD's requirements.The applicant may exercise other rights if the applicant believes thatthe applicant has been discriminated against on the basis of race, color,religion, sex, national origin, age, or handicap.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.159 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibition against double subsidy.</ITAG>A family may not receive the benefit of housing voucher assistance whilereceiving one of the following: other section 8 or section 23 housing assistance;section 101 rent supplements; section 236 rental assistance payments; orother duplicative Federal (e.g., FmHA section 521 program), State, or localhousing subsidy, as determined by HUD.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.161 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing voucher packet.</ITAG>When the PHA gives a housing voucher to a family for the first time, italso must give the family a housing voucher packet, which includes thefollowing:(a) Information on how the PHA computes the family's housing assistancepayment (see andSection; 887.353);(b) A copy of the form of request for lease approval;(c) Information on required and prohibited lease provisions (see andSection;887.209);(d) Fair housing information and housing discrimination forms, as prescribedby HUD;(e) Information on lead-based paint poisoning hazards, symptoms and prevention,the availability of blood lead level screening (including its advisabilityfor children under seven years of age), and HUD's requirements for inspecting,testing, and, in certain circumstances, abating lead-based paint;(f) Information on the rental rehabilitation projects that may be possiblesources of housing units;(g) Information on the PHA's procedures for conducting informal hearingsfor participants, including a description of the circumstance in whichthe PHA is required to provide the opportunity for an informal hearing(see andSection; 887.405) and of the procedures for requesting a hearing;and(h) Information on the circumstances under which a family may request anexception to the PHA's occupancy standards established under andSection;887.253.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.163 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA briefing of families.</ITAG>When the PHA gives a housing voucher to a family for the first time, itmust explain the Housing Voucher Program. At a minimum, the briefing mustinclude information on the following:(a) Family and owner responsibilities under the lease and housing vouchercontract;(b) The housing quality standards;(c) An explanation of the payment standards, how the housing assistancepayment is computed, the incentive for selecting a unit renting for lessthan the payment standard, and the minimum rent the family must pay:(d) An explanation of portability;(e) An explanation of how the principal features of the Housing VoucherProgram differ from the Certificate Program;(f) An explanation of the effect on the family's position on the waitinglist if the family refuses to accept the type of assistance offered;(g) The general locations and characteristics of the full range of neighborhoodsin which the PHA is able to execute housing voucher contracts and in whichunits of suitable price and quality may be found.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.165 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Term of the housing voucher.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial term.</T3> The initial term of a housing voucher is 60 days.(b) <T3>Extension of term.</T3> The PHA has the discretion to extend the termof a housing voucher one or more times for a total of not more than 60additional days (for a total term of not more than 120 days). In decidingwhether or not to extend the housing voucher, the PHA must consider thefollowing:(1) What kind of efforts the family has made to find a suitable dwelling;and(2) Whether there is a reasonable possibility that the family may, withthe additional advice or assistance, if any, find a suitable unit.(c) <T3>Interchangeability.</T3> If the housing voucher was issued in exchangefor a certificate (see andSection; 887.155(a)(1)(iv)), the initial term andthe extended term, if applicable, are measured from the date the certificatewas issued.(d) <T3>Submitting request for lease approval.</T3> The family must submita request for lease approval to the PHA during the term of the housingvoucher.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.167 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Continued participation when a family wants to move within the PHA'sjurisdiction.</ITAG>If a participant in the PHA's Housing Voucher Program notifies the PHAthat the family wants another housing voucher so the family can move toanother unit within the PHA's jurisdiction, the PHA must:(a) Issue another housing voucher unless the PHA does not have sufficientfunding for continued assistance for the family; or(b) Refuse to issue another housing voucher in accordance with andSection;887.403.<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart E_Finding and Leasing a Unit and Terminating Tenancy</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">``Finders-keepers'' policy.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Family's options.</T3> A family with a housing voucher is responsiblefor finding a housing unit suitable to the family's needs and desires inthe PHA's jurisdiction (including the receiving PHA's jurisdiction whenthe family is participating under the portability procedures in SubpartL of this part). A family may select the dwelling unit it already occupiesif the unit is approvable.(b) <T3>PHA assistance.</T3> (1) Upon request, the PHA may assist a familyin finding a unit, where because of age, handicap, large family size, orother reasons, the family is unable to locate an approvable unit.(2) The PHA also must provide assistance where the family alleges thatillegal discrimination, on grounds of race, color, religion, sex, nationalorigin, age, or handicap is preventing it from finding a suitable unit.In this case, the PHA must provide the family with a copy of the HUD-prescribedform for use in filing a housing discrimination complaint. This assistancemust be in compliance with the PHA's administrative and equal opportunityhousing plans.(3) Neither in assisting a family in finding a unit nor by any other actionmay the PHA directly or indirectly reduce the family's opportunity to chooseamong the available units in the housing market. (See also the requiredportability procedures in Subpart L of this part.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible and ineligible housing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Eligible housing.</T3> Any ``existing'' dwelling unit determined tobe in decent, safe, and sanitary condition is eligible for use in the HousingVoucher Program, except for the types of housing listed in paragraph (b)of this section.(b) <T3>Ineligible housing.</T3> The following types of housing are not eligiblefor use in the Housing Voucher Program:(1) A unit that is receiving other assistance under the 1937 Act, exceptassistance under section 17 of the Act (the Housing Development Grant andRental Rehabilitation programs);(2) A unit that is owned or otherwise substantially controlled by the PHAadministering the ACC under this part, including a PHA that is either theinitial PHA or receiving PHA under the portability provisions of SubpartL of this part;(3) Nursing homes, units within the grounds of penal, reformatory, medical,mental, and similar public or private institutions; and facilities providingcontinual psychiatric, medical, or nursing services;(4) A unit that is occupied by its owner (including the owner of a manufacturedhome leasing a manufactured home space), except for a cooperative or mutualhousing unit or a shared housing unit described in andSection; 887.511(a)(2).(5) A housing unit used as transitional housing in the Department's TransitionalHousing Demonstration Program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program information to owners.</ITAG>A PHA must respond to inquiries from a unit owner who has been approachedby a housing voucher holder. At a minimum, the PHA must be prepared todiscuss with the owner the major program procedures, including the requiredand prohibited lease provisions, the lease approval procedure, the inspectionto verify compliance with housing quality standards, the terms of the housingvoucher contract, and the payment procedures. The PHA also must providethe owner with all necessary forms.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA approval of unit and lease.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for lease approval.</T3> The lease must be approved by thePHA. If a family has found a unit it wants and the owner is willing tolease, the family must submit to the PHA a request for lease approval signedby the owner of the unit and the family, and a copy of the proposed leasefor the unit. The lease must be in accordance with andSection; 887.209 andmust be complete except for execution. (The request for lease approvalmust be submitted during the term of the housing voucher (see andSection;887.165)).(b) <T3>Approval of lease.</T3> The PHA may approve the lease and unit onlyif:(1) <T3>Lease complete.</T3> The lease complies with the requirements of andSection;887.209; and(2) <T3>Unit meets HQS.</T3> The unit meets the applicable housing qualitystandards.(c) <T3>PHA inspection of unit.</T3> The PHA must inspect the unit to determineif it meets the housing quality standards.(d) <T3>Disapproval.</T3> The PHA must notify the family and owner if the unitand lease are not approved.(e) <T3>Procedure after approval.</T3> (1) If the unit and lease are approved,the PHA must provide the owner two copies of the housing voucher contractfor signature by the owner.(2) The family and the owner sign the lease and the owner provides a copyof the signed lease to the family and the PHA;(3) The owner signs both copies of the housing voucher contract and providesthem to the PHA for execution; and(4) The PHA executes both copies of the housing voucher contract and returnsone to the owner.(f) <T3>Record retention.</T3> The PHA must keep the following in its files:(1) Each request for lease approval;(2) The inspection reports as provided for in andSection; 887.259;(3) The notice that the lease is approved or disapproved;(4) A copy of the executed lease; and(5) The executed housing voucher contract.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control numbers2502-0185, and 2502-0350)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lease between unit owner and family.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> A lease to be signed by the owner and family must beapproved by the PHA. Before the PHA approves the lease, the PHA must determinethat the lease meets the requirements of this section. The lease must includeall provisions required by HUD and may not contain any provisions prohibitedby HUD.(b) <T3>Rent provisions.</T3> In general, under the Housing Voucher Program,the rent to owner is a matter of negotiation between the owner and thefamily. The PHA must provide guidance and advice to the family on whetherthe rent requested by the owner is reasonable, based on information thePHA has for comparable rental units. If requested by the family, the PHAmust also assist the family in negotiating a reasonable rent with the owner.(1) <T3>Rent increases.</T3> The rent to owner may not be increased duringthe first year of the lease. The lease may provide that the owner may increasethe rent at any time after the first anniversary of the lease, but theowner must give the tenant and the PHA 60 days written notice of any increasebefore it takes effect.(2) <T3>Section 236 and Section 515 projects. </T3>In the case of insured ornoninsured section 236 units or FmHA Section 515 units, having only interestreduction subsidy, the rent to owner for a housing voucher participantmust be the lesser of the market rent for the unit, as approved by HUDor FmHA, or the payment standard, but not less than basic rent. (3) <T3>Rent reasonableness. </T3>The PHA may disapprove a lease for a rentthat is not reasonable, based on rents charged for comparable rental units.PHAs may exercise this authority in communities where the market is notfunctioning normally or where some families are not able to negotiate reasonablerents on their own (for example, where there is a concentration of ownershipby a small number of landlords, or where rents charged to voucher holdersare greater than rents charged to certificate holders living in comparableunits). A PHA must document each case in which it disapproves a lease becausethe rent is not reasonable. (c) <T3>Term of lease and housing voucher contract. </T3>(1) <T3>Term of housing voucher contract. </T3>The term of the housing vouchercontract must begin on the first day of the term of the lease and mustend on the last day of the term of the lease. (2) <T3>Term of lease. </T3>(i) The term of the lease begins on a date statedin the lease and continues until: (A) A termination of the housing voucher contract by the PHA; (B) A termination of the lease by the family in accordance with the leaseor by mutual agreement during the term of the lease. The lease must permita termination of the lease by the family without cause, at any time afterthe first year of the term of the lease, on not more than 60 days writtennotice by the family to the owner; or (C) A termination of the lease by the owner. The owner may not terminatetenancy except as provided in andSection; 887.213. (ii) The term of the lease must begin at least one year before the endof the term of the last funding increment under the ACC. (iii) The housing voucher contract and the lease shall end if the PHA determines,in accordance with procedures prescribed by HUD, that funding under theACC is insufficient to support continued assistance. (iv) During the term of the lease, the amount of the housing assistancepayment may change (see andSection; 887.353). (v) The owner may offer the family a new lease for execution by the familyafter approval by the PHA for a term beginning at any time after the firstyear of the lease. The owner must give the tenant written notice of theoffer, with a copy of the PHA, at least 60 days before the proposed beginningdate of the new lease term. The offer may specify a reasonable time limitfor acceptance by the family. (d) <T3>Prohibited lease terms. </T3>The lease may not contain any of the followingprovisions: (1) <T3>Agreement to be sued. </T3>Agreement by the tenant to be sued, to admitguilt, or to a judgment in favor of the owner in a lawsuit brought in connectionwith the lease; (2) <T3>Treatment of property. </T3>Agreement by the tenant that the ownermay take, hold, or sell personal property of household members withoutnotice to the tenant and a court decision on the rights of the parties.This prohibition, however, does not apply to an agreement by the tenantconcerning disposition of personal property remaining in the dwelling unitafter the tenant has moved out of the unit. The owner may dispose of thispersonal property in accordance with State law; (3) <T3>Excusing owner from responsibility. </T3>Agreement by the tenant notto hold the owner or the owner's agents legally responsible for any actionor failure to act, whether intentional or negligent; (4) <T3>Waiver of notice. </T3>Agreement of the tenant that the owner may institutea lawsuit without notice to the tenant; (5) <T3>Waiver of legal proceedings. </T3>Agreement by the tenant that theowner may evict the tenant or household members: without instituting acivil court proceeding in which the tenant has the opportunity to presenta defense, or before a court decision on the rights of the parties; (6) <T3>Waiver of a jury trial. </T3>Agreement by the tenant to waive any rightto a trial by jury; (7) <T3>Waiver of right to appeal court decision. </T3>Agreement by the tenantto waive the tenant's right to appeal, or to otherwise challenge in court,a court decision in connection with the lease; and (8) <T3>Tenant Chargeable with Cost of Legal Actions Regardless of Outcome.</T3>Agreement by the tenant to pay attorney's fees or other legal costseven if the tenant wins in a court proceeding by the owner against thetenant. The tenant, however, may be obligated to pay costs if the tenantloses. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.211 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Security deposit. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Amount authorized. </T3>The owner may collect a security deposit fromthe family at the time of the initial execution of the lease. The PHA shalladopt a policy for determining the maximum amount of the security depositthat can be collected by an owner. The security deposit may not exceedone month's rent to the owner and may not be unduly high so as to precludeparticipation by program applicants. (b) <T3>Use of security deposit. </T3>When a tenant moves out of the unit,the owner, subject to State or local law, may use the security deposit,including any interest on the deposit, in accordance with the unit lease,as reimbursement for any unpaid rent payable by the tenant or for otheramounts the tenant owes under the lease. The owner must give the tenanta written list of all items charged against the security deposit and theamount of each item. After deducting the amount, if any, used to reimbursethe owner, the owner must refund promptly the full amount of the unusedbalance to the tenant. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.213 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Owner termination of tenancy. </ITAG>(a) The owner may not terminate the tenancy except on the following grounds:(1) Serious or repeated violation of the terms and conditions of the lease;(2) Violation of Federal, State, or local law that imposes obligationson the tenant in connection with the occupancy or use of the dwelling unitand surrounding premises; or (3) Other good cause. (b)(1) The following are some examples of ``other good cause'' for terminationof tenancy by the owner: Failure by the family to accept the offer of anew lease in accordance with andSection; 887.209(c)(2)(v); a family historyof disturbance of neighbors or destruction of property, or of living orhousekeeping habits resulting in damage to the unit or property; criminalactivity by family members involving crimes of physical violence to personsor property; the owner's desire to utilize the unit for personal or familyuse or for a purpose other than use as a residential rental unit; or abusiness or economic reason for termination of the tenancy (such as saleof the property, renovation of the unit, desire to rent the unit at a higherrental). This list of examples is intended as a nonexclusive statementof some situations included in ``other good cause'', but shall in no waybe construed as a limitation on the application of ``other good cause''to situations not included in the list. (2) During the first year of the term of a lease, the owner may not terminatethe tenancy for ``other good cause'', unless the termination is based onfamily malfeasance or nonfeasance. For example, during the first year ofthe term of the lease, the owner may not terminate the tenancy for ``othergood cause'' based on any of the following grounds: Failure by the familyto accept the offer of a new lease; the owner's desire to utilize the unitfor personal or family use or for a purpose other than as a residentialrental unit; or a business or economic reason for termination of the tenancy(such as sale of the property, renovation of the unit, desire to rent theunit at a higher rental). (c) The owner may evict the tenant from the unit only by instituting acourt action. The owner must notify the PHA in writing of the commencementof procedures for termination of tenancy, at the same time that the ownergives notice to the tenant under State or local law. The notice to thePHA may be given by furnishing to the PHA a copy of the notice to the tenant.(d) Any notice under this section may be combined with and run concurrentlywith any notices required under State or local law. (e) Part 247 of this title does not apply to a tenancy assisted under theHousing Voucher Program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.215 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amounts recoverable under the lease. </ITAG>(a) If the family moves from the unit, the owner may claim reimbursementfrom the PHA for any amount the family owes under the lease (up to onemonth's rent to the owner) minus the maximum security deposit the ownercould have collected under andSection; 887.211. (b) Any reimbursement under this section must be applied, first, towardany unpaid rent due under the lease, and then to any other amounts owedunder the lease. An owner may not claim reimbursement for unpaid rent forthe period after the family vacates the unit.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2502-0154) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart F_Housing Quality Standards, Periodic Unit Inspection, andMaintenance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.251 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing quality standards (HQS). </ITAG>Housing used in this program must meet the performance requirements inthis section. In addition, the housing must meet the acceptability criteriain this section, unless the PHA proposes variations and these variationsare approved by HUD. Examples that may justify variations include localclimatic or geological conditions or local codes. (a) <T3>Sanitary facilities_</T3>(1) <T3>Performance requirements. </T3>The dwelling unit must include its ownsanitary facilities that are in proper operating condition, can be usedin privacy, and are adequate for personal cleanliness and the disposalof human waste. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>A flush toilet in a separate, privateroom, a fixed basin with hot and cold running water, and a shower or tubwith hot and cold running water must be present in the dwelling unit, andall must be in proper operating condition. These facilities must use anapprovable public or private disposal system. (b) <T3>Food preparation and refuse disposal_</T3>(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must contain suitablespace and equipment to store, prepare, and serve foods in a sanitary manner.There must be adequate facilities and services for the sanitary disposalof food wastes and refuse, including facilities for temporary storage wherenecessary (e.g., garbage cans). (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The unit must contain the following equipmentin proper operating condition: cooking stove or range and a refrigeratorof appropriate size for the unit, supplied by either the owner or the family,and a kitchen sink with hot and cold running water. The sink must draininto an approved public or private system. Adequate space for the storage,preparation, and serving of food must be provided. (c) <T3>Space and security</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must provide the familyadequate space and security. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The dwelling unit must contain a livingroom, kitchen area, and bathroom. The dwelling unit must contain at leastone bedroom or living/sleeping room of appropriate size for each two persons.Persons of opposite sex, other than husband and wife or very young children,may not be required to occupy the same bedroom or living/sleeping room.Exterior doors and windows accessible from outside the unit must be lockable.(d) <T3>Thermal environment</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must have and be capableof maintaining a thermal environment healthy for the human body. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The dwelling unit must contain safe heatingor cooling facilities that are in proper operating condition and can provideadequate heat or cooling, or both, to each room in the dwelling unit appropriatefor the climate to ensure a healthy living environment. Unvented room heatersthat burn gas, oil, or kerosene are unacceptable. (e) <T3>Illumination and electricity</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>Each room must have adequate naturalor artificial illumination to permit normal indoor activities and to supportthe health and safety of occupants. The unit must contain sufficient electricalsources to permit use of essential electrical appliances while ensuringsafety from fire. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>Living and sleeping rooms must includeat least one window. A ceiling or wall type light fixture must be presentand working in the bathroom and kitchen area. At least two electric outlets,one of which may be an overhead light, must be present and operable inthe living area, kitchen area, and each bedroom area. (f) <T3>Structure and materials</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must be structurallysound so as not to pose any threat to the health and safety of the occupantsand to protect the occupants from the environment. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>Ceilings, walls, and floors may not haveany serious defects, such as severe bulging or leaning, large holes, loosesurface materials, severe buckling or noticeable movement under walkingstress, missing parts, or other serious damage. The roof structure mustbe firm and the room must be weathertight. The exterior wall structureand exterior wall surface may not have any serious defects such as seriousleaning, buckling, sagging, cracks or holes, loose siding, or other seriousdamage. The condition and equipment of interior and exterior stairways,halls, porches, walkways may not present a danger of tripping or falling.Elevators must be maintained in safe and operating condition.(g) <T3>Interior air quality</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must be free of pollutantsin the air at levels that threaten the health of the occupants. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The dwelling unit must be free from dangerouslevels of air pollution from carbon monoxide, sewer gas, fuel gas, dust,and other harmful air pollutants. Air circulation must be adequate throughoutthe unit. Bathroom areas must have at least one window that can be openedor other adequate exhaust ventilation. (h) <T3>Water supply</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The water supply must be free from contamination.(2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The unit must be served by an approvablepublic or private sanitary water supply. (i) <T3>Lead Based Paint</T3>_(1) <T3>Purpose and applicability. </T3>The purpose of this paragraph is toimplement the provisions of Section 302 of the Lead-Based Paint PoisoningPrevention Act, 42 U.S.C. 4822, by establishing procedures to eliminateas far as practicable the hazards of lead-based paint poisioning with respectto existing housing units for which requests for lease approval are madeunder this part. This paragraph is promulgated under the authorizationgranted in 24 CFR 35.24(b)(4) and supersedes, with respect to all housingto which it applies, the requirements prescribed by Subpart C of 24 CFRPart 35. The requirements of this paragraph do not apply to 0-bedroom units.The requirements of Subpart A of 24 CFR Part 35 apply to all units constructedprior to 1978 covered by a housing voucher contract under this part. (2) <T3>Definitions. </T3><T3>Applicable surface. </T3>All intact interior and exterior painted surfacesof a residential structure. <T3>Chewable surface. </T3>All chewable protruding painted surfaces upto five feet from the floor or ground, which are readily accessible tochildren under seven years of age <T3>e.g.</T3>, protruding corners, windowsills and frames, doors and frames,and other protruding woodwork. <T3>Defective paint surface. </T3>Paint on applicable surfaces that iscracking, scaling, chipping, peeling, or loose. <T3>Elevated blood level of EBL. </T3>Excessive absorption of lead, thatis, a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of 25 ug/dl (microgramsof lead per deciliter of whole blood) or greater. <T3>Lead-based paint. </T3>A paint surface, whether or not defective, identifiedas having a lead content greater than or equal to 1 mg/cm2. (3) <T3>Defective paint. </T3>In the case of a unit, for a family which includesa child under the age of seven years, which was constructed prior to 1978,the initial inspection under andSection;887.207(c), and each periodic inspectionunder andSection;887.257, shall include an inspection for defective paintsurfaces. If defective paint surfaces are found, treatment as requiredby 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii) shall be required in accordance with andSection;887.207(c)or andSection;887.257, as appropriate. Correction of defective paint conditionsdiscovered at periodic inspection shall be completed within 30 days ofPHA notification to the owner. When weather conditions prevent completionof repainting of exterior surfaces within the 30-day period, repaintingmay be delayed but covering or removal of the defective paint must be completedwithin the prescribed period. (4) <T3>Chewable surfaces. </T3>In the case of a unit constructed prior to1978, for a family which includes a child under the age of seven yearswith an identified EBL condition, the initial inspection under andSection;887.207(c),or a periodic inspection under andSection;887.257, shall include a test forlead-based paint on chewable surfaces. Testing shall be conducted by aState or local health or housing agency, an inspector certified or regulatedby a State or local health or housing agency, or an organization recognizedby HUD. Lead content shall be tested by using an X-ray flourescence analyzer(XRF) or other method approved by HUD. Test readings of 1 mg/cm2 or higherusing an XRF shall be considered positive for presence of lead-based paint.Where lead-based paint on chewable surfaces is identified, covering orremoval of the paint surface in accordance with 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii)shall be required in accordance with andSection;887.207(c) of andSection;887.257,as appropriate, and correction shall be completed within the time limitsin paragraph (i)(3) of this section. (5) <T3>Abatement without testing. </T3>In lieu of the procedures set forthin paragraph (i)(4) of this section, the PHA may at its discretion, foregotesting and require the owner to abate all interior and exterior chewablesurfaces in accordance with the method set out at 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii).(6) <T3>Tenant protection. </T3>The owner shall take appropriate action toprotect tenants from hazards associated with abatement procedures. (7) <T3>Records. </T3>The PHA shall keep a copy of each inspection report forat least three years. If a unit requires testing or if the unit requirestreatment of chewable surfaces based on the testing, the PHA shall keepindefinitely the test results and, if applicable, the owner certificationof treatment. The records shall indicate which chewable surfaces in unitshave been tested and which chewable surfaces in the units have been treated.If records establish that certain chewable surfaces were tested or testedand treated in accordance with the standards prescribed in this section,such chewable surfaces do not have to be tested or treated at any subsequenttime. (j) <T3>Access_</T3>(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The dwelling unit must be able to beused and maintained without unauthorized use of other private properties,and the building must provide an alternate means of egress in case of fire(such as fire stairs or egress through windows). (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>Same as performance requirement. (k) <T3>Site and NeighborhoodT1_(1) </T3><T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The site and neighborhood must be reasonablyfree from disturbing noises and reverberations and other hazards to thehealth, safety and general welfare of the occupants. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The site and neighborhood may not be subjectto serious adverse environmental conditions, natural or manmade, such asdangerous walks, steps, instability, flooding, poor drainage, septic tankback-ups, sewage hazards or mudslides; abnormal air pollution, smoke ordust; excessive noise, vibration or vehicular traffic; excessive accumulationsof trash; vermin or rodent infestation; or fire hazards.(l) <T3>Sanitary condition</T3>_(1) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The unit and its equipment must be insanitary condition. (2) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The unit and its equipment must be freeof vermin and rodent infestation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.253 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Occupancy standards. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The PHA must establish occupancy standards which determinethe number of bedrooms required for families of different sizes and compositions.The PHA's standards must provide for the smallest number of bedrooms necessaryto house a family while avoiding overcrowding; the standards must be consistentwith HUD's housing quality standards concerning space requirements forthe particular type of unit. (b) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>The PHA may grant an exception to its establishedoccupancy standards if it makes a determination that the exception is justifiedby the age, sex, health, handicap, or relationship of family members orother individual circumstances. (c) <T3>Renting unit with more bedrooms than stated on housing voucher. </T3>Regardlessof the number of bedrooms stated on the housing voucher, the PHA may notprohibit a family from renting an otherwise acceptable unit on the groundthat it is too large for the family. (d) <T3>Renting unit with fewer bedrooms than stated on housing voucher. </T3>ThePHA may not prevent a family from renting a unit with fewer bedrooms thanstated in the housing voucher, so long as the unit meets the applicablehousing quality standards space requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.255 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Owner responsibility to maintain the unit. </ITAG>The owner must provide all of the services, utilities, and maintenancethat the owner agrees to provide in the housing voucher contract, subjectto termination of housing assistance payments or other appropriate remediesavailable to the PHA if the owner fails to meet these obligations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.257 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA periodic unit inspection to ensure unit continues to meet HQS.</ITAG>(a) The PHA must inspect the unit leased to a family at least annuallyand at other times as needed to ensure that the owner is meeting the obligationof maintaining the unit in decent, safe and sanitary condition and is providingagreed upon utilities and other services. (b) In scheduling inspections, the PHA must consider complaints and anyother information brought to its attention. (c) Any family complaint that the owner has not complied with the housingquality standards must be retained by the PHA in its files for three years.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2502-0185) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.259 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection reports. </ITAG>The PHA must prepare and retain a report of every inspection made underandSection;andSection;887.207 and 887.257. Each report must specify: (a) Any defects or deficiencies that must be corrected for the unit tomeet the housing quality standards; and (b) Any other defects or deficiencies (for use in the event of a laterclaim by the owner that the defects or deficiencies occurred during theoccupancy of the family).<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2502-0185) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.261 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA recourse if unit does not meet HQS. </ITAG>(a) If the owner fails to maintain the dwelling unit in compliance withHQS, the PHA may exercise any rights and remedies under the housing vouchercontract, including termination of housing assistance payments (even ifthe family continues to occupy the unit) and termination of the housingvoucher contract. The PHA may not make any housing assistance paymentsfor a unit that fails to meet the housing quality standards, unless theowner promptly corrects the defect and the PHA verifies the correction.(b) If the PHA terminates the housing voucher contract, the family mayrequest a housing voucher to find another dwelling unit. The PHA must issuea housing voucher to the family, unless the PHA can deny issuance in accordancewith andSection;887.403. <ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart G_Housing Voucher Contract and Owner Responsibilities </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing voucher contract between PHA and unit owner. </ITAG>(a) The housing voucher contract is a contract between the PHA and an owner,in the form prescribed by HUD. In the contract, the owner agrees to leasea unit to a specified eligible family and the PHA agrees to make housingassistance payments under the Housing Voucher Program to the owner on behalfof that eligible family. Each month the PHA must make a housing assistancepayment to the owner on behalf of the family. The monthly housing assistancepayment by the PHA shall be credited by the owner toward the monthly rentpayable by the family to the owner under the lease. The amount of the monthlyhousing assistance payments to the owner may not exceed the amount of themonthly rent payable by the family to the owner under the lease (and theowner must immediately return any excess payment to the PHA). The PHA hasno duty to pay the owner any balance of the monthly rent in excess of thehousing assistance payment. (b) The housing voucher contract may not be executed until the PHA approvesthe lease and the unit, as provided in andSection;887.207. (c) The requirements concerning the term of the housing voucher contractare set out at andSection;887.209(c). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.303 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Owner responsibilities. </ITAG>The owner is responsible for performing all of the owner's obligationsunder the housing voucher contract and the lease. The owner is responsiblefor_ (a) Performing all management and rental functions for the assisted unit;(b) Performing all ordinary and extraordinary maintenance; (c) Complying with equal opportunity requirements; (d) Preparing and furnishing to the PHA information required under thehousing voucher contract; (e) Collecting family rents; and (f) Paying for utilities and services (unless paid directly by the family).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.305 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contracting out owner functions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>An owner may enter into a management contract with apublic or private entity to perform, for a fee, any obligation of the ownerunder the housing voucher contract and lease. The owner, however, retainsthe ultimate responsibility for meeting these obligations. (b) <T3>Management contract with a PHA. </T3>(1) An owner may enter into acontract with a PHA for the PHA to manage an assisted unit only if thePHA applies for and obtains prior HUD field office approval of the managementcontract.(2) <T3>Application requirements</T3>. The PHA application to HUD consistsof a copy of the proposed management contract and supporting documentationdemonstrating that:  (i) PHA performance of the management functions is necessary to providehousing for eligible families;  (ii) The PHA has or will have the capability to perform adequately themanagement functions for the units as proposed in the application, takinginto consideration the relevant characteristics of the housing and thefamilies, e.g., scattered site or mutifamily projects and elderly, handicapped,or families with children; and   (iii) The management contract meets the conditions of paragraphs (b) (3)and (4) of this section.  (3) <T3>Contract term and termination clause</T3>. The proposed managementcontract term must be limited to one year. The proposed management contractmust include a clause that allows either party to terminate, or HUD torequire termination of, the contract on 90 days advance written notice.Both of these clauses are designed to enable all interested parties, includingHUD, to evaluate the effectiveness of the contract. (4) <T3>Management fee</T3>. The amount of the management fee must be negotiatedbetween the owner and the PHA and must be approved by HUD. The provisionson the management fee must reflect the following:  (i) The compensation must be a fixed fee to cover all routine managementservices, including routine legal services and local travel.  (ii) The fee must be specified as dollars per unit. (iii) The fee must be sufficient to pay the PHA for providing the services,including the pro rata share of overhead and other indirect costs.  (iv) Cost of non-routine items such as taxes, insurance, utilities or non-routinerepairs and replacements must be paid to the PHA in addition to the fixedfee.  (v) The fee must be reasonable as measured against fees paid to privatefirms in similar management situations, such as management of other section8 or FHA projects. (c) <T3>HUD review. </T3>When the owner contracts with the PHA to provide managementservices, the PHA will be managing units for which it also functions ascontract administrator. Thus, the PHA will be supervising and evaluatingits own activities. To ensure that both the owner and the PHA comply withthe terms and conditions of the housing voucher contract and the ACC, theHUD Field Office will review project operations, including one or moreinspections of the unit.  (d) <T3>PHA records</T3>. A PHA that contracts with and owner under the provisionsof this section must keep separate accounts and records of its managementfunction activities performed to meet its contractual obligations. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Payment Standard and Housing Assistance Payment </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.351 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determining the payment standard and the payment standard schedule. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Payment standard amount</T3>. (1) The payment standard is an amountused to calculate the monthly housing assistance payment. (Section 887.353states how to calculate the monthly amount of the housing assistance.) (2) Each payment standard amount is based on the published Section 8 ExistingHousing fair market rent. The PHA must establish a separate payment standardamount by unit size (single room occupany, zero-bedroom, one-bedroom, etc.)for each fair market rent area within its jurisdiction.  (b) <T3>Payment standard schedule</T3>. (1) The payment standard schedule isa list of the payment standard amounts for each unit size in a fair marketrent area in the PHA's jurisdiction. A PHA must adopt and maintain a paymentstandard schedule for each fair market rent area in the PHA jurisdiction.A PHA may have only one payment standard schedule for each fair marketrent area. Each payment standard schedule may have only one payment standardamount for each unit size in the fair market rent area.  (2) Each payment standard amount on the schedule may not be less than 80percent of the published Section 8 Existing Housing fair market rent (ineffect when the payment standard amount is adopted) for the unit size,nor more than the fair market rent of HUD-approved community-wide exceptionrent (in effect when the payment standard amount is adopted) for the unitsize. (Community-wide exception rents are maximum gross rents approvedby HUD for the Certificate Program under andSection; 882.106(a)(3) of thischapter for a designated municipality, county, or similar locality, whichapply to the whole PHA jurisdiction.)  (c) <T3>Increasing payment standard amounts on the payment standard schedule</T3>.The PHA, in its discretion, may adopt annual increases of payment standardamounts on the payment standard schedule so that families can continueto afford to lease units with assistance under the Housing Voucher Program. (d) <T3>Decreasing payment standard amounts on the payment standard schedule</T3>.When revised Section 8 Existing Housing fair market rents are publishedfor effect in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and any fair market rent or HUD-approved community-wideexception rent is lower than the corresponding payment standard amounton the PHA's payment standard schedule, the PHA must adopt a new paymentstandard amount not more than the revised FMR or the HUD-approved community-wideexception rent. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.353 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determining housing assistance payments amounts. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General_</T3>(1) <T3>Using the payment standard. </T3>A PHA uses the payment standard scheduleto determine the appropriate payment standard for a particular family,based on the family size and composition and the PHA occupancy standards.Once the PHA determines the appropriate payment standard amount from theschedule, the PHA subtracts 30 percent of the family's monthly adjustedincome (as computed under Part 813) to arrive at the monthly housing assistancepayments that the PHA will make to the owner on behalf of the family. (Forexample, if a family qualifies for a four-bedroom housing voucher underthe PHA occupancy standards and has monthly adjusted income of $500, andthe payment standard amount for a four-bedroom housing voucher is $600,the housing assistance payment for the family is the payment standard amount($600) minus 30 percent of the family's monthly adjusted income ($150)which is $450.) Before entering into a housing voucher contract with theowner for this amount, the PHA must also complete the ``minimum rent''calculation in paragraph (a)(2) of this section.  (2) <T3>Minimum rent. </T3>The housing assistance payment may not be more thanthe amount by which the rent to owner plus any applicable utility allowanceexceeds 10 percent of the family's monthly gross income, determined inaccordance with Part 813. (Except for the minimum rent calculation, actualrent to owner for a unit does not affect the amount of the housing assistancepayment.)  (3) <T3>Shopper's incentive</T3>. If a unit rents for less than the paymentstandard, the family benefits by paying less than 30 percent of its monthlyadjusted income toward rent, subject to the minimum rent calculation. Ita unit rents for more than the payment standard, the housing assistancepayment is not increased, nor is the family told it must find another unit,as in the Certificate Program. Instead, the family pays the entire differencebetween the rent and the housing assistance payment.  (b) <T3>When changes in the payment standard apply to an existing housing assistancepayment</T3>_(1) <T3>General. </T3>The payment standard that is applied to a family maybe changed only:  (i) At regular reexamination (see paragraph (b)(2) of this section); or (ii) At the time a family moves to another unit (see paragraph (b)(3) ofthis section). (2) <T3>Rules at regular reexamination. </T3>At regular reexamination, thePHA must apply a different payment standard if one of the following circumstancesapplies:  (i) If the PHA has increased the payment standard applicable to the family,the increased payment standard is used;  (ii) If the PHA has adopted new occupancy standards, the payment standardfor the appropriate unit size under the PHA's new occupancy standards isused;  (iii) If the family's size or composition has changed, the payment standardfor the appropriate unit size is used.  (3) <T3>Rule when a family moves. </T3>When a family moves to another unit,the PHA must apply a different payment standard if one of the followingcircumstances applies:  (i) If the PHA has increased or decreased the payment standard applicableto the family, the new payment standard is used;  (ii) If the PHA has adopted new occupancy standards, the payment standardfor the appropriate size under the PHA's new occupancy standards is used; (iii) If the family's size or composition has changed, the payment standardfor the appropriate unit size is used. (4) <T3>Request for interim reexamination</T3>. Redetermination of the housingassistance payment as a result of an interim reexamination under andSection;887.357 does not affect the payment standard applicable to the family. (c) <T3>No housing assistance payments for vacancies</T3>. If a family movesout of the unit, the owner must notify the PHA promptly, and the PHA maynot make any additional housing assistance payments to the owner for anymonth after the month during which the family moves. The owner may retainthe housing assistance payment for the month during which the family moves. (d) <T3>When the housing assistance payment exceeds the rent to owner</T3>.Normally, the entire housing assistance payment, determined under paragraph(a)(1) of this section, is paid by the PHA to the owner. When the familymust pay some or all of its utilities directly, however, the housing assistancepayment may occasionally exceed the rent to owner. In this case, the PHAmust pay the excess (subject to the minimum rent determination in paragraph(a)(3) of this section) to the family or, with the consent of the familyand the utility company, either jointly to the family and the utility companyor directly to the utility company. For example, if the payment standardis $500, and 30 percent of a family's monthly adjusted income equals $120,the housing assistance payment would be $380. If the rent to owner is $350,and the utility allowance is $150, the PHA pays $350 to the owner and theremaining $30 of the housing assistance payment to the family as a utilityreimbursement. (e) <T3>Assisting more families</T3>. If a PHA determines that some or allof the available annual contributions under its ACC are not needed forparticipating families, including future adjustments of housing assistancepayments and portability moves, it may assist more families. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.355 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Regular reexamination of family income and composition. </ITAG>(a) The PHA must reexamine family income and family size and compositionat least annually, and in accordance with Part 813 of this chapter.  (b) At the regular reexamination, the PHA must adjust the housing assistancepayment made on behalf of the family to reflect any changes in the family'smonthly income, monthly adjusted income, size, or composition. The PHAmust use the appropriate payment standard, as provided in andSection; 887.353.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.357 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interim reexamination of family income and composition.  </ITAG>A family may request a redetermination of the housing assistance payment,at any time, based on a change in the family's income, adjusted income,size, or composition. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.359 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Changes in family size or composition.  </ITAG>(a) If the PHA determines that a unit does not meet the housing qualitystandards because of an increase in family size or a change in family composition,the PHA must issue the family a new housing voucher. The PHA must complywith requirements of andSection; 887.261.  (b) A family may not be required to move because of a decrease in familysize after initial occupancy of a unit. The family may rent a unit witha greater number of bedrooms than indicated on the housing voucher. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.361 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of utility allowances.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Annual review. </T3>At least annually, the PHA must determine: if therehas been a substantial change in utility rates or other charges of generalapplicability that would require an adjustment in any utility allowanceon the PHA's utility allowance schedule; or if there were errors in theoriginal determination of the utility rates or other charges of generalapplicability that would require an adjustment in any utility allowanceson the schedule.  (b) <T3>Required adjustment</T3>. If the PHA determines that an adjustmentis necessary under paragraph (a) of this section, it must establish a newschedule of utility allowances, taking into account the size and type ofdwelling units and other applicable factors.  (c) <T3>Adjustments in housing assistance payments. </T3>The PHA must determineif adjustments to utility allowances affect the amount of housing assistancepaid on behalf of the family by recalculating the minimum rent under andSection;887.353(a)(2).<ITAG tagnum="20">(Information collection requirements contained in this section havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2502-0161.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.363 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing assistance payments equal to zero. </ITAG>(a) Under the formula in andSection; 887.353 for calculating the housingassistance payment on behalf of a family, no housing assistance paymentis made whenever either 30 percent of the family's monthly adjusted incomeequals or exceeds the payment standard or 10 percent of the family's monthlyincome equals or exceeds the rent to owner plus any applicable utilityallowance. Cessation of housing assistance payments does not affect thefamily's other rights under the lease, nor does it prevent the resumptionof payments as the result of later changes in family income, family sizeor composition, or other relevant circumstances during the term of thehousing voucher contract.  (b) When one year has elapsed since the date of the last housing assistancepayment made under the housing voucher contract, the contract terminatesautomatically.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart I_Family Obligations; Denial and Termination of Assistance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.401 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Family responsibilities.  </ITAG>(a) A family must:  (1) Supply any certification, release, information, or documentation thatthe PHA or HUD determines to be necessary in the administration of theprogram, and other information required for use by the PHA in a regularlyscheduled reexamination or interim reexamination of family income and compositionin accordance with HUD requirements;  (2) Allow the PHA to inspect the dwelling unit at reasonable times andafter reasonable notice;  (3) Notify the PHA before vacating the dwelling unit; and  (4) Use the dwelling unit (or in the case of shared housing, the applicableportion of the unit) solely for residence by the family and as the family'sprincipal place of residence.  (b) A family may not:  (1) Sublease or assign the lease or transfer the unit;  (2) Own or have any interest in the dwelling unit, except for a familyassisted in cooperative or mutual housing;  (3) Commit any fraud in connection with the Housing Voucher Program; or (4) Receive duplicative assistance under the Housing Voucher Program whileoccupying, or receiving assistance for occupancy of, any other unit assistedunder any Federal, State or local housing assistance program (includingany Section 8 program). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.403 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grounds for PHA denial or termination of assistance.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Action or inaction by family. </T3>This section states the groundsfor denial of assistance to an applicant and for denial or terminationof assistance to a participant, because of action or inaction by the applicantor participant. The provisions of paragraph of this section do not affectdenial or termination of assistance for grounds other than the action orfailure to act by the family.  (b) <T3>Denial of assistance. </T3>The PHA may deny an applicant admissionto participate in the Housing Voucher Program or, with respect to a currentparticipant, may refuse to issue another housing voucher for a move toanother unit, approve a new lease, or execute a new housing voucher contract,if the applicant or participant:  (1) Has violated any family obligation under the Housing Voucher Programor the Certificate Program.  (2) Has committed any fraud in connection with any federal housing program. (3) Currently owes rent or other amounts to the PHA or to another PHA inconnection with Section 8 or public housing assistance under the 1937 Act. (4) Has not reimbursed the PHA or another PHA for any amounts paid to anowner under a housing assistance payments contract or housing voucher contractfor rent or other amounts owned by the family under its lease (see andSection;887.215 and andSection; 882.112(d) of this chapter), or for a vacated unit(see andSection; 882.105(b)).  (5) Breaches and agreement to pay amounts owned to PHA, or amounts paidto an owner by a PHA. The PHA, at its discretion, may offer the applicantor participant the opportunity to enter an agreement to pay amounts owedto a PHA or amounts paid to an owner by a PHA. The PHA may prescribe theterms of the agreement.  (c) <T3>Termination of assistance</T3>. (1) The PHA may terminate housing assistancepayments that are being made on behalf of a participant under a currenthousing voucher contract, if the participant:  (i) Has violated any family obligation under the Housing Voucher Program,as stated in andSection; 887.401; (ii) If the participant has committed any fraud in connection with anyfederal housing assistance program; or (iii) Has breached an agreement as described in paragraph (b)(5). (2) This section does not limit the authority of a PHA to terminate orreduce assistance payments under a housing voucher contract for violationsof an owner's obligations under the contract.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.405</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Informal review or hearing. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Informal review of PHA decision on application for participation inPHA program. </T3>(1) The PHA must give an applicant for participationin the PHA's program prompt written notice of a decision denying assistanceto the applicant (including a decision denying listing on the PHA waitinglist, issuance of a housing voucher, or participation in the program.)The notice must contain a brief statement of the reasons for the decision.The notice also must indicate that the applicant may request an informalreview of the decision, and describe how to obtain the informal review.(2) The PHA must give the applicant an opportunity for an informal reviewof the decision, in accordance with review procedures established by thePHA. The informal review may be conducted by any person or persons designatedby the PHA, other than a person who made or approved the decision underreview or a subordinate of that person. The applicant must be given anopportunity to present written or oral objections to the PHA decision.The PHA must promptly notify the applicant in writing of the final PHAdecision after the informal review, including a brief statement of thereasons for the final decision. (3) The PHA is not required to provide an opportunity for an informal reviewin accordance with paragraph (a) of this section to review: (i) Discretionary administrative determinations by the PHA, or to considergeneral policy issues or class grievances; (ii) The PHA's determination of the number of bedrooms entered on the housingvoucher under the occupancy standards established by the PHA (see andSection;andSection;887.155(a)(3) and 887.253); (iii) The PHA's determination that a unit located by a housing voucherholder does not comply with the PHA's housing quality standards, or thePHA's determination not to approve the lease for the unit; or (iv) The PHA's decision not to approve a request by a housing voucher holderfor an extension of the term of the housing voucher. (b) <T3>Informal hearing on PHA decision affecting participant family. </T3>(1)The PHA must give a participant in the PHA's Housing Voucher Program anopportunity for an informal hearing to consider whether the following decisionsrelating to the individual circumstances of the family are in accordancewith the law, HUD regulations and PHA rules: (i) A determination of the amount of the housing assistance payment (notincluding determination of the PHA's schedule of utility allowances forfamilies in the PHA's Section 8 Program); (ii) A decision to deny or terminate assistance on behalf of the participant;and (iii) In the case of an assisted family that wants to move to another dwellingunit with continued participation in the PHA program (see andSection; 887.167),the PHA's determination of the number of bedrooms entered on the housingvoucher under the occupancy standards established by the PHA. (See andSection;andSection;887.155(a)(3) and 887.253.) (2) The PHA is not required to provide an opportunity for an informal hearingin accordance with paragraph (b) of this section to review: (i) Discretionary administrative determinations by the PHA, or to considergeneral policy issues or class grievances; (ii) The PHA's determination that a unit does not comply with the PHA'shousing quality standards, that the owner has failed to maintain or operatea contract unit to provide decent, safe, and sanitary housing in accordancewith HQS (including all services, maintenance and utilities required underthe lease), or that the contract unit is not in accordance with housingquality standards because of an increase in family size or change in familycomposition; (iii) The decision by the PHA to excerise any remedy against the ownerunder an outstanding contract including the termination of housing assistancepayments to the owner (see andSection; 887.261); or (iv) The PHA's decision not to approve a family's request for an extensionof the term of the housing voucher issued to an assisted family that wantsto move to another dwelling unit with continued participation in the PHA'sHousing Voucher Program. (3)(i) The PHA must give the participant prompt written notice of the decisiondescribed in paragraph (b)(1)(ii) of this section. The notice must containa brief statement of the reasons for the decision. The notice must indicatethat, if the participant does not agree with the decision, the participantmay request an informal hearing on the decision, and also must state thetime by which the request for an informal hearing must be made by the participant.(ii) When the PHA determines the amount of housing assistance payment ordetermines the number of bedrooms entered on the housing voucher of a participantthat wants to move to another dwelling unit as described in paragraph (b)(1)(iii)of this section, the PHA must notify the participant that the participantmay ask for an explanation of the basis of the PHA determination, and that,if the participant does not agree with the determination, the participantmay request an informal hearing on the decision.  (4) If the PHA has decided to terminate housing assistance payments onbehalf of a participant under an outstanding housing voucher contract (andif the PHA is required to give the participant an informal hearing on thedecision), the participant must be afforded the opportunity for such informalhearing before the termination of housing assistance payments. (5) In all cases where a hearing is required under paragraph (b) of thissection, the PHA must proceed with a hearing in a reasonably expeditiousmanner upon the request of the participant. (6) The PHA must adopt written procedures for conducting informal hearingsfor participants in the PHA's Housing Voucher Program. The PHA's hearingprocedures must comply with the following: (i) The hearing may be conducted by any person or persons designated bythe PHA, other than a person who made or approved the decision under reviewor a subordinate of this person. (ii) At its own expense, the participant may be represented by a lawyeror other representative. (iii) The person who conducts the hearing may regulate the conduct of thehearing in accordance with the PHA hearing procedures. (iv) The PHA and the participant must be given the opportunity to presentevidence, and may question any witnesses. Evidence may be considered withoutregard to admissibility under the rules of evidence applicable to judicialproceedings. (v) The person who conducts the hearing must issue a written decision,stating briefly the reasons for the decision. Factual determinations relatingto the individual circumstances of the participant must be based on theevidence presented at the hearing. A copy of the hearing decision mustbe furnished promptly to the participant. (7)(i) The PHA is not bound by a hearing decision: (A) Concerning a matter for which the PHA is not required to provide anopportunity for an informal hearing under paragraph (b) of this section,or otherwise in excess of the authority of the person conducting the hearingunder the PHA hearing procedures, or(B) Contrary to HUD regulations or requirements, or otherwise contraryto Federal, State, or local law. (ii) If the PHA determines that it is not bound by a hearing decision,the PHA must promptly notify the participant of the determination, andof the reasons for the determination.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Special Housing Types</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.451</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose of this subpart. </ITAG>(a) This subpart contains the additional program requirements for the followingspecialized types of housing: Cooperative or mutual housing; independentgroup residences; manufactured homes; single room occupancy; and congregatehousing. (The requirements that are unique to shared housing, another specialhousing type, are set out in Subpart K of this part.) (b) Except as modified by this Subpart J, all of the requirements in theother subparts of this part apply to these special housing types.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.453</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperative or mutual housing: Definition. </ITAG>``Cooperative or mutual housing'' means a type of housing authorized byState law that is owned by a corporation where ownership of a share inthe corporation entitles the owner to exclusive occupancy of a unit, andparticipation in the operation of the project.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.455</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cooperative or mutual housing: Limitation on the use of housing voucherauthority. </ITAG>A PHA may use its housing voucher authority to provide assistance withrespect to cooperative or mutual housing, if the following circumstancesexist: (a) The cooperative or mutual housing occupancy agreement requires thatthe housing units be owned-occupied, unless authorization is obtained fromthe board to sublet a unit; (b) The cooperative or mutual housing occupancy agreement provides thatany sale of the occupant's interest in the unit (such as a sale of a certificatein the corporation) is controlled by a formula set out in the corporation'sby-laws or occupancy agreement. The formula must be adopted by the corporation'sboard of directors and must be designed to ensure continued affordabilityof the cooperative or mutual housing to lower income families (as definedby HUD in Part 813 of this chapter) for a period that extends at leastfifteen years; and (c) The PHA determines that providing assistance under this part will helpin maintaining the affordability of this housing to lower income families.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.461</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independent group residences (IRG): Definitions. </ITAG>The following additional definitions apply to independent group residences:<T3>Independent group residence (IGR). </T3>A dwelling unit for the exclusiveresidential use of two to twelve elderly, handicapped, or disabled individuals(excluding any live-in resident), who are not capable of living completelyindependently and who require a planned program of continual supportiveservices. Residents of an IGR receiving Section 8 assistance must not requirecontinual medical or nursing care, must be ambulatory or not continuouslyconfined to a bed, and must be capable of taking appropriate actions fortheir own safety in a emergency. <T3>Resident assistant. </T3>A person who lives in an independent groupresidence and provides on a daily basis some or all of the necessary supportservices to elderly, handicapped, or disabled individuals receiving Section8 housing assistance and who is essential to these individuals' care orwell being. A resident assistant may not be related by blood, marriage,or operation of law to any of the individuals receiving section 8 housingassistance, and may not contribute any portion of his or her income orresources toward the expenses of these individuals. <T3>Service agency. </T3>A public or private nonprofit organization thatis recognized by the State as qualified to determine the supportive serviceneeds of individuals who will reside in Independent Group Residences. Theservice agency may perform outreach to potential residents of IndependentGroup Residences and assist these individuals in applying for housing assistance,provide all or a portion of the supportive services and may identify andcoordinate appropriate local, public or private resources to furnish theseservices. The service agency may own or sublease an independent group residence.<T3>Service agreement. </T3>A written agreement, approved by the State,between the owner (including an entity with the right to sublease) of anindependent group residence and the service agency or other entities providingthe supportive services to the occupants of independent group residences.The agreement specifies the types and frequency of the supportive servicesto be furnished.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.463</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independent group residences: Selection preferences. </ITAG>In addition to the preferences provided in andSection; 887.155, a PHA mayestablish a preference for selecting an eligible applicant who has indicateda desire to reside in an independent group residence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.465</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independent group residences: Additional lease requirements. </ITAG>Leases for independent group residences must incorporate by reference thesupportive services to be provided in accordance with the written serviceagreement between the owner and the service agency or other entities providingthe necessary supportive services. When the owner provides the necessarysupportive service, there is no service agreement and the provision ofthese services must be contained in the lease. The service agreement oranalogous lease provisions must be approved in writing by the State beforethe PHA executes the housing voucher contract.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.467</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independent group residences: Housing quality standards. </ITAG>The housing quality standards in andSection; 887.251(a) apply to IGRs, exceptthat the standards in this section apply in place of andSection;andSection;887.251 (a), (b), (c), (f), and (k).(a) <T3>Sanitary facilities.</T3> The dwelling unit must contain and have readyaccess to a flush toilet that can be used in privacy, a fixed basin withhot and cold running water, and a shower or tub equipped with hot and coldrunning water all in proper operating condition and adequate for personalcleanliness and the disposal of human waste. These facilities must utilizean approvable public or private disposal system, and must be sufficientin number so that they need not be shared by more than four occupants.Those units accommodating physically handicapped occupants with wheelchairsor other special equipment must provide access to all sanitary facilities,and must provide, as appropriate to the needs of the occupants, basinsand toilets, of the appropriate heights; grab bars to toilets and to showersand/or bathtubs; shower seats; and adequate space for movement.(b) <T3>The kitchen facilities</T3> of the unit must contain adequate spaceto store, prepare, and serve foods in a sanitary manner. A cooking stoveor range, a refrigerator of appropriate size and in sufficient quantityfor the number of occupants, and a kitchen sink with hot and cold runningwater must be present in proper operating condition. The sink must draininto an approvable private or public system. There must be adequate facilitiesand services for the sanitary disposal of food waste and refuse, includingfacilities for temporary storage where necessary (e.g., garbage cans).(c) <T3>Space and security.</T3> The dwelling unit must provide the familyadequate space and security. A living room, kitchen, dining area, bathroom,and other appropriate social, recreational or community space must be withinthe unit, and the unit must contain at least one bedroom of appropriatesize for each two persons. Exterior doors and windows accessible from outsideeach unit must be lockable. An emergency exit plan must be developed andoccupants must be apprised of the details of the plan. All emergency andsafety features and procedures must meet applicable State and local standards.(d) <T3>Structure and material.</T3> The unit must be structurally sound toavoid any threat to the health and safety of the occupants and to protectthe occupants from the environment. Ceilings, walls, and floors must nothave any serious defects such as severe bulging or leaning, large holes,loose surface materials, severe buckling or noticeable movement under walkingstress, missing parts or other significant damage. The roof structure mustbe firm and the roof must be weathertight. The exterior or wall structureand exterior wall surface may not have any serious defects such as seriousleaning, buckling, sagging, cracks or holes, loose siding, or other seriousdamage. The condition and equipment of interior and exterior stairways,halls, porches, walkways, etc., must not present a danger of tripping orfalling. Elevators must be maintained in safe and operating condition.Units accommodating physically handicapped occupants with wheelchairs andother special equipment may not contain architectural barriers that impedeaccess or use, and handrails and ramps must be provided as appropriate.(e) <T3>Site and neighborhood</T3> must be reasonably free from disturbingnoises and reverberations and other hazards to the health, safety, andgeneral welfare of the occupants, and must not be subject to serious adverseenvironmental conditions, natural or manmade, such as dangerous walks,steps, instability, flooding, poor drainage, septic tank back-ups, sewagehazards or mudslides; abnormal air pollution, smoke or dust; excessivenoise, vibrations or vehicular traffic; excessive accumulations of trash;vermin or rodent infestation; or fire hazards. The unit must be locatedin a residential setting and be similar in size and appearance to housinggenerally found in the neighborhood, and be within walking distance oraccessible via public and available private transportation to medical andother appropriate commercial and community service facilities.(f) <T3>Supportive Services.</T3> (1) A planned program of adequate supportiveservice appropriate to the needs of the occupants must be provided on acontinual basis by a qualified resident assistant(s) residing in the unit,or other qualified person(s) not residing in the unit, who will providethese services on a continual, planned basis. Supportive services thatare provided within the unit may include the following types of services:counseling; social services that promote physical activity, intellectualstimulation, or social motivation; training or assistance with activitiesof daily living, including housekeeping, dressing, personal hygiene, orgrooming; provision of basic first aid skills in case of emergencies; supervisionof self-administration of medications, diet, and nutrition; and assurancethat occupants obtain incidental medical care, as needed, by facilitiatingthe making of appointments at, and transportation to, medical facilities.Supportive services provided within the unit may not include the provisionof continual nursing, medical, or psychiatric care.(2) The provision for and quality of the planned program of supportiveservices, including the minimal qualifications, quantity, and working hoursof the resident assistant(s) living in the unit or other qualified person(s)providing supportive services must be determined initially by the serviceagency in accordance with the standards established by the State. Compliancewith these standards by the service agency must be monitored regularlythroughout the term of the housing voucher contract by the PHA and theState (e.g., Department of Human Resources, Mental Health, Mental Retardation,Social Services), or a local authority (other than the service agency providingservices) designated by the State to establish, maintain, and enforce thesestandards.(3) A written service agreement, approved by the State and in effect betweenthe owner and the service agency or the entities that provide the necessarysupportive service, must be submitted to the PHA with the request for leaseapproval. The lease between the eligible individual and the owner mustset forth the owner's obligation for and means of providing these services.If the owner provides the supportive services, a service agreement is notrequired and the provision of these services must be incorporated intothe lease and must be approved by the State. (See andSection; 887.465.)(g) <T3>State approval.</T3> Independent group residences must be licensed,certified, or otherwise approved in writing by the State (e.g., Departmentof Human Resources, Mental Health, Retardation, Social Services, etc.)before the execution of the initial housing voucher contract. This approvalmust be reexamined periodically based on a schedule established by theState. To assure that facilities and the supportive services are appropriateto the needs of the occupants, the State also approve the written serviceagreement (or lease, if the provider of services is the lessor) for eachindependent group residence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.469 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Independent group residences: Payment standard.</ITAG>The payment standard for a participant in an IGR is determined by dividingthe dollar amount of the payment standard for the entire residence (forexample, the 4-bedroom payment standard for a 4-bedroom residence) by thetotal number of potential occupants (assisted or unassisted), excludinga resident assistant (if any) occupying no more than one bedroom.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.471 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manufactured homes: Definition.</ITAG>A ``manufactured home'' is a structure, with or without a permanent foundation,that is built on a permanent chassis, is designed for use as a principalplace of residence, and meets the housing quality standards in andSection;887.473.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.473 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Manufactured homes: Housing quality standards.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Performance requirement.</T3> In addition to meeting the housing qualitystandards in andSection; 887.251, a manufactured home unit must:(1) Be equipped with at least one smoke detector in working condition;and(2) Must be placed on the site in a stable manner and be free from hazardssuch as sliding or wind damage.(b) <T3>Acceptability criteria.</T3> A manufactured home must be securely anchoredby a tie-down device that distributes and transforms the loads imposedby the unit to appropriate ground anchors to resist wind overturning andsliding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.481 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single room occupancy (SRO): Definition. </ITAG>``Single room occupancy housing'' means a unit that contains no sanitaryfacilities or food preparation facilities, or contains one but not bothtypes of facilities (as those facilities are defined in 887.251 (a) and(b), that is suitable for occupancy by an eligible individual capable ofindependent living. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.483 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single room occupancy: Additional eligibility criteria. </ITAG>Elderly, handicapped, and disabled persons may use SRO housing only ifthe following conditions exist: (a) The property is located in an area in which there is significant demandfor SRO units, as determined by the HUD Field Office; (b) The PHA and the unit of general local government in which the propertyis located approve the use of SRO units for this purpose; and (c) The unit of general local government and the local PHA certify to HUDthat the property meets applicable local health and safety standards forSRO housing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.485 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single room occupancy: Housing quality standards. </ITAG>The housing quality standards in andSection; 887.251 apply to SROs, except887.251 (a), (b), and (c). In addition, the following performance requirementsapply: (a) Each SRO unit may be occupied by no more than one person. (b) Exterior doors and windows accessible from outside the SRO unit mustbe lockable. (c) Sanitary facilities, space and security characteristics must meet localcode standards for single room occupancy housing. In the absence of applicablelocal code standards, the requirements for habitable rooms used for livingand sleeping purposes contained in the American Public Health Association'sRecommended Housing Maintenance and Occupancy Ordinance shall be used.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.487</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single room occupancy: Payment standard. </ITAG>(a) The payment standard amount for SRO units is equal to 75 percent ofthe Section 8 Existing Housing 0-bedroom fair market rent, or, if HUD hasapproved the use of community-wide exception rents for 0-bedroom unitsunder andSection; 882.106(a)(3) of this chapter, the payment standard amountfor SRO units is equal to 75 percent of the HUD-approved community-wideexception rent. (Community-wide exception rents are maximum gross rentsapproved by HUD for the Certificate Program under andSection; 882.106(a)(3)of this chapter for a designated municipality, county, or similar locality,which apply to the whole PHA jurisdiction.) (b) HUD may approve a higher SRO payment standard amount, not to exceed100 percent of the Section 8 Existing Housing fair market rent or HUD-approvedcommunity-wide exception rent referred to in paragraph (a) of this section,if the PHA can justify a change based on data reflecting the SRO rent levelsthat exist within the entire market area. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.489 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Congregate housing: Definition. </ITAG>``Congregate housing'' means housing for elderly, handicapped, or disabledparticipants, that meets the housing quality standards for congregate housingspecified in andSection; 887.489. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.491 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Congregate housing: Housing quality standards. </ITAG>The housing quality standards in andSection; 887.251 apply to congregatehousing, except that andSection; 887.251(b), food preparation and refusedisposal, and the requirement in andSection; 887.251(c) for adequate spacefor kitchen area, do not apply. In addition, the following standards apply:(a) The unit must contain a refrigerator of appropriate size; and (b) The sanitary facilities described in andSection; 887.251 (a) of thissection must be contained within the unit. (c) The central dining facility and central kitchen must be located withinthe building or housing complex and be accessible to the occupants of thecongregate units, and must contain suitable space and equipment to store,prepare, and serve food in a sanitary manner by a food service or personsother than the occupants. The facilities must be for the primary use ofoccupants of the congregate units and be sufficient in size to accommodatethe occupants. There must be adequate facilities and services for the sanitarydisposal of food waste and refuse, including facilities for temporary storagewhere necessary (e.g., garbage cans). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.493 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Congregate housing: Payment standard. </ITAG>The payment standard amount for congregate housing units is equal to theSection 8 Existing Housing 0-bedroom fair market rent, or, if HUD has approvedthe use of community-wide exception rents for 0-bedroom units under andSection;882.106(a)(3) of this chapter and the exception rent applies throughoutthe PHA's jurisdiction, the payment standard amount for congregate housingunits is equal to the HUD-approved community-wide exception rent. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_Shared Housing </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.501 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability, scope, and purpose. </ITAG>In shared housing, an assisted family shares a housing unit (such as ahouse or an apartment) with the other resident or residents of the unit.The authorization for use of shared housing in the Housing Voucher Programis designed to provide additional choices in living arrangements for assistedfamilies. The PHA has discretion to determine whether to include sharedhousing in its Housing Voucher Program and to design the shared housingcomponent to meet local needs and circumstances. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.503 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>For purposes of shared housing, the following definitions apply: <T3>Common space.</T3> Space available for use by the assisted family(ies)and other occupants of the unit. <T3>Individual lease shared housing.</T3> The type of shared housing inwhich the PHA enters into a separate housing voucher contract for eachassisted family residing in a shared housing unit. <T3>Private space</T3>. The portion of the dwelling unit that is for theexclusive use of an assisted family. <T3>Shared housing.</T3> A housing unit occupied by two or more families,consisting of common space for shared use by the occupants of the unitsand (except in the case of a shared one-bedroom unit) separate privatespace for each assisted family. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.505 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Types of shared housing and applicable requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Shared housing types.</T3> Individual lease shared housing is the onlytype of shared housing authorized under this Subpart K. Related lease sharedhousing (see Part 882, Subpart C of this chapter) is not authorized underthis Subpart K. (b) <T3>Applicable requirements.</T3> Except as modified by this Subpart K,all of the requirements in the other subparts of this part apply to sharedhousing. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.507 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA administration of shared housing. </ITAG>(a) <T3>PHA election.</T3> A PHA is not required to permit use of shared housingin its Housing Voucher Program. At any time, a PHA may change a decisionto include shared housing in its program. The PHA, however, must continueto administer, in accordance with applicable requirements, any shared housinghousing voucher contracts that it has executed.(b) <T3>Administrative/equal opportunity housing plan. </T3>(1) If the PHAdecides to permit shared housing in its program, or to change or discontinueshared housing, it must submit an amendment to its administrative/equalopportunity housing plan for HUD approval.(2) The administrative/equal opportunity housing plan must state the PHA'spolicies for operating shared housing. The plan may not set aside housingvouchers for, or otherwise restrict the use of housing vouchers to, sharedhousing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.509</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Housing quality standards for shared housing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability of housing quality standards to entire unit.</T3> Theentire unit must comply with the performance requirements and acceptabilitycriteria, as provided in andSection;andSection; 887.251 (a) and (b) and inandSection;andSection; 887.251 (d) through (k).(b) <T3>Facilities available for family. </T3>The facilities available forthe use of each assisted family in shared housing under the family's leasemust include (whether in the family's private space or in the common space)a living room, sanitary facilities in accordance with andSection; 887.251(a),and food preparation and refuse disposal facilities in accordance withandSection; 887.251(b).(c) <T3>Space and security</T3>_(1) <T3>Inapplicability of andSection; 887.251(c). </T3>Section 887.251(c) doesnot apply to shared housing.(2) <T3>Performance requirement. </T3>The entire unit must provide adequatespace and security for all its occupants (whether assisted or unassisted).The total number of occupants in the unit may not exceed 12 persons. Eachunit must contain private space containing at least one bedroom for eachassisted family, plus common space for shared use by the occupants of theunit. The private space for each assisted family must contain at leastone bedroom for each two persons in the family. (The two preceding sentencesdo not apply to the case of two individuals sharing a one-bedroom unit.However, in that situation, no other persons may occupy the unit.) Commonspace must be appropriate for shared use by the occupants. If any membersof the family are physically handicapped (at the time of lease approval),the unit's common space and the family's private space must be accessibleand usable by them.(3) <T3>Acceptability criteria. </T3>The unit must contain a living room, akitchen, bathroom(s), and bedroom(s). Persons of opposite sex, other thanhusband and wife or very young children, may not be required to occupythe same bedroom. Exterior doors and windows accessible from outside theunit must be lockable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.511</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Occupancy of a shared housing unit.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Who may share a unit. </T3>(1) Persons who are not assisted under theHousing Voucher Program may reside in a shared housing unit.(2) Except for a one-bedroom unit, an owner of a shared housing unit mayreside in the unit, and a resident owner may enter into a housing vouchercontract with the PHA. Housing assistance, however, may not be providedon behalf of owner who is not an owner-shareholder in mutual or cooperativehousing. An assisted person may not be related to a resident owner.(3) One or more assisted families may reside in a shared housing unit.A PHA may not execute a housing voucher contract for individual lease sharedhousing and a housing assistance payments contract for related lease sharedhousing under the Certificate Program for the same unit.(b) <T3>Size of unit and family space</T3>. The number of bedrooms in the privatespace of an assisted family initially must be the same as the number statedon the family's housing voucher, except in the case of two individualssharing a one bedroom unit. The PHA may not approve a lease or executea housing voucher contract for shared housing unless the unit, includingthe portion of the unit available for use by the assisted family underits lease, meets the housing quality standards under andSection; 887.509.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.513</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determining amount of housing assistance.</ITAG>For purposes of computing the minimum rent under andSection; 887.353, thePHA must prorate the rent to owner attributable to the family on the basisof a ratio that is equal to the number of bedrooms indicated on the housingvoucher divided by the number of bedrooms in the unit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.515</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment standard for shared housing.</ITAG>The payment standard for a family in a shared housing unit is determinedby multiplying the dollar amount of the payment standard for the entireunit (for example, the 4-bedroom payment standard for a 4-bedroom unit)by a ratio that is equal to the number of bedrooms indicated on the family'shousing voucher divided by the number of bedrooms in the unit.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart L_Mobility and Portability</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.551</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Overview.</ITAG>PHAs are encouraged to provide families with the broadest geographicalchoice of units, both within and outside the PHA's jurisdiction. This subpartsets out policies for providing greater choice to housing voucher holdersand participants who desire to move outside the PHA's jurisdiction.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.553</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this subpart L the following definitions apply:<T3>Initial PHA.</T3> A PHA administering a Housing Voucher Program witha housing voucher holder or participant who desires to or has moved toanother PHA's jurisdiction.<T3>Receiving PHA.</T3> A PHA administering a Housing Voucher or CertificateProgram that accepts a housing voucher holder or housing voucher participantfrom another PHA's jurisdiction under the portability procedures in thissubpart L.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.555</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mobility: Encouraging continued participation through voluntary arrangementsamong PHAs when a family wants to move outside the PHA's jurisdiction.</ITAG>A PHA should foster a wide choice of housing opportunities for familiesthrough interjurisdictional mobility by:(a) Developing administrative arrangements with other PHAs to permit housingvoucher and certificate holders to seek housing in the broadest possiblearea; and (b) Cooperating, to the extent practicable, with other PHAs by issuinga housing voucher or certificate to a family, already receiving the benefitof housing voucher or certificate assistance, that wants to move from thejurisdiction of one PHA to another. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.557 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Encouraging continued participation when a family wantsto move outside the PHA's jurisdiction and there is no voluntary arrangement.</ITAG>If a family that is a housing voucher holder or a family that is a participantin the Housing Voucher Program desires to move with continued assistanceoutside the PHA's jurisdiction, but cannot be given the opportunity forcontinued housing voucher or certificate assistance under one of the voluntarymobility programs described in andSection; 887.555, then the PHA that hasjurisdiction in the location to which the family wishes to move must, ifit is administering a Housing Voucher Program, accept the family and provideservices to the family as if the family was part of its Housing VoucherProgram. The PHA, if it is not administering a Housing Voucher Program,is encouraged to administer the housing voucher assistance on behalf ofthe family or to issue the family one of its available section 8 certificates.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.559 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Family eligibility. </ITAG>A family is eligible for portability if it lives in the initial PHA's jurisdictionand is a housing voucher holder, or if the family is a participant in theinitial PHA's Housing Voucher Program. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.561 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Determination to deny or terminate assistance. </ITAG>Either the initial PHA or the receiving PHA may make a determination todeny or terminate assistance to the family in accordance with andSection;887.403. <ITAG tagnum="87">andSection; 887.563 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Responsibilities of the initial PHA. </ITAG>(a) The initial PHA must manage its Housing Voucher Program in a mannerthat will ensure that it has the financial ability to provide continuedhousing voucher assistance in accordance with these portability procedures.(b) The initial PHA may deny the request to move if the number of familiesmoving under these portability procedures would be more than 15 percentof units under lease in the initial PHA's Housing Voucher Program. (c) If a family that is eligible for portability notifies the initial PHAthat it wants to move under these procedures and informs the PHA concerningthe area to which the family wants to move, the initial PHA must determinewhether the PHA in the new area administers a Housing Voucher Program and,if it does not, but operates a Certificate Program, whether the receivingPHA is willing to accept the family under andSection; 887.557. (d) If the family is going to move under the portability provisions ofthis section, the initial PHA must notify the receiving PHA to expect thefamily. The initial PHA must verify to the receiving PHA that the familymet the income-eligibility requirement for admission to the program andthat the initial PHA issued the family a housing voucher consistent withandSection; 887.155, and must state the date (which is governed by andSection;887.165) by which the family must submit a request for lease approval inthe jurisdiction of the receiving PHA. (e) When the family moves out of the initial PHA's jurisdiction, the initialPHA retains funding for the housing voucher under its ACC. (f) The initial PHA must reimburse the receiving PHA for the full amountof the housing assistance payments made by the receiving PHA on behalfof the family. The amount of housing assistance is based on the paymentstandard in effect at the receiving PHA. If the receiving PHA elects toprovide assistance to the family utilizing funding under the ACC for itsown Housing Voucher or Certificate Program, the initial PHA is not requiredto reimburse the receiving PHA. (g) The initial PHA must reimburse the receiving PHA 80 percent of theinitial PHA's on-going administrative fee for each unit month that thefamily under a housing voucher contract is in the receiving PHA's jurisdiction.(h) The initial PHA may receive the preliminary fee for any new unit (limitedby cost-justified expenses submitted up to the maximum amount allowed forthis purpose), if the portable housing voucher qualified for the preliminaryfee. The initial PHA may receive a hard-to-house fee, if the family housedwith the portable housing voucher qualifies for the hard-to-house fee.(i) If the portability family leaves the Housing Voucher Program, or ifthe receiving PHA elects to provide assistance to the family utilizingfunding under the ACC for its own Housing Voucher or Certificate Program,the initial PHA is free to use the funding, previously needed to supportpayment of subsidy for the portable housing voucher, for other families.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 887.565 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Responsibilities of the receiving PHA. </ITAG>(a) A receiving PHA that administers a Housing Voucher Program must issuea housing voucher to a family moving from the Housing Voucher Program ofanother PHA. A receiving PHA that administers a Housing Voucher Programmay not limit the number of housing vouchers issued to such families. Thereceiving PHA may either bill the initial PHA for the housing assistancepayments on behalf of the family or may provide assistance to the familyutilizing funding under the ACC for its own Housing Voucher or CertificateProgram. (b) A receiving PHA that does not administer a Housing Voucher Program,but does administer a Certificate Program may: (1) Refer the initial PHA to a Statewide or other multijurisdictional PHAthat administers a Housing Voucher Program in its jurisdiction; (2) Administer the housing voucher assistance on behalf of the family andbill the initial PHA for amounts authorized in these procedures; or (3) Issue a certificate to the family, utilizing funding under the ACCfor its own Certificate Program.(c) The receiving PHA must recertify the family's income initially andat least annually thereafter for purposes of determining the housing assistancepayments. The receiving PHA may not deny the family a housing voucher onthe ground that the family's income exceeds the income limits for housingvoucher eligibility in the receiving PHA's jurisdiction.   (d) The receiving PHA promptly must notify the initial PHA if a familyfails to submit a request for lease approval by the date specified by theinitial PHA.   (e) The amount of housing assistance payments to be made on behalf of thefamily must be determined in accordance with andSection;887.353. A PHA thatdoes not administer a Housing Voucher Program must adopt a payment standardbased on the appropriate Fair Market Rent or HUD-approved community-wideexception rent in effect in the receiving PHA's jurisdiction at the timeit issues the family a housing voucher, must use all other applicable proceduresin andSection;887.353 in determining assistance payments.   (f) The receiving PHA must perform all of the functions normally associatedwith providing assistance to a family in a Housing Voucher Program, includinglease approval, annual recertification of income, and annual inspectionof the unit.   (g) The receiving PHA may bill the initial PHA for an amount equal to 80percent of the initial PHA's on-going administrative fee, unless it electsto provide assistance to the family utilizing funding under the ACC forits own Housing Voucher or Certificate Program. The receiving PHA alsomay bill the initial PHA for up to the preliminary fee for housing vouchersfor cost-justified expenses.   (h) The receiving PHA is responsible for housing assistance payments itmakes on behalf of the family to the owner in its jurisdiction. To accomplishthis, in cases in which it does not elect to provide assistance to thefamily utilizing funding under the ACC for its own Housing Voucher or CertificateProgram, the receiving PHA bills the initial PHA for the amount of thehousing assistance payments.   (i) The receiving PHA promptly must notify the initial PHA if the familyceases to be a current participant in the initial PHA's Housing VoucherProgram.   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;887.567 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Portability: Subsequent moves.   </ITAG>(a) A family may move more than once, using these portability procedures,although the initial PHA may limit family moves to not more than one inany twelve-month period.   (b) When the family wishes to move from an area in which the receivingPHA has been billing the initial PHA, the PHA in the new jurisdiction towhich the family moves becomes the receiving PHA. It then has all of thechoices and obligations of a receiving PHA as described in these procedures.The first receiving PHA is no longer involved, because the initial PHAretains funding authority for the housing voucher.   (c) When a family wishes to move from an area in which the receiving PHAhas elected to provide assistance to the family utilizing funding underthe ACC for its own Housing Voucher Program, this receiving PHA becomesthe new initial PHA. It has all of the choices and obligations of an initialPHA as described in these procedures. The PHA in the new jurisdiction towhich the family moves becomes the receiving PHA and has all of the choicesand obligations of a receiving PHA as described in these procedures. Inthis situation, the initial PHA that originally selected the family isno longer involved.   <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 511_RENTAL REHABILITATION GRANT PROGRAM   </ITAG>2. The authority citation for Part 511 continues to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 17 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437o); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act(42 U.S.C. 3535(d)). </ITAG>3. Section 511.1 is revised to read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;511.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability and purpose.   </ITAG>This part implements the Rental Rehabilitation Program contained in section17 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. The Program authorizes theSecretary of Housing and Urban Development to make rental rehabilitationgrants to help support the rehabilitation of privately owned real propertyto be used for primarily residential rental purposes. Grants are made ona formula basis to cities having populations of 50,000 or more, urban counties,States, and qualifying consortia of geographically proximate units of generallocal government. States may use all or part of their grant to carry outtheir own rental rehabilitation programs or to distribute them to eligibleunits of general local government. HUD will administer a State's grantif the State chooses not to do so. The purpose of the program is to helpprovide affordable, standard housing for lower income families and to increasethe availability of housing units for use by housing voucher and certificateholders under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. Subjectto rules for the Certificate Program (24 CFR Part 882, Subparts A and B)and for the Housing Voucher Program (24 CFR Part 887), certificates andhousing vouchers must be used to assist eligible families who are displacedby rental rehabilitation activities and, at the PHA's discretion, to assisteligible families whose rent would be greater than 30 percent of theiradjusted income as a result of rental rehabilitation activities.   4. In andSection;511.2, the defined terms ``voucher'' and ``voucher payment''are removed and a new defined term ``housing vouchers'' is added in appropriatealphabetical order, to read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;511.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *   </ITAG>``Housing vouchers'' are housing vouchers issued under 24 CFR Part 887.  <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *   </ITAG>5. In andSection;511.20, paragraphs (b) (3), (6), (10), and (13) are revisedto read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;511.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program description.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(3) <T3>Lower income benefit. </T3>A description of how the grantee intendsto ensure that the applicable percentage of rental rehabilitation grantamounts will be used for the benefit of lower income families, as specifiedin andSection; 511.10(a). The description will indicate how the grantee plansto achieve the specified level of lower income benefit.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(6) <T3>Selection of proposals. </T3>A statement of the procedures and standardsthat will govern the selection of proposals by the grantee or, in the caseof a State distributing rental rehabilitation grant amounts to State recipients,a statement of the State's guidelines for ensuring that these recipientshave procedures and standards governing their selection of proposals. Theseprocedures and standards must take into account:(i) The extent to which the proposal represents the efficient use of rentalrehabilitation grant amounts;(ii) The extent to which the proposal will minimize displacement of lowerincome tenants in accordance with the displacement and tenant assistancepolicy in andSection; 511.10(h); and (iii) The extent to which the dwelling units involved will be adequatelymaintained and operated with rents at the levels proposed. This may consistof a description of plans for requiring a sufficient equity interest, risk,or other involvement in selected projects by private investors and lendersto ensure appropriate incentives to maintain and operate units after rehabilitation.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(10) <T3>Need for rental housing assistance. </T3>A statement, if applicable,by the grantee as to what rental housing assistance will be available tomeet the needs of lower income tenants.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(13) <T3>PHA participation. </T3>(i) A statement of agreement by the appropriatePHA to participate in the Rental Rehabilitation Program in accordance witha Memorandum of Understanding with the grantee, and with applicable HUDrequirements. For a State rental rehabilitation program where the PHA orPHAs which will participate is not known, a description of how such PHAor PHAs will be selected and the date by which such PHA(s) will be selected.(ii) If known, the name, address, and telephone number of the PHA and contactperson.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Part 511, Subpart E is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Memorandum of Understanding</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 511.40 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Memorandum of understanding.</ITAG>The grantee and each participating PHA shall execute a memorandum of understandingsetting forth the responsibilities of each party and the procedures tobe followed in coordinating the use of housing vouchers and certificateswith rental rehabilitation grant amounts in accordance with HUD requirements.The memorandum of understanding shall describe the extent to which thePHA has chosen to use its discretion to provide preferences to familiesresiding in rental rehabilitation projects. Where a State is distributingrental rehabilitation grant amounts to State recipients, the memorandumshall be executed by the recipient and the appropriate PHA.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 813_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR THE SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAMSAND RELATED PROGRAMS</ITAG>7. The authority citation for Part 813 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5(b), 8, and 16, U.S. Housing Act of 1937(42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f, and 1437n); sec. 7(d), Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>8. Section 813.101 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;813.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and applicability.</ITAG>This part establishes definitions, policies, and procedures related toincome limits and the determination of eligibility, income, and rent forapplicants under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (``the1937 Act''), including those for which loans are made under section 202of the Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q). (See 24 CFR Part 913 forthe analogous rule applicable to the Public Housing and Indian HousingPrograms.) However, andSection; 813.107 and the definitions of Gross Rent,Tenant Rent, Total Tenant Payment, Utility Allowance, and Utility Reimbursementfound in andSection; 813.102 do not apply to families assisted under theHousing Voucher Program (24 CFR Part 887).9. In andSection; 813.102, the definition of ``shared housing'' is revisedto read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Shared housing. </T3>A housing unit occupied by two or more families,consisting of common space for shared use by the occupants of the unitand (except in the case of a shared one-bedroom unit) separate privatespace for each assisted Family. Part 882, Subpart C of this chapter containsspecial requirements for Shared Housing in the Section 8 Certificate programand Part 887, Subpart K of this chapter contains special requirements forShared Housing in the Housing Voucher Program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>10. In andSection; 813.105, paragraph (d) is removed, paragraphs (e) and(f) are redesignated paragraphs (d) and (e), respectively, redesignatedparagraphs (e)(2) through (e)(4) and the parenthetical sentence and theend of the section are revised, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Admission to units available on or after October 1, 1981. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(e) * * * (2) The number of dwelling units that are subject to paragraph (c) of thissection for which HAP Contracts were first effective under Part 882, SubpartB of this chapter on or after October 1, 1981 (including new HAP Contractsfor Families for whom HAP Contracts had been in effect before that datefor a different unit); (3) The number of Families occupying units described in paragraph (e)(1)of this section that were admitted to such units on or after July 1, 1984and were not Very Low-Income Families when admitted, and (4) The number of Families occupying units described in paragraph (e)(2)of this section with Certificates issued on or after July 1, 1984 and werenot Very Low-Income Families when such Certificates were granted. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(The information collection requirements contained in paragraph (b) and(c)(2) were approved by the Office of Management and Budget under controlnumber 2502-0315; the requirements contained in paragraph (e) were approvedunder control number 2502-0204.) 11. In andSection; 813.109, paragraph (a) is revised, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial determination, verification, and reexamination of family incomeand composition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Responsibility for initial determination and reexamination. </T3>TheOwner or PHA shall be responsible for determination of eligibility foradmission, for determination of Annual Income, Adjusted Income, and TotalTenant Payment, and for reexamination of Family income and compositionat least annually, as provided in pertinent program regulations and handbooks(see <T3>e.g., </T3>Part 882, Subparts B and E; Part 883, Subpart G; Part 884,Subpart B; Part 886, Subparts A and C; and Part 887, Subpart H). As usedin this part, the ``effective date'' of an examination or reexaminationrefers to (1) In the case of an examination for admission, the effective date ofthe initial occupancy; and (2) In the case of a reexamination of an existing tenant, the effectivedate of the redetermined housing assistance payment with respect to theHousing Voucher Program (Part 887) and the effective date of the redeterminedTotal Tenant Payment for all programs. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 882_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_EXISTING PROGRAM</ITAG>12. The authority citation for Part 882 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 3, 5, and 8 of the United States Housing Actof 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, and 1437f); sec. 7(d) of the Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>13. In andSection; 882.204, paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(3) are revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of applications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (1) An equal opportunity housing plan. If the PHA is participating in theHousing Voucher Program, the PHA must have a combined equal opportunityhousing plan that covers the PHA's entire Certificate Program and HousingVoucher Program and complies with the requirements of this section andof andSection; 887.59 of this chapter. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) An administrative plan. If the PHA is participating in the HousingVoucher Program, the PHA must have a combined administrative plan thatcovers the PHA's entire Certificate Program and Housing Voucher Programand complies with the requirements of this section and of andSection; 887.61of this chapter. (i) The PHA must submit for HUD approval any changes in its HUD-approvedadministrative plan. (ii) The plan must include: (A) A statement of the PHA's overall approach and objectives in administeringthe Certificates Program; (B) A description of the policies concerning the functions for which thePHA has discretion to establish local policies and procedures for treatmentof applicants or participants, including: maintaining, closing, and reopeningPHA waiting lists; voluntary interjurisdictional mobility of Certificateholders; issuing, extending, and denying Certificates; occupancy standards;preferences; single room occupancy housing; shared housing; collectingamounts owed the PHA; informal reviews and hearings; recertifications;and directing Section 8 program activities in support of local or area-widehousing and community development initiatives. (The administrative planshould not restate HUD-mandated policies and procedures.); (C) A statement that the housing quality standards to be used in the operationof the program will be as set forth in andSection; 882.209, or that variationsin the Acceptability Criteria are proposed (in the latter case, each proposedvariation must be specified and justified); and (D) A statement of the number of employees proposed for the program, byposition and functions to be performed. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>14. In andSection; 882.207, paragraph (a) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public notice to lower income families.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) The notice must state:(1) That a Family that is already on the PHA's Section 8 waiting list,even if it was seeking a Housing Voucher, is also on the waiting list forCertificate assistance and does not need to reapply; and(2) That a Family that is on a 1937 Act public housing waiting list willnot lose its place on that waiting list by applying for assistance underthe Certificate Program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>15. In andSection; 882.209, paragraphs (a)(9), (a)(10), and (a)(11) are redesignatedas paragraphs (a)(11), (a)(12), and (a)(13), respectively, and new paragraphs(a)(9), (a)(10), (c)(11), and (d)(3), are added, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.209</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and participation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(a) * * *(9) An applicant on the PHA's Section 8 waiting list may refuse the PHA'sinitial offer of a Certificate, if the family wants to wait for a HousingVoucher. The family does not lose its place on the waiting list becauseof its refusal. (The family also may refuse a PHA's initial offer of aHousing Voucher, if it wants to wait for a Certificate.) If the familyrefuses the second form of assistance, the PHA may remove the family fromthe waiting list if the PHA's HUD-approved administrative plan authorizessuch action. (10) A Certificate holder may request the PHA to issue the holder a HousingVoucher in exchange for the Certificate. The PHA must exchange the Certificatefor a Housing Voucher if it has Housing Voucher assistance available atthe time of the request.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(11) An explanation of how the principal features of the Certificate Programdiffer from the Housing Voucher Program.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) * * *(3) If the Certificate was issued in exchange for a Housing Voucher (seeandSection; 882.209(a)(10)), the initial term and the extended term, if applicable,are measured from the date the Housing Voucher was issued.16. In andSection; 882.210, paragraph (b) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 882.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Grounds for denial or termination of assistance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) The PHA may deny an applicant admission to participate in the CertificateProgram or, with respect to a current participant, may refuse to issueanother Certificate for a move to another unit, approve a new lease, orexecute a new Contract, if the applicant or participant:(1) Currently owes rent or other amounts to PHA or to another PHA in connectionwith Section 8 or public housing assistance under the 1937 Act.(2) As a previous participant in the Section 8 program or as a participantin the Certificate Program, has not reimbursed the PHA or another PHA forany amounts paid to an owner under a housing assistance payments contractor housing voucher contract for rent or other amounts owed by the familyunder its lease (see andSection; 882.112(d) and andSection; 887.209 of thischapter), or for a vacated unit (see andSection; 882.105(b)).(3) Has violated any family obligation under andSection; 882.118 or underandSection; 887.401 of this chapter (Housing Voucher Program).(4) Has committed any fraud in connection with any Federal housing program.(5) Breaches an agreement provided for in paragraph (c) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>17. In andSection;882.219, paragraphs (b)(2)(ii) and (b)(4) are revised,to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;882.219 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal selection preferences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) * * *(ii) The PHA's system for applying the Federal preferences may providefor circumstances in which applicants who do not qualify for a Federalpreference are issued a Certificate of Family Participation before otherapplicants who are so qualified. Not more than 10 percent of the applicantswho are initially issued a Certificate of Family Participation or HousingVoucher in any one-year period (or such shorter period selected by thePHA before the beginning of its first full year under this paragraph (b)(2)(ii)may be applicants referred to in the preceding sentence.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(4) The PHA must submit to HUD any selection preference system that usesa local residency preference, for review for consistency with the requirementsof paragraph (b)(3), but HUD approval is not required before the PHA mayimplement the system.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 888_SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAM_FAIR MARKETRENTS AND CONTRACT RENT AUTOMATIC ANNUAL ADJUSTMENT FACTORS</ITAG>18. The authority citation for Part 888 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 5 and 8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437c and 1437f); sec. 7(d) Department of HUD Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>19. Section 888.111 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 888.111 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fair market rents for existing housing and moderate rehabilitation:Applicability.</ITAG>The Fair Market Rents (FMRs) for existing housing (see definition in andSection;882.102 of this chapter) are determined by the Department of Housing andUrban Development (HUD) and apply to the Section 8 Certificate Program(Part 882, Subparts A, and B), including space rentals by owners of manufacturedhomes under the Section 8 Certificate Program (Part 882, Subpart F), theSection 8 Moderate Rehabilitation Program (Part 882, Subparts D and E),Section 8 existing housing project-based assistance (Part 882, SubpartG), and Section 8 existing housing assisted under Part 886, Subparts Aand C (Section 8 loan management and property disposition programs). TheFMRs are also used as the basis for establishing payment standards underthe Housing Voucher Program (Part 887).<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 960_ADMISSION TO AND OCCUPANCY OF PUBLIC HOUSING</ITAG>20. The authority citation for Part 960 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437-1437r);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>21. In andSection; 960.204, paragraphs (c) (3) and (4) are redesignated asparagraphs (c) (4) and (5), respectively, and a new paragraph (c)(3) isadded, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 960.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PHA tenant selection policies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) * * *(3) Provide that a family that is on the PHA Section 8 waiting list willnot lose its place on that waiting list by applying for admission to thePHA's public housing projects.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: August 30, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel R. Pierce, Jr.,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-20078 Filed 9-2-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-32-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>